Chapter 1

LEVITICAL


Lately an abundant shower of curates has fallen upon the north of
England: they lie very thick on the hills; every parish has one or more of them.
But not of recent years are we about to speak; we are going back to the
beginning of this century. Present years are dusty, sunburnt, hot, arid; we will
avoid the noon, forget it in siesta, pass the midday in slumber, and dream of
dawn.
If you think, from this prelude, that a romance is waiting for you, reader,
you never were more mistaken. Do you expect sentiment, passion, and
melodrama? Calm your expectations. Something real, cool, and solid lies before
you; something unromantic as Monday morning, when people wake knowing
that they must rise and go to work. You may have a taste of the exciting,
perhaps towards the middle and close of the meal, but the first dish set upon the
table shall be one that a Catholic might eat on Good Friday: it shall be cold
lentils and vinegar; unleavened bread with bitter herbs, and no roast lamb.
Lately, I say, an abundant shower of curates has fallen upon the north of
England; but in 1811 that rain had not descended. Curates were scarce then:
there was no Pastoral Aid to stretch a helping hand to worn-out old rectors,
allowing them to pay a vigorous young colleague from Oxford or Cambridge.
Yet even in those days of scarcity, curates might be found. A certain
favoured district in the West Riding of Yorkshire could boast three blossoming
within a circuit of twenty miles.
You shall see them, reader. Step into this neat garden-house on the edge
of Whinbury; walk forward into the little parlour. There they are at dinner.
Allow me to introduce them to you: Mr. Donne, curate of Whinbury; Mr.
Malone, curate of Briarfield; Mr. Sweeting, curate of Nunnely. These are Mr.
Donne’s lodgings; Mr. Donne has kindly invited his brethren to dine. You and I
will join the party, and hear what is to be heard. At present, however, they are
only eating; and while they eat we will talk aside.
These gentlemen have all the activity of youth – an activity which their
moping old vicars wish would be channelled into their pastoral duties,
superintending the schools, and visiting the sick. But the young curates feel this
to be dull work; they prefer to lavish their energies on visiting each other,
rushing backwards and forwards between their respective lodgings – a triangle
of visits, which they keep up all the year through. Season and weather make no
difference; through snow and hail, wind and rain, they go and dine with each
other.
What attracts them it would be difficult to say. It is not friendship, for
whenever they meet they quarrel. It is not religion; for they may discuss
theology occasionally, but piety – never. It is not the love of eating and
drinking: each might have as good a joint and pudding at his own lodgings as at
his brother’s. Mrs. Gale, Mrs. Hogg, and Mrs. Whipp – their respective
landladies – affirm that “it is just to give folk trouble.” By “folk” the good
ladies of course mean themselves.
Mr. Donne and his guests, as I have said, are at dinner; Mrs. Gale waits
on them, but a spark of the hot kitchen fire is in her eye. She considers that the
privilege of inviting a friend to a meal has been over-exercised of late. On
Monday Mr. Malone came to breakfast and stayed to dinner; on Tuesday Mr.
Malone and Mr. Sweeting came to tea, stayed to supper, occupied the spare
bed, and ate breakfast on Wednesday morning; now, on Thursday, they are both
here at dinner, and she is almost certain they will stay all night.
Mr. Sweeting is complaining that his slice of roast beef is very tough; Mr.
Donne says the beer is flat. If they would only be civil Mrs. Gale wouldn’t
mind it so much; but “these young parsons is so high and scornful, they set
everybody beneath them. They don’t treat her civilly, and they are always
speaking against Yorkshire ways and Yorkshire folk.” Mrs. Gale does not
believe them to be real gentlemen. “The old parsons are worth the whole lump
of college lads; they have good manners, and are kind to high and low.”
“More bread!” cries Mr. Malone, in an accent which proclaims him a
native of Ireland. Mrs. Gale hates Mr. Malone more than the other two; but she
fears him also, for he is tall and strongly-built, with a high-featured, NorthAmerican-Indian sort of face, and a petrified, proud look. Mr. Malone’s father
called himself a gentleman; he was poor, in debt, and arrogant; and his son was
like him.
Mrs. Gale offered him the loaf.
“Cut it, woman,” said her guest; and the “woman” cut it accordingly. Had
she followed her inclinations, she would have cut the curate also.
The curates had good appetites, and though the beef was “tough,” they ate
a great deal of it. They swallowed a large amount of the “flat beer,” while a dish
of Yorkshire pudding and two tureens of vegetables disappeared like leaves
before locusts. The cheese, too, was eaten, and a spice-cake vanished like a
vision. It was mourned in the kitchen by Abraham, Mrs. Gale’s son; he had
reckoned upon leftovers, and when his mother brought down the empty plate,
he lifted up his voice and wept.
The curates, meantime, sat and sipped their wine. Mr. Malone, indeed,
would rather have had whisky; but Mr. Donne did not keep any. While they
sipped they argued, not on politics, nor philosophy, nor even theology – but on
minute points of ecclesiastical discipline, frivolities which seemed empty as
bubbles to all except themselves. Mr. Malone, after two glasses of wine, grew
hilarious after his fashion; that is, he said rude things in a hectoring tone, and
laughed clamorously at his own brilliance.
His companions were the butt for his humour. Malone had a stock of
jokes which he used regularly, seldom varying his wit; for he never considered
himself monotonous, and did not care what others thought. He favoured Mr.
Donne with sarcasms about his thinness, his turned-up nose, and a threadbare
coat which Mr. Donne used to wear when it rained.
Mr. Sweeting was bantered about his small stature and his musical
accomplishments – he played the flute and sang hymns like an angel (so some
young ladies of his parish thought) – sneered at as “the ladies’ pet;” teased
about his mamma and sisters, for whom poor Mr. Sweeting had some lingering
regard, and of whom he was foolish enough now and then to speak to Malone,
from whose nature all feelings of affection had somehow been omitted.
The victims met these attacks each in his own way: Mr. Donne with a
stilted complacency; Mr. Sweeting with the indifference of a light, easy nature.
When Malone’s raillery became too offensive, they turned the tables on him by
asking him how many boys had shouted “Irish Peter!” after him in the street
that day (his name being Peter Augustus Malone); asking whether it was the
fashion in Ireland for clergymen to carry loaded pistols and a shillelagh when
they made pastoral visits; and inquiring what he meant by storrum (as he
pronounced storm).
Malone was soon in a towering passion. He shouted and gesticulated;
Donne and Sweeting laughed. He reviled them as Saxons and snobs at the very
top of his voice; they taunted him with coming from a conquered land. The
little parlour was in uproar. It seemed a wonder that Mr. and Mrs. Gale did not
send for a constable to keep the peace. But they were used to these clerical
quarrels, and knew that they were as harmless as they were noisy, and that the
curates would be the best of friends tomorrow morning.
As the Gales were sitting by their kitchen fire, listening to the thump of
Malone’s fist on the parlour table, and to the consequent jingle of glasses – as
they thus sat, a foot was heard on the door-step, and the knocker rapped
sharply. Mr. Gale opened the door.
“Whom have you upstairs in the parlour?” asked a voice – a rather
remarkable voice, nasal and abrupt.
“Mr. Helstone, is it you, sir? I could hardly see you in the dusk. Will you
walk in?”
“I want to know first whether it is worth my while. Whom have you
upstairs?”
“The curates, sir.”
“What! all of them?”
“Yes, sir.”
“That will do.”
With these words entered a middle-aged man, in black. He walked across
the kitchen, opened the inner door, and stood listening to the noise above,
which was louder than ever.
“Hey!” he exclaimed; ”Have you often this sort of work?”
“They’re young, you know, sir,” said Mr. Gale deprecatingly.
“Young! They want caning. Bad boys! but I’ll–”
He passed through the inner door and mounted the stair. Making his
entrance without warning, he stood before the curates.
They were silent; they were transfixed. The invader – short of stature, but
straight and broad shouldered, with a hawk’s head, beak, and eye – folded his
arms and surveyed his young friends, if friends they were.
“What!” he began, in a voice made purposely deep and hollow. “What!
has the miracle of Pentecost been renewed? Have the cloven tongues come
down again? The sound filled the whole house just now. I heard the seventeen
languages in full action two minutes since.”
“I beg your pardon, Mr. Helstone,” began Mr. Donne; “take a seat, sir.
Have a glass of wine.”
But the falcon in the black coat went on:
“Why do I talk about the gift of tongues? Gift, indeed! It was the
confusion of tongues which has gabbled me deaf as a post!”
“I assure you, sir, we were only having a little chat together over a glass
of wine after dinner – settling the Dissenters!”
“Oh! settling the Dissenters, were you? Was Malone settling the
Dissenters? It sounded to me much more like he was settling you. Your quarrel
was making almost as much noise as Moses Barraclough, the preaching tailor,
makes in the Methodist chapel down yonder. It is your fault, Malone.”
“Mine, sir?”
“Yours, sir. Donne and Sweeting were quiet before you came. I wish you
had left your Irish habits behind you. Dublin student ways won’t do here.
Behaviour which might pass unnoticed in a wild Irish bog will, in a decent
English parish, bring disgrace on you, and, far worse, on the church you
represent.”
Mr. Helstone, standing straight as a ramrod, looked – despite his clerical
hat, coat and gaiters – more like a veteran officer chiding his subalterns than a
priest exhorting his sons in the faith. Gospel mildness seemed never to have
breathed over that keen brown face, on which firmness and sagacity had carved
their lines.
He continued, “I heard Barraclough this wet night bellowing like a bull in
the opposition shop; and I find you, gentlemen, tarrying over your half-pint of
muddy port wine, and scolding like angry old women. Barraclough, hypocrite
as he is, should not attract all the weaver-girls in their ribbons to his chapel. It’s
little wonder that you perform the holy service of our church to bare walls. But
enough of that. I came to see Malone. I have an errand for thee, O captain!”
“What is it?” inquired Malone discontentedly. “There can be no funeral to
take at this time of day.”
“Have you any weapons about you?”
“I have the pistols you gave me. I never part with them. I lay them by my
bedside at night. And I have my shillelagh – my blackthorn club.”
“Very good. Will you go to Hollow’s Mill?”
“What is stirring at Hollow’s Mill?”
“Nothing as yet, nor perhaps will be; but Moore is alone there. He has
sent all the workmen he can trust to Stilbro’; there are only two women left in
the place. It would be a nice opportunity for any of his well-wishers to pay him
a visit.”
“I am none of his well-wishers, sir. I don’t care for him.”
“So! Malone, you are afraid.”
“You know me better than that. If I really thought there was a chance of a
row I would go: but Moore is a strange man, whom I never pretend to
understand; and for the sake of his company I would not stir a step.”
“But there is a chance of a row,” said Mr. Helstone. “Even if a positive
riot does not take place, it is unlikely this night will pass tranquilly. You know
Moore has resolved to have new machinery in his mill, and he expects two
wagon-loads of frames and shears from Stilbro’ this evening. Scott, the
overlooker, and a few other men are gone to fetch them.”
“They will bring them in safely enough, sir.”
“Moore says so, and affirms he wants nobody. Some one, however, he
must have, in case anything should happen. I call him very careless. He sits in
the counting-house with the shutters open; he goes out after dark, wanders right
up the hollow, and down Fieldhead Lane, just as if he were the darling of the
neighbourhood, rather than its detestation. He takes no warning from the fates
of the mill-owners Pearson and Armitage – both shot, one in his own house and
the other on the moor.”
“But he would take warning, sir,” interposed Mr. Sweeting, “if he heard
what I heard the other day.”
“What did you hear, Davy?”
“You know Mike Hartley the weaver, sir? Well, when he has been
drinking for a few weeks, he generally goes up to Nunnely vicarage to tell Mr.
Hall a piece of his mind about his sermons, and warn him that he is sitting in
outer darkness.”
“That has nothing to do with Moore.”
“He is a violent Jacobin and leveller, sir.”
“I know,” said Mr. Helstone. “When he is very drunk, his mind is always
running on regicide.”
“Mr. Hall thinks that Mike has no personal hatred of Moore, but that he
wants Moore to be made an example of. Is Mike Hartley in his right mind, do
you think, sir?” inquired Sweeting.
“Can’t tell, Davy. He may be crazed, or only crafty, or perhaps both.”
“He talks of seeing visions, sir.”
“Ay! He is a very Daniel for visions. He came last Friday night to
describe one that had been revealed to him in Nunnely Park that afternoon.”
“Tell it, sir. What was it?” urged Sweeting.
“Davy, thou shalt hear. Mike is out of work, like many others,
unfortunately. Sir Philip Nunnely’s steward gave him a job about the priory.
Mike said he was busy hedging late in the afternoon, when he heard a band at a
distance – bugles, fifes, and a trumpet. He looked up and amongst the trees he
saw moving objects, red and white. The wood was full of them; they poured out
and filled the park. He perceived they were soldiers – tens of thousands; but
silent as they marched, regiment after regiment, across the park. He followed
them to Nunnely Common; the music still played soft and distant. They were in
sight half an hour; then they marched away. The whole time he heard neither
voice nor footsteps – nothing but the faint music playing a march.”
“Where did they go, sir?”
“Towards Briarfield. Mike followed them, but a column of smoke rolled
over the fields, he said, and when it cleared away the soldiers had vanished.
Mike decided the vision meant bloodshed and conflict.”
“Do you believe it, sir?” asked Sweeting.
“Do you, Davy? – but come, Malone; why are you not off?”
“I am rather surprised, sir, you did not stay with Moore yourself. You like
this kind of thing.”
“So I should have done,” said Mr. Helstone, “if I had not invited Boultby
to sup with me. I promised to send you as my substitute; though Moore did not
thank me. He would much rather have had me than you, Peter. Should there be
any real need of help I shall join you. The mill-bell will give warning.
Meantime, go – unless Davy Sweeting or Joseph Donne prefers going. – What
do you say, gentlemen?”
“I never touch weapons,” said Mr. Donne.
“No, no, Mr. Helstone. My mother wouldn’t like it,” pleaded Sweeting.
Helstone smiled sardonically; Malone laughed a horse-laugh. He took his
pistols, hat and cudgel, and saying that “he never felt more in tune for a shindy
in his life,” he left, making the house shake with the bang of the front door
behind him.
 ↑

Chapter 2

THE WAGONS


The evening was pitch dark: star and moon were quenched in black rainclouds. Malone was not an observer of nature; he could walk miles and never
notice when a sunbeam kissed the hill-tops, or when a shower wept over them.
He did not, therefore, observe the black vault of the sky, with the furnaces of
Stilbro’ ironworks throwing a lurid shimmer on the eastern horizon. He just
tramped doggedly along the causeway, splashing through the mire-filled cart
ruts. He looked only for certain landmarks – the spire of Briarfield Church, and
the lights of Redhouse Inn.
When he reached the inn, the glow of a fire through a half-curtained
window, a vision of glasses on a round table, and of revellers on an oak settle,
nearly drew the curate from his course. He thought longingly of whisky-andwater; but the company in the inn were Mr. Helstone’s parishioners; they all
knew him. He sighed, and passed on.
He now left the high road to take a short cut to Hollow’s Mill across level
fields, jumping hedge and wall. He passed only one building here; large and
hall-like, though irregular. You could see a high gable, then a long front, and a
lofty stack of chimneys. It was dark; not a candle shone from any window. It
was absolutely still. The rain and the low whistle of the wind were the sole
sounds in its neighbourhood.
Beyond this building, the fields descended rapidly. You could hear the
water run in a vale below: one light glimmered in the depth. Malone steered
towards it.
He came to a little white house – white even through this dense darkness
– and knocked at the door. A servant opened it. By her candle he saw a passage,
leading to two doors and a narrow stair with a strip of crimson carpet. The little
interior looked clean and fresh.
“Is Mr. Moore in?”
“No, sir, he is at the mill – in the counting-house.”
Here one of the doors opened.
“Are the wagons come, Sarah?” asked a female voice, and a female head
appeared. It might not be the head of a goddess – indeed, screws of curl-paper
quite forbade that idea – but neither was it the head of a Gorgon, as Malone
seemed to think. He shrank bashfully back into the rain, and saying, “I’ll go to
him,” hurried down a short lane towards a huge black mill.
The work-hours were over; the “hands”, or workers, were gone. The
machinery was at rest, the mill shut up. Malone walked round it. Somewhere in
its great sooty flank he found a chink of light; he knocked at another door, using
his shillelagh to beat a rousing tattoo. A key turned.
“Is it Joe Scott? What news of the wagons, Joe?”
“No; it’s myself. Mr. Helstone sent me.”
“Oh! Mr. Malone.” The voice had the slightest possible tone of
disappointment. After a moment’s pause it continued, politely but formally:
“I beg you will come in, Mr. Malone. I regret Mr. Helstone should have
troubled you. There was no need – I told him so.”
Malone followed the speaker into a light room – very bright indeed it
seemed, after the darkness; but except for its excellent fire, and an elegant lamp
on a table, it was a very plain place. The boarded floor was carpetless; the stiffbacked chairs might have come from some farm-house. The only other
furnishings were a desk, the table, and some framed plans for buildings and
machinery.
Malone hung up his wet coat and hat, drew one of the rheumatic-looking
chairs to the hearth, and set his knees almost against the grate.
“Comfortable quarters you have here, Mr. Moore; all snug to yourself.”
“Yes, but my sister would be glad to see you, if you would prefer
stepping into the house.”
“Oh, no! I never was a lady’s man, not like my friend Sweeting.”
“Sweeting! Which one is that?” asked Moore. “The one with the
chocolate overcoat, or the little gentleman?”
“The little one – the cavalier of the Misses Sykes, with the whole six of
whom he is in love, ha! ha!”
“Better be in love with all than specially with one, I should think, in that
family.”
“But he is specially in love with one – which one do you think?”
With a quiet smile Mr. Moore replied, “Dora, of course.”
“You are right; Dora it is. But he has no chance, has he, Moore?”
“What has Mr. Sweeting besides his curacy?”
This question seemed to tickle Malone amazingly. He laughed for full
three minutes before he answered it.
“What has Sweeting? Why, David has his harp, or rather, his flute. He has
a watch, ring, and eyeglass. That’s what he has.”
“How would he propose to keep Miss Sykes in gowns?”
“Ha! ha! Excellent! I’ll ask him that next time I see him. But old
Christopher Sykes is rich, is he not?”
“Sykes has an extensive business. But he would be about as likely to take
money from the business to give dowries to his daughters as I should be to pull
down the cottage there, and build a house as large as Fieldhead.”
“Do you know what I heard, Moore, the other day? That you were going
to rent Fieldhead (I thought it looked dismal tonight, as I passed it), and that
you intended to settle a Miss Sykes there as your wife, ha! ha! Now, which is
it?”
“I wonder how often it has been settled that I was to be married since I
came to Briarfield. They have assigned me every single woman in the district
by turns. First it was the two Misses Wynne; then Miss Armitage; then Ann
Pearson. At present you throw on my shoulders all the tribe of the Misses Sykes
– why, God knows. I visit nowhere; I do not seek female company. If ever I go
to Whinbury, it is only to call on Sykes or Pearson in their counting-houses,
where we discuss not courtship, but the cloth we can’t sell, the hands we can’t
employ, and the mills we can’t run.”
“I go along with you completely, Moore. If there is one notion I hate, it is
that of a sentimental marriage – two beggarly fools agreeing to unite their
poverty by some fantastic tie of feeling. Humbug! But an advantageous
connection is not so bad – eh?”
“No,” responded Moore absently. The subject seemed to have no interest
for him. After gazing at the fire with a preoccupied air, he suddenly turned his
head.
“Hark!” said he. “Did you hear wheels?”
He went to open the window, and listened. “It is only the wind rising, and
the stream rushing. I expected those wagons at six; it is near nine now.”
“Seriously, do you suppose that putting in this new machinery will bring
you into danger?” inquired Malone. “Helstone seems to think it will.”
“I only wish the machines – the frames – were safe here, within the walls
of this mill. Once in place, I defy the frame-breakers. My mill is my castle.”
“One despises such low scoundrels,” observed Malone. “I almost wish
some would call upon you tonight; but the road seemed extremely quiet. I saw
nothing astir.”
“You came by the Redhouse?”
“Yes.”
“There would be nothing on that road. It is in the direction of Stilbro’ the
risk lies.”
“And you think there is risk?”
“What these fellows have done to others they may do to me. But most of
the manufacturers seem paralysed when they are attacked. Sykes, for instance,
when his place was burned to the ground, took no steps to discover or punish
the miscreants: he gave up as tamely as a rabbit to a ferret. Now I should stand
by my trade, my mill, and my machinery.”
“You are rich, Moore?”
“I am very rich in cloth I cannot sell. My warehouse is piled to the roof,
since the Orders in Council cut off the American market. And to think that
these ridiculous gossips will keep pestering one about being married! As if
there was nothing to be done in life but to court some young lady, and go
visiting. Oh, que le diable emporte!” He broke off and added, more calmly, “I
believe women think only of these things, and they naturally fancy men’s minds
similarly occupied.”
“Of course,” assented Malone; “but never mind them.” He looked
impatiently round, as if something was lacking.
“Mr. Malone,” said Moore, “you must require refreshment after your wet
walk.”
“Not at all,” rejoined Malone; but he looked as if the right nail was hit on
the head, nevertheless. Moore opened a cupboard.
“I keep food and drink here, for I often spend the evening here alone, and
sleep in the mill. Sometimes I am my own watchman. I require little sleep, and
it pleases me on a fine night to wander for an hour or two with my musket
about the hollow. Mr. Malone, can you cook a mutton chop?”
“Try me.”
“There’s a dishful, then, and there’s the gridiron. Turn them quickly.”
“Never fear. Hand me a knife and fork, please.”
The curate turned up his coat-cuffs, and applied himself to the cookery
with vigour. On the table Moore placed plates, a loaf of bread, a black bottle,
and two tumblers. He filled a small copper kettle from a large stone jar in a
corner, set it on the fire beside the hissing gridiron, got lemons, sugar, and a
small china punch-bowl; but while he was brewing the punch a tap at the door
called him away.
“Is it you, Sarah?”
“Yes, sir. Will you come to supper, please, sir?”
“No; I shall sleep in the mill. So lock the doors, and tell your mistress to
go to bed.”
“You have your household in proper order,” observed Malone
approvingly, as he turned the mutton chops. “You are not under petticoat
government, like poor Sweeting. Now you and I, Moore – there’s a fine chop
for you, full of gravy – you and I will have no grey mares in our stables when
we marry.”
“I never think about it. If the grey mare is handsome and tractable, why
not?”
“The chops are done. Is the punch brewed?”
“There is a glassful. When Joe Scott and his assistants return they shall
have a share, provided they bring the frames intact.”
Malone waxed very exultant over the supper. He laughed at trifles, made
bad jokes and applauded them himself, and, in short, grew unmeaningly noisy.
His host, on the contrary, remained quiet as before. I shall try to sketch him as
he sits at table.
You would probably call him, at first view, a strange-looking man; for he
is thin, dark, and foreign-looking, with shadowy hair carelessly streaking his
forehead. He seems unconscious that his features are fine, clear and regular; but
they hold an anxious expression and have a somewhat haggard appearance. His
eyes are large, and grave, and grey; they are searching and thoughtful rather
than genial. When he smiles, his face is agreeable – not that it is frank or
cheerful even then, but it suggests a considerate nature, patient and forbearing.
He is not more than thirty; his figure is tall and slender. He has an outlandish
accent, which grates on a British, and especially on a Yorkshire, ear.
Mr. Moore, indeed, was scarcely half a Briton. He came of foreign
ancestry by the mother’s side, and had grown up on foreign soil. He cared little
for patriotism; he did not attach himself to political parties, to sects, or even to
customs. He had a tendency to withdraw from any community he happened to
be living in, and considered the interests of Robert Gérard Moore to be more
relevant to him than any general philanthropy.
Trade was Mr. Moore’s calling: the Gérards of Antwerp had been
merchants for two centuries back. Once they had been wealthy, but the
uncertainties of business had loosened the foundations of their credit. The house
had stood on a tottering base for a dozen years; and at last, in the shock of the
French Revolution, it had fallen, a total ruin. In its fall was involved the
Yorkshire firm of Moore, closely connected with the Antwerp house: one of the
Antwerp partners, Robert Moore, had married Hortense Gérard, who was to
inherit her father’s share in the business. She inherited only debts – which her
son Robert accepted, in his turn, as a legacy, saying that one day he would
discharge them, and rebuild the fallen house of Gérard and Moore.
If, however, he had a great aim of restoration, he had no money to attain
it. When he came to Yorkshire, he – whose ancestors had owned warehouses
and factories, a town-house and a country-seat – saw no way open to him but to
rent a cloth-mill in an out-of-the-way district; and to take an adjoining cottage
to live in, along with a few acres of the steep, rugged land that lined the hollow
through which his mill-stream brawled. All this he held at a somewhat high rent
(for times were hard, and everything was dear) from the Fieldhead estate.
At the time this history commences, Robert Moore had lived two years in
the district. The dingy cottage had been converted into a neat, tasteful
residence: part of the rough land had been made into a garden, which he
cultivated with singular care. As to the mill, which was an old structure, and
fitted up with old machinery, inefficient and out of date, he had from the first
held its arrangements in contempt. He aimed for a radical reform, which he had
carried out as fast as his limited funds would allow; and the shortage of those
funds, and of progress, was a restraint which galled him sorely. Moore ever
wanted to push on.
Not being a native, he did not sufficiently care when the new inventions
threw the old workpeople out of employ. He never asked himself where the
jobless found daily bread; and in this negligence he only resembled thousands
of others.
The period of which I write was an overshadowed one in British history.
War with Napoleon was at its height: all Europe was involved. England was
worn with long resistance, and her weary people cried out for peace on any
terms. National honour was become a mere empty name, of no value in the eyes
of many, because their sight was dim with famine; and for a morsel of meat
they would have sold their birthright.
The “Orders in Council,” forbidding neutral powers to trade with France,
had offended America, the principal market of the Yorkshire woollen trade, and
brought it consequently to the verge of ruin. Minor foreign markets were
glutted, and would receive no more wool.
At this crisis, inventions in machinery were introduced into the northern
factories, which, greatly reducing the number of hands needed, threw thousands
out of work, and left them penniless. A bad harvest supervened. Distress
reached its climax. The throes of a sort of moral earthquake were felt heaving
under the hills of the northern counties.
But, as is usual in such cases, nobody took much notice. When a food-riot
broke out, when a mill was burnt down, or a manufacturer’s house was
attacked, and the family forced to flee, few measures were taken. A ringleader
was detected, or more frequently escaped detection; newspaper paragraphs were
written, and there the thing stopped.
As to the sufferers, who could not get work, and consequently could not
buy food – they were left to suffer on. It would not do to stop the progress of
invention. There was no help; so the unemployed ate the bread and drank the
waters of affliction.
Misery generates hate. These sufferers hated the machines; they hated the
buildings which contained those machines; they hated the manufacturers who
owned those buildings. In the parish of Briarfield, Hollow’s Mill was the place
held most abominable; Gérard Moore, as a semi-foreigner and progressive millowner, was the man most abominated.
And it perhaps rather agreed with Moore’s temperament to be hated,
especially when he believed the thing for which he was hated to be right. It was
with a sense of warlike excitement that he sat in his counting-house on this
night, awaiting the arrival of his frame-laden wagons. Malone’s presence was
unwelcome to him. He would have preferred sitting alone, with his musket for
company.
For some ten minutes, Moore had been watching the Irish curate make
free with the punch, when suddenly his steady grey eye changed. He raised his
hand.
“Chut!” he said in his French fashion. He listened a moment, then rose
and went out.
The night was still, dark, and stagnant: the water rushed on full and fast,
sounding like a flood in the silence. Moore’s ear, however, caught another
sound, very distant, broken and rugged – a sound of heavy wheels crunching a
stony road. He lit a lantern, walked down the mill-yard, and opened the gates.
The wagons were coming; the dray-horses’ huge hoofs were heard splashing in
the mud and water. Moore hailed them.
“Hey, Joe Scott! Is all right?”
Probably Joe Scott was still too distant to hear. He did not answer.
“Is all right, I say?” again asked Moore.
Some one jumped out from the first wagon into the road; a voice cried
aloud, “Ay, ay, divil; all’s raight! We’ve smashed ’em.”
And there was a run. The wagons stood deserted.
“Joe Scott!” No Joe Scott answered. “Murgatroyd! Sykes!” No reply. Mr.
Moore lifted his lantern and looked into the vehicles. They held neither man nor
machinery; they were empty and abandoned.
Now Mr. Moore loved his machinery. He had risked the last of his money
on the purchase of these frames. Where were they?
The words “we’ve smashed ’em” rang in his ears. His features relaxed
into a singular smile – the smile a determined man wears when his spirit feels a
demand on its strength, which it must bear or break. Yet he remained silent, and
motionless; for he knew not what to say nor do. He placed the lantern on the
ground, and stood with his arms folded, reflecting.
An impatient trampling of one of the horses made him look up. His eye
caught the gleam of something white attached to the harness. This proved to be
a folded note. It read:
“To the Divil of Hollow’s Miln.
“Your hellish machinery is shivered to smash on Stilbro’ Moor, and your
men are lying bound hand and foot in a ditch by the roadside. Take this as a
warning from men that are starving, and have starving wives and children. If
you get new machines, you shall hear from us again. Beware!”
“Hear from you again? Yes, I’ll hear from you again, and you shall hear
from me. On Stilbro’ Moor you shall hear from me in a moment.”
Having led the wagons within the gates, he hastened towards the cottage.
Opening the door, he spoke a few words quickly but quietly to the two females
who ran to meet him in the passage. He calmed the alarm of one; to the other,
the maid-servant, he said,
“Go into the mill, Sarah, and ring the mill-bell as loud as you can. Then
get another lantern and help me to light up the front.”
Returning to his horses, he unharnessed and stabled them with speed and
care. Presently the mill-bell clanged out, with an irregular but loud and
alarming din.
On that still night, it was heard a long way away. The guests in the
Redhouse Inn were startled by the clamour, and declaring that “there must be
summat to do at Hollow’s Miln,” they called for lanterns, and hurried there.
Scarcely had they thronged into the yard, when the tramp of horses was heard,
and a little man in a shovel hat, sitting erect on a shaggy pony, rode in, followed
by another rider on a larger steed.
Mr. Moore, meantime, had saddled his own horse, and had lit up his mill,
whose long front was now illuminated. A deep hum of voices was heard. Mr.
Malone had at last emerged from the counting-house, and stood with his
shillelagh grasped in his fist. Mr. Moore appeared, and was immediately
confronted by Mr. Helstone of the shovel hat and shaggy pony.
“Well, Moore, what is your business with us? I thought you would want
us tonight – me and Tom here. When I heard your mill-bell I could sit still no
longer, so I left Boultby to finish his supper alone. But where is the enemy?
There is not a pane of glass broken in your windows. Have you had an attack,
or do you expect one?”
“I have neither had one nor expect one,” answered Moore coolly. “I only
ordered the bell to be rung because I want two or three neighbours to stay here
in the Hollow while I and a few others go over to Stilbro’ Moor.”
“To Stilbro’ Moor! What to do? To meet the wagons?”
“The wagons are come home an hour ago.”
“Then all’s right.”
“They came home empty; and Joe Scott and company are left on the
moor, and so are the frames. Read that scrawl.”
Mr. Helstone read the note.
“Hum! Poor fellows in the ditch. This is a wet night for such a bed. Tom
and I will go with you. Malone may stay behind and take care of the mill. What
is the matter with him? His eyes seem starting out of his head.”
“He has been eating a mutton chop.”
“Indeed! – Peter Augustus Malone, be on your guard. Eat no more mutton
chops tonight. You are left in command of these premises!”
“Is anybody to stay with me?”
“As many of those present as choose. – My lads, how many of you will
remain here, and how many will go with me and Mr. Moore on the Stilbro’
road, to meet some men who have been assaulted by frame-breakers?”
Three volunteered to go; the rest preferred staying behind. As Mr. Moore
mounted his horse, the rector asked him in a low voice whether he had locked
up the mutton chops, so that Peter Augustus could not get at them? Moore
nodded, and the rescue-party set out.
↑

Chapter 3

MR. YORKE


Messrs. Helstone and Moore trotted forth from the mill-yard gates, at the
head of their small company, in the best possible spirits. The lantern showed a
lively spark dancing in Moore’s eyes; while the rector’s face was shining with
glee. If any the crew who had been at work on Stilbro’ Moor had seen them,
they would have had great pleasure in shooting either of them from behind a
wall. The leaders knew this; and being men of steely nerves and steady hearts,
were elated with the knowledge.
I am aware, reader, that it is a dreadful thing for a parson to be warlike; I
am aware that he should be a man of peace: yet I cannot lift up my eyes and
hands in horror to denounce the diabolical rector of Briarfield.
He was not diabolical at all. He had simply missed his vocation. He
should have been a soldier, and circumstances had made him a priest. He was a
conscientious, hard-headed, brave, stern, implacable, faithful little man; almost
without sympathy, prejudiced, and rigid, but a man true to principle, intelligent,
and sincere. I will not curse Helstone, clerical Cossack as he was.
You would expect that Helstone and Moore, as they rode side by side in
the same cause, would converse amicably. Oh no! These two hard-natured men
always chafed each other. They argued frequently about the war. Helstone was
a high Tory, and Moore was a bitter Whig – a Whig, at least, in opposing the
war-party: that was the question which affected his business, and only on that
question did he hold any political views at all. He liked to infuriate Helstone by
declaring that Bonaparte was invincible, and by coolly suggesting that Britain
might as well yield to him, since he must in the end crush every enemy, and
reign supreme.
Helstone could not bear these opinions. It was only because Moore was a
sort of half-British alien that he could listen to them without indulging his wish
to cane the speaker. Another thing, too, allayed his disgust – a fellow-feeling
and respect for Moore’s stubbornness.
As the party turned into the Stilbro’ road, the rain dashed in their faces.
Moore, braced up by the raw breeze and sharp drizzle, began to goad his
companion.
“Does your Peninsular news please you still?” he asked. “Have you still
faith in that false god of a Lord Wellington?”
“What do you mean?”
“Do you still believe that this wooden-faced, pebble-hearted idol has
power to send fire down from heaven to consume the French?”
“I believe Wellington will flog Bonaparte’s marshals into the sea
whenever he likes.”
“My dear sir, you can’t be serious. Bonaparte’s marshals are great men,
under the guidance of a master-spirit. Your Wellington is the most
commonplace of leaders, whose slow movements are further cramped by an
ignorant government.”
“Wellington is the soul of England. He is the right champion of a
powerful, resolute, and honest nation.”
“He is a dull-witted drover, acting for a duller-witted farmer; and arrayed
against him is an invincible genius.”
“A usurper. Against righteous, brave resistance is arrayed boastful,
selfish, and treacherous ambition. God defend the right!” said Mr. Helstone.
“God often defends the powerful.”
“What! was the handful of Israelites standing beside the Red Sea more
powerful than the host of Egyptians drawn up on the other side? Were they
more numerous and mighty, eh? They were a poor band, with few better
weapons than shepherds’ crooks. But right was with them, Robert Moore; the
God of battles was on their side. ‘The Lord saved Israel that day, and left the
Egyptians dead upon the sea-shore.’ The hand of the Lord dashed the enemy in
pieces!”
“You are right; only you forget the true parallel. France is Israel, and
Napoleon is Moses. Europe, with her old overgorged empires and rotten
dynasties, is corrupt Egypt.”
“I scorn to answer you.”
Moore accordingly answered himself. At least, he added in a lower voice:
“It puzzles me how Napoleon should have condescended to become an
emperor, a vulgar humbug; and still more how a people who had once called
themselves republicans should have sunk again to the level of mere slaves. I
despise France! I can think what I please, Mr. Helstone, both about France and
England; and about revolutions, and regicides, and–”
His sentence was cut short by the rapid rolling up of a gig that stopped in
the middle of the road.
“Nah, maister; did th’ wagons hit home?” demanded a voice.
“Is that Joe Scott?”
“Ay, ay!” returned another voice; for the gig contained two people. “Ay,
Mr. Moore, it’s Joe Scott. I’m bringing him back to you in a bonny pickle. I
fand him on the top of the moor yonder, him and three others. What will you
give me for restoring him to you?”
“Why, my thanks. That is you, I suppose, Mr. Yorke, by your voice?”
“Ay, lad, it’s me. I was coming home from Stilbro’ market, and just as I
got to the middle of the moor, I heard a groan. Some would have whipt on
faster; but I pulled up and said, ‘Is there aught wrong anywhere?’ ‘‘Deed is
there,’ somebody says, speaking out of the ground, like. ‘Nobbut four on us
ligging in a ditch.’ I bid them get up and move on, for I’d a notion they were all
drunk. ‘We’d ha’ done that an hour sin’, but we’re tied,’ says Joe. So I got
down and loosed ’em wi’ my penknife; and he rode wi’ me, and t’ others are
coming as fast as their feet will bring them.”
“I am greatly obliged to you, Mr. Yorke.”
“Are you, my lad? You know you’re not. However, here are the rest now.
We’re eleven strong men, and if we could only meet some of these starved
ragamuffins of frame-breakers we’d win a grand victory. We could every one
be a Wellington – that would please ye, Mr. Helstone – and sich paragraphs as
we could contrive for t’ papers! We’ll hev a column and a half i’ th’ Stilbro’
Courier ower this job, as it is, I dare say. I’d expect no less.”
“And I’ll promise you no less, Mr. Yorke, for I’ll write the article
myself,” returned the rector.
“To be sure! And mind ye recommend that them as broke t’ frames, and
tied Joe Scott up, should be hung. No doubt o’ that.”
“I’d give them short shrift!” cried Moore. “But I mean to let them alone
this time, to give them rope enough to hang themselves.”
“Well, we’ll say no more on the subject at present,” said Mr. Yorke.
“Here we are at my door, gentlemen, and I hope you and the men will step in
for a little refreshment.”
Moore and Helstone at first declined. It was, however, pressed on them so
courteously, and the night, besides, was so inclement, and the house looked so
inviting, that at last they yielded. Mr. Yorke led the way in.
It will have been remarked that Mr. Yorke varied a little in his speech,
alternating between broad Yorkshire and very pure English. His manner was
equally variable. He could be polite and affable, and he could be blunt and
rough.
He sent the workmen round by the kitchen, saying that he would see them
served presently. The gentlemen were ushered in at the front entrance, and
found themselves in a hall lined with pictures. Through this they were
conducted to a large, cheerful parlour, with a magnificent fire in the grate.
There was no splendour, but there was unusual taste – the taste, you would have
said, of a travelled man, and a scholar. A series of Italian views of high quality
decked the walls. The subjects were all pastoral, the scenes all sunny. There
was a guitar and some music on a sofa; there were cameos, beautiful
miniatures; a set of Grecian-looking vases on the mantelpiece; and books
arranged in two elegant bookcases.
Mr. Yorke rang for wine, and gave orders to the servant for the
refreshment of the men in the kitchen. The rector remained standing; he would
not touch any wine.
“E’en as you will,” remarked Mr. Yorke. “I reckon you’ll not eat nor
drink under my roof, Mr. Helstone, lest we should be forced to be friends; but I
am not so particular. You might sup the contents of that decanter, and I’d still
feel free to oppose you at every vestry-meeting.”
“It is just what I should expect of you, Mr. Yorke.”
Mr. Yorke addressed Moore, who had thrown himself into an oldfashioned chair by the fireside. “Get up, my lad! That place is mine. Take the
sofa, if you will.”
“Why are you so particular to that chair, Mr. Yorke?” asked Moore, lazily
vacating it.
“My father were afore me, and that’s all t’ answer I shall gie thee; and it’s
as good a reason as Mr. Helstone can give for his notions.”
“Moore, are you ready to go?” inquired the rector.
“Nay; Robert’s not ready, or rather, I’m not ready to part wi’ him. He’s an
ill lad, and wants correcting.”
“Why, sir?” asked Moore. “What have I done?”
“Made thyself enemies on every hand.”
“What do I care for that? What difference does it make to me whether
your Yorkshire louts hate me or like me?”
“Ay, there it is. The lad is an alien among us. His father would never have
talked i’ that way. Go back to Antwerp, mauvaise tête!”
“Mauvaise tête vous-même; blockhead yourself,” retorted Moore,
continuing in the French tongue, “I’m only doing my duty; I don’t care about
your peasant thugs!”
“On the contrary, my boy, the peasant thugs will laugh at you,” replied
Yorke in perfect French.
“C’est bon! It’s all the same to me. Monsieur Yorke, let us talk no more
of it.”
“As you wish.” And Mr. Yorke held his peace. While he sits leaning back
in his carved oak chair, I will sketch the portrait of this Yorkshire gentleman.
↑

Chapter 4

MR. YORKE (continued)


A Yorkshire gentleman he was in every point; about fifty-five years old,
but looking older, for his hair was silver white. His forehead was broad; his face
fresh and hale; the harshness of the north was seen in his features, and heard in
his voice; every trait was thoroughly English – an inelegant, unaristocratic face.
It held pith, intelligence and originality in every furrow; but it was scornful and
sarcastic – the face of a man difficult to lead, and impossible to drive.
If you expect Mr. Yorke to be a benevolent, philanthropic old gentleman,
reader, you are mistaken. He has spoken with some sense and good feeling to
Mr. Moore, but you are not therefore to conclude that he always spoke and
thought justly and kindly.
Mr. Yorke lacked the ability to venerate; and he lacked the ability to
compare – and hence to feel sympathy. He had too little benevolence and
softness in his nature, and he did not value those divine qualities.
He was intolerant to those above him. Kings and priests, dynasties and
parliaments, were to him an abomination. He found no use or pleasure in them.
His lack of veneration, too, dried up a thousand pure sources of enjoyment. He
was not irreligious – he believed in God and heaven; but his God and heaven
were those of a man without awe, imagination, or tenderness.
While he claimed to be tolerant, he was bigoted. He spoke of “parsons”
and “lords” with unjust harshness and insolence. He could not place himself in
the position of those he reviled; he could not allow for their temptations or
disadvantages; he could not imagine how he would behave in a similar
situation, and he would often express the most ferocious wishes regarding those
who he thought had acted ferociously. Mr. Yorke talked about equality, but at
heart he was a proud man – very friendly to his workpeople, good to those
beneath him, but haughty as Beelzebub to anyone the world judged his superior.
Revolt was in his blood: he could not bear control; his father and grandfather
before him could not bear it, nor his children after him.
His lack of benevolence made him very impatient of others’ faults; it left
no check to his cutting sarcasm. He would sometimes wound and wound again,
without noticing how much he hurt, or caring how deep he thrust.
He had no imagination; but his fine ear for music, and correct eye for
colour and form, left him the quality of taste; and who cares for imagination?
Who does not think it a rather dangerous, senseless attribute – a disease of the
mind rather than a gift?
Probably all think it so but those who possess imagination, or fancy they
possess it. To hear them speak, you would believe that their hearts would be
cold and their eyes dim without that flame, that they would be lonely if this
strange companion abandoned them. You would suppose that it gave some glad
hope to spring, some fine charm to summer, some tranquil joy to autumn, some
consolation to winter, which you do not feel. An illusion, of course; but the
fanatics cling to their dream.
As Mr. Yorke did not possess poetic imagination himself, he considered it
superfluous in others. Painters and musicians he could tolerate, because he
could see the charm of a fine picture, and feel the pleasure of good music; but
he would have despised a poet.
I have told you some of his faults, reader: yet he was one of the most
honourable and capable men in Yorkshire. He was much beloved by the poor,
because he was kind and fatherly to them. To his workmen he was considerate
and cordial. When he dismissed them from an occupation, he would try to find
them other work, or help them to move to a district where work might be found.
It must also be remarked that if any of his workmen showed signs of
insubordination, Yorke knew how to crush rebellion at the outset, so that it
never spread. He spoke severely of those who did not do the same, saying that
any difficulties they had were entirely their own fault, and sometimes taking the
workmen’s side.
Mr. Yorke’s family was the oldest and most respected in the district; and
he was one of the most influential men. His education had been good. In his
youth, he had travelled on the Continent, and spoke French and Italian; he had
collected many good paintings and tasteful rarities. His manners, when he liked,
were those of an old-fashioned gentleman; his conversation, when he wished to
please, was singularly interesting; and if he usually expressed himself in the
Yorkshire dialect, it was because he chose to do so.
Mr. Yorke knew every one for miles round; yet his close friends were
very few. He preferred racy, original characters to refined, insipid ones, no
matter how exalted they might be. He would spend an hour talking with a
shrewd workman, or with some wise old woman amongst his cottagers, yet
would not spend a moment on a commonplace fine gentleman or fashionable
lady. He forgot that there may be amiable and admirable characters amongst
those who cannot be original.
He was cordial with Mr. Moore for several reasons. Firstly, Moore spoke
French with a pure accent; and his un-British looks had pleasant associations
for Mr. Yorke – they brought back his youthful travelling days in Italy and
Paris.
Secondly, he had known Moore’s father, and had had business dealings
with him. That tie was more substantial, though by no means more agreeable;
for his firm had also been implicated in Moore’s losses.
Thirdly, he had found Robert himself a sharp man of business. He
respected his resolution and acuteness – perhaps also his hardness. A fourth
circumstance which drew them together was that Mr. Yorke was one of the
guardians of the landowner, not yet twenty-one, on whose estate Hollow’s Mill
was situated; so Moore frequently had to consult him.
As to Mr. Helstone – between him and Mr. Yorke there was antipathy.
Their natures were opposite, and it was said that they had once been rival
suitors of the same lady.
Mr. Yorke, when young, preferred sprightly and dashing women. A
showy air, a lively wit, a ready tongue attracted him. He never, however,
proposed to any of these brilliant belles; instead he fell seriously in love with a
girl who presented a complete contrast to them – a girl with the face of a
Madonna; a girl of living marble – stillness personified. No matter that she
never responded to his opinions, rarely smiled at his jests, and paid him no
attention. No matter that she seemed the opposite of every woman he had
previously admired. For him Mary Cave was perfect.
Mr. Helstone, at that time curate of Briarfield, loved Mary too – or at any
rate, he fancied her. He did not pretend to have Mr. Yorke’s absorbing passion
for her, nor the humble reverence of her other suitors. He saw her as she really
was. He was, consequently, more master of her and himself. She accepted him
at the first offer, and they were married.
Nature never intended Mr. Helstone to make a very good husband,
especially to a quiet wife. He thought so long as a woman was silent, nothing
could be wrong. If she did not express likes and dislikes, then she had none. He
made no pretence of comprehending women. They were a different, probably a
very inferior, order of existence to men. A wife could not be her husband’s
companion, much less his confidante. His wife, after a year or two, was of no
great importance to him; and when she one day, as he thought, suddenly – for
he had scarcely noticed her decline – took her leave of him and of life, he felt
his bereavement – who shall say how little? Yet, perhaps, more than he seemed
to feel it; for he was not a man from whom grief easily wrung tears.
His dry-eyed mourning scandalized the old housekeeper and Mrs.
Helstone’s nurse, who, perhaps, knew more of the deceased lady’s capacity for
feeling and loving than her husband did. They gossiped together over the
corpse, and worked each other up to some indignation against the austere little
man who sat in the next room going through papers.
Mrs. Helstone was hardly buried when rumours began to be rife in the
neighbourhood that she had died of a broken heart. These magnified quickly
into reports of harsh treatment by her husband – reports grossly untrue, but
eagerly heard despite that. Mr. Yorke heard them, and partly believed them.
Though himself a married man now, united to a woman who seemed a complete
contrast to Mary Cave, still he could not forget his great disappointment; and
when he heard that Mary had been neglected, perhaps abused, he felt a bitter
hatred for Mr. Helstone.
Mr. Helstone was only half aware of this. He neither knew how much
Yorke had loved Mary Cave, nor what was rumoured about his own treatment
of her. He believed political and religious differences alone separated him and
Mr. Yorke. Had he known how the case really stood, he would not have crossed
his former rival’s threshold.
Mr. Yorke did not resume his lecture of Robert Moore. Instead they
began to talk about the unquiet state of the country, and the recent attacks on
mills, although each of the three gentlemen had different views on these
subjects. Mr. Helstone thought the workpeople were unreasonable and
impatient; he thought the government should interfere, and even use military
force.
Mr. Yorke wished to know whether this interference would feed the
hungry, and give work to those who needed work. He said the public had borne
enough, and resistance was now a duty. The mill masters, he believed, had been
let down by a “corrupt, base, and bloody” government (these were his words). It
was their perseverance in a hopeless, ruinous war which had brought the nation
to its knees. It was their monstrously oppressive taxation and the infamous
“Orders in Council” that hung a millstone about England’s neck.
“But where was the use of talking?” he demanded. “What chance was
there of reason being heard in a land whose king was a lunatic, and whose
regent was a debauchee? Where such humbugs as the peerage and a bench of
bishops were venerated; and a host of lazy parsons and their families were kept
on the fat of the land?”
Mr. Helstone, rising up and putting on his shovel-hat, replied “that he had
met with two or three men who held these opinions so long as they were
healthy and wealthy; but there came a time,” he said, “to all men when they
should tremble, and their views be tested. He had been called to the miserable
death-bed of one of the church’s most rancorous foes; he had seen him stricken
with remorse, and desperate to repent. He must warn Mr. Yorke that blasphemy
against God and the king was a deadly sin, and that there was such a thing as
‘judgment to come.’”
Mr. Yorke “believed fully in the judgment to come. Otherwise, it would
be difficult to imagine how the scoundrels who broke innocent hearts, took the
bread out of the mouths of the poor, browbeat the humble, and truckled meanly
to the rich, were to be properly paid off. But,” he added, “he knew that some
folk were bound for Hell, just as well as if an angel had told him.”
“Sir,” said Mr. Helstone with dignity, “Man must know himself, and the
place whither his own steps tend.”
“Now,” interposed Mr. Moore, who had sat silent till now, “you have
both proved how cordially you detest each other. For my part, I still hate the
fellows who have broken my frames, and have no hate to spare for my
acquaintances, and still less for such a vague thing as a government. But really,
gentlemen, you both seem very bad. I dare not stay with a rebel and blasphemer
like you, Yorke; and I hardly dare ride home with a tyrannical churchman like
Mr. Helstone.”
“I am going, however, Mr. Moore,” said the rector sternly. “Come with
me or not, as you please.”
“Nay, he shall go with you,” responded Yorke. “It’s past midnight, and ye
must all go.” Leading his guests through the passage, he fairly pushed them out
of his front door.
They met their companions hurrying out by the back way. Their horses
stood at the gate; they mounted and rode off, Moore laughing, and Helstone
deeply indignant.
↑

Chapter 5

HOLLOW’S COTTAGE


Moore was still in good spirits when he rose next morning. He and Joe
Scott had spent the night in the mill, on camp-beds kept in the counting-houses.
The master was up early, and awoke his man by singing a French song as he
dressed.
“Get up, Joseph, and we’ll walk through the mill before the hands come
in, and I’ll explain my plans. We’ll have the machinery yet. You never heard of
Bruce, perhaps?”
“And the spider? Yes, I hev. Ye mean to say ye’ll persevere.”
“I do.”
“Is there many like you i’ your country?” inquired Joe, as he folded up his
bed.
“In my country! Which is my country?”
“Why, France – isn’t it?”
“No, indeed! Just because the French have seized Antwerp, where I was
born, does not make me a Frenchman.”
“Dutch, then?”
“Now you are confounding Antwerp with Amsterdam.”
“Flanders?”
“I scorn the insinuation, Joe! Have I a Flemish face, with a clumsy nose
and pale blue eyes? Am I all body and no legs? Joe, I’m an Anversois – a native
of Antwerp – though my mother came of French lineage, which is why I speak
French.”
“But your father were Yorkshire, which maks ye a bit Yorkshire too; and
onybody may see ye’re akin to us, ye’re so keen o’ making brass.”
“Joe, you’re an impudent dog.”
“We allus speak our minds i’ this country; and them young parsons and
grand folk fro’ London is shocked at it; and we like to gi’e ’em summat to be
shocked at, so we can watch ’em widen their eyes, and say, ‘Dear! dear! Whet
seveges! How very coarse!’”
“You are savages, Joe. You don’t suppose you’re civilized, do you?”
“Middling, maister. I reckon us manufacturing lads i’ th’ north is a deal
more intelligent nor th’ farming folk i’ th’ south. Trade sharpens our wits; and
mechanics like me is forced to think. When I see an effect, I look straight away
for a cause; and then I like reading.”
“You think yourself a clever fellow, Scott.”
“Ay! I’m fairish; but there’s thousands i’ Yorkshire that’s as good as me,
and a few that’s better.”
“You’re a sublime fellow; but you’re a conceited noodle too, Joe! You
need not think that because you’ve picked up a little mathematics, and the
elements of chemistry at the bottom of a dyeing vat, that therefore you’re a
neglected man of science. Virtue does not live only in workmen’s cottages.
Human nature is human nature everywhere, amongst rich or poor, and in
between. Away with you, Joe, and ring the mill bell.”
It was now the middle of February; dawn was just beginning to penetrate
the brown obscurity of night with a pale ray. No colour tinged the east, as day
slowly lifted a heavy eyelid. The morning was chill; a raw wind blew. It had
ceased to rain, but the earth was sodden, and the pools and rivulets were full.
The mill-windows were alight, the bell rung loud, and now the little
children came running in, in too great a hurry, let us hope, to feel the cold. Mr.
Moore stood at the entrance, counting them as they went by. To those who
came late he said a word of reprimand, which was a little more sharply repeated
by Joe Scott when they reached the work-rooms. Neither master nor overlooker
spoke savagely, although they fined one boy a penny for coming very late.
Though I describe imperfect characters (every character in this book will
be found to be more or less imperfect, my pen refusing to draw anything in the
model line), I do not handle utterly degraded ones. There are no child-torturers
or slave drivers here. I am happy to inform my reader that neither Mr. Moore
nor his overlooker ever struck a child in their mill.
Mr. Moore haunted his mill, his dye-house, and his warehouse till the
sickly dawn strengthened into day. The sun rose – a clear white disc, as chill as
ice. At eight o’clock the signal was given for breakfast; the children, released
for half an hour from toil, opened their little tin cans of coffee, and their small
baskets of bread.
And now at last Mr. Moore quitted the mill-yard, and went to his house. It
was only a short distance from the factory, but secluded by a hedge and high
bank on each side of the lane. It was a small, whitewashed place, with a green
porch over the door; scanty brown stalks showed in the garden soil beneath the
windows, predicting blooming creepers for summer days. Only in sheltered
nooks did the first shoots of snowdrop or crocus peep, green as emerald, from
the earth. The spring was late; the last deep snow had only just disappeared.
Three trees, not lofty, but graceful, rose beside the cottage. It was a snug nest,
but one within which the wings of action and ambition could not long lie
folded.
Instead of entering the house, Mr. Moore fetched a spade from a shed and
began to work in the garden. For about a quarter of an hour he dug, until a
window opened, and a female voice called:
“Eh, bien! Tu ne déjeûnes pas ce matin?”
His answer, and the rest of the conversation, I shall translate into English.
“Is breakfast ready, Hortense?”
“Certainly; it has been ready half an hour.”
“Then I am ready too.”
He threw down his spade, and entered the house. The narrow passage led
him to a small parlour, where a breakfast of coffee, bread and butter, and
stewed pears, was spread on the table. Over this meal presided the lady who had
spoken from the window.
She was a little older than Mr. Moore – perhaps thirty-five, tall, and stout;
she had very black hair, twisted up in curl-papers, a high colour in her cheeks,
and little black eyes. Her forehead was rather corrugated; she had a fretful
though not an ill-natured expression. The strangest point was her dress – a short
petticoat and a striped cotton camisole.
You will think she is a remarkable slattern, reader. Not at all. Hortense
Moore, Mr. Moore’s sister, was a very orderly, economical person. The
petticoat, camisole, and curl-papers were her usual morning costume: she
adhered to her old Belgian customs.
Mademoiselle had an excellent opinion of herself – an opinion not wholly
undeserved, for she possessed some good qualities; but she over-estimated her
own virtues, and quite left out her various little defects. You could never have
persuaded her that she was prejudiced and narrow-minded, with too much selfimportance, and too apt to take offence about trifles; yet all this was true.
However, she could be kind and friendly enough. To her two brothers (for
there was another besides Robert) she was very much attached. Louis, however,
she knew less well than Robert. He had been sent to an English school when a
mere boy, and had followed the arduous and modest career of a teacher. He had
taught in a school, and was said now to be tutor in a private family. Hortense
thought of him as backward and quiet. She was very proud of Robert, regarding
him as the greatest man in Europe; all he said and did was remarkable in her
eyes, and she expected others to have the same opinion.
As soon as Robert was seated at the breakfast-table, and she had helped
him to some stewed pears and a good-sized Belgian tartine, she began to pour
out a flood of amazement and horror at last night’s destruction of the frames.
“What a shameful thing to do! It’s clear that English workers are wicked
beasts, just like English servants – that Sarah, for one!”
“She looks clean and industrious,” Mr. Moore remarked.
“Looks? I do not say that she is dirty or idle, but her insolence! She
disputed with me a quarter of an hour yesterday about cooking the beef; she
said I boiled it to rags, and that my stock was no better than greasy water! Yet I
cannot part with the girl lest I should get a worse. You are in the same position
with your workmen, my poor brother!”
“I am afraid you are not very happy in England, Hortense.”
“It is my duty to be happy where you are, brother; but certainly people
here appear to me ill-bred. They consider my habits ridiculous. If a girl from
your mill chances to come into the kitchen and finds me in my camisole and
petticoat, she sneers. If I accept an invitation to tea, I am put quite into the
background; I have not that attention paid me which is my due. The Gérards are
an excellent family, and the Moores also! They have a right to claim respect. In
Antwerp I was always treated with distinction.”
“Hortense, in Antwerp we were known as rich; in England we have
always been known as poor.”
“Again, dear brother, last Sunday, because it was wet, I went to church in
my neat black sabots, footwear which one would not indeed wear in a
fashionable city, but which in the country I have always used on dirty roads.
Believe me, as I paced up the aisle, four ladies laughed and hid their faces
behind their prayer-books.”
“Well, well! don’t wear them again. I told you before they were not quite
the thing for this country. And as to the camisole and petticoat, I am not sure
about them either. I never see an English lady dressed in such garments. Ask
Caroline Helstone.”
“Caroline! I consult her about my dress? It is she who on all points should
consult me. She is a child.”
“She is eighteen – old enough to know all about gowns and petticoats.”
“Do not make Caroline of more consequence than she ought to be,
brother. At present she is modest and unassuming: let us keep her so.”
“With all my heart. Is she coming this morning?”
“At ten, as usual, for her French lesson.”
“You don’t find that she sneers at you, do you?”
“She does not. She appreciates me better than anyone else here; but then
she sees more of me. She sees that I have the education and manner of a person
well born and well bred.”
“Are you fond of her?” asked Moore.
“I have a regard for her as my relative; and she behaves very well at
lessons. But you know, brother, that my manner commands respect. Yet I
perceive clearly that Caroline is not perfect, that there is much to be desired in
her.”
“Give me a last cup of coffee, and while I am drinking it, amuse me with
an account of her faults.”
“Caroline is defective; but with my motherly care she may improve. She
has an occasional reserve, which I do not quite like, because it is not
sufficiently girlish and submissive; and there are glimpses of an unsettled hurry
in her nature, which put me out. Yet she is usually most tranquil, too dejected
and thoughtful indeed sometimes. In time, I doubt not, I shall make her
uniformly sedate.”
“I don’t understand. What do you mean by ‘unsettled hurry’?”
“For example, when I ask her to read French poetry to practice her
pronunciation. She has gone through much of Corneille and Racine, in a very
steady, sober spirit, such as I approve. Occasionally she seemed, indeed,
apathetic. The other day I gave her a book of short pieces, to learn one by heart.
I saw her turning the leaves over impatiently, and curling her lip with scorn. I
chided her. ‘Cousin,’ said she, ‘all this bores me to death. Are there not two
lines of poetry in all of French literature?’ I inquired what she meant. She
begged my pardon, and began to learn assiduously. In half an hour she stood
before me, and recited Chenier’s La Jeune Captive. If you had heard her, you
would have known what I meant by ‘unsettled hurry.’ One would have thought
Chénier was more moving than all Racine and Corneille. She has an illregulated mind; but she is fortunate in her teacher. I will give her a set of
opinions; I will guide her feelings.”
“Be sure you do, Hortense. Here she comes.”
“Ah! She is half an hour early. –My child, what brings you here before I
have breakfasted?”
This question was addressed to a young girl who now entered the room,
wrapped in a winter mantle which was gathered gracefully round a slender
figure.
“I came in haste to see how you were, Hortense, and Robert too. I was
sure you would both be grieved by what happened last night. My uncle told me
about it at breakfast. He is very angry – but he was with Robert, was he not?
Did he not go with you to Stilbro’ Moor?”
“Yes, we set out in martial style, Caroline; but the prisoners we went to
rescue met us half-way.”
“Nobody was hurt?”
“Why, no.”
“You were not with the wagons when they were attacked?”
“No.”
“Where are you going this morning?” asked Caroline. “I saw Murgatroyd
saddling your horse in the yard.”
“To Whinbury. It is market day.”
“Mr. Yorke is going too. I met him in his gig. Come home with him. Two
are better than one, and nobody dislikes Mr. Yorke.”
“Therefore he would be a protection to me, who am hated?” suggested
Moore.
“Misunderstood, not hated. What time will you return, Robert?”
“I generally return at seven.’
“Try to be back by six. By seven daylight is quite gone.”
“And what danger do you foresee for me in darkness, Caroline?”
“I am not sure, but we all feel anxious at present. My uncle calls these
times dangerous. He says, too, that mill-owners are unpopular.”
“And I am one of the most unpopular? Is not that the fact? You are
reluctant to speak out plainly, but you think I may be attacked, like Pearson –
who was shot in his own house, through the window.”
“Anne Pearson showed me the bullet,” said Caroline gravely. “You will
be back by six?”
“Certainly he will,” affirmed Hortense. “And now, my child, prepare your
lessons, while I put the peas to soak for dinner.” She left the room.
“You suspect I have many enemies, then, Caroline,” said Mr. Moore.
“Have I no friends?”
“Your sister, and your brother Louis, whom I have never seen; and Mr.
Yorke, and my uncle – besides, of course, many more.”
Robert smiled. “You would be puzzled to name your ‘many more,’” said
he. “But show me your exercise-book. What careful handwriting! My sister
wants to form you like a Flemish school-girl. What life are you destined for,
Caroline? What will you do with your French, drawing, and other
accomplishments, when they are acquired?”
“You may well say, when they are acquired; for till Hortense began to
teach me, I knew precious little. As to the life I am destined for, I cannot tell. I
suppose to keep my uncle’s house till – till events offer other occupations for
me.”
“A remarkably vague prospect! Are you content with it?”
“I used to be. But there are moments now when I am not quite satisfied. I
am earning nothing.”
“You wish to make money, Lina?”
“I do. I should like an occupation; and if I were a boy, it would not be so
difficult to find one. I can see such an easy, pleasant way of learning a business,
and making my way in life.”
“Go on. Let us hear how.”
“I could be apprenticed to your trade – the cloth-trade. I could learn it
from you. I could keep the books and write the letters, while you went to
market. I know you want to pay your father’s debts; perhaps I could help you.”
“Help me? You should think of yourself.”
“I do think of myself; but must one think only of oneself?”
“Of whom else dare I think? The poor need to have narrow sympathies.
Poverty is selfish and anxious, and sympathy must be checked by Prudence,
whose frosty breath is as nipping as any north wind. By poverty, I mean the
embarrassed penury of the man in debt.”
“Cherish hope, not anxiety,” urged Caroline. “I feel there is something
wrong in your notions of the best way of attaining happiness, as there is in – in
your manner to the Yorkshire workpeople.”
“You have often wanted to tell me that, have you not?”
“Yes; very often.”
“The faults of my manner are, I think, only negative. I am not proud. I am
only taciturn, and serious.”
“As if your workmen were machines like your frames. In your own house
you seem different.”
“I am an alien to them. And for my part I find them irrational, perverse;
they hinder me when I long to hurry forward. I don’t expect them to love me.”
 “Ah!” said Caroline, shaking her head and heaving a deep sigh.
“I suppose I am not an affectionate man, Caroline. The attachment of a
very few people is enough for me.”
“Please, Robert, will you mend my pen before you go?”
“First let me rule your book, for you always manage to draw the lines
aslant. There now. If I were a tutor like Louis I might stay and dedicate this
morning to you and your studies, whereas I must spend it in Skyes’s woolwarehouse.”
“You will be making money.”
“More likely losing it. There, my horse is ready; I must go. I’ll take a look
at the garden first.”
He went out into the garden behind the mill. A sweet fringe of snowdrop,
crocus and primrose bloomed in the sunshine under the hot wall of the factory.
Moore plucked a little bouquet of flowers, returned to the parlour, and laid them
on Caroline’s desk.
“Thank you, Robert. It is pretty; it looks like sparkles of sunshine and
blue sky. Good-morning.”
Robert went to the door, stopped as if about to speak; said nothing, and
went out. But in a second he re-entered the cottage.
“I forgot my gloves,” he said, and then asked, “You have no binding
engagement at home perhaps, Caroline?”
“I never have. Some children’s socks to knit for the Jew’s basket; but they
will keep.”
“Forget the Jew’s basket, and spend the day here for a change. Your uncle
won’t break his heart at your absence?”
She smiled. “No.”
“Then stay and dine with Hortense; she will be glad of your company.
When I return, we will have a little reading in the evening. The moon rises at
half-past eight, and I will walk up to the rectory with you at nine. Do you
agree?”
She nodded her head, and her eyes lit up.
Moore lingered for two more minutes. He bent over Caroline’s desk and
glanced at her grammar, he lifted her bouquet and played with it; his horse
stamped impatiently; his groom coughed at the gate, as if he wondered what in
the world his master was doing.
“Good-morning,” again said Moore, and finally vanished.
Hortense, coming in ten minutes after, found, to her surprise, that
Caroline had not yet begun her exercise.
↑

Chapter 6

CORIOLANUS


Mademoiselle Moore had that morning a somewhat absent-minded pupil.
Caroline forgot, again and again, the explanations which were given to her.
However, she bore her teacher’s chidings cheerfully. Sitting in the sunshine
near the window, she felt both happy and good; and looked at her best.
She was fair to look upon. Her figure was light and neat; her face was
expressive and gentle; her eyes were handsome, with a winning beam that stole
into the heart. Her mouth was very pretty; she had delicate skin, and a fine flow
of curling brown hair, arranged with taste. Her style of dress was unobtrusive
and inexpensive, but suited her fair complexion. Her present winter dress was
of merino wool – the same soft shade of brown as her hair, with a pink ribbon at
the collar. She wore no other decoration. So much for Caroline Helstone’s
appearance.
As to her family, she was the child of parents separated soon after her
birth. Her mother was the half-sister of Mr. Moore’s father; thus, though there
was no shared blood, she was, in a distant sense, the cousin of Robert, Louis,
and Hortense. Her father was Mr. Helstone’s brother, and was a man whose
character friends preferred not to recall after his death. He had made his wife
unhappy. The truthful reports about his behaviour had made more credible
those rumours which were falsely circulated about his better-principled brother.
Caroline had never known her mother, as she was taken from her in
infancy. She had not seen her since. Her father died comparatively young, and
her uncle, the rector, had for some years been her sole guardian. He was not
much suited to have the charge of a young girl. He had taken little trouble about
her education; probably he would have taken none if she had not grown anxious
about it, and asked to acquire some knowledge. Still, she had a depressing
feeling that she was inferior, with fewer attainments than those of other girls of
her age; and she was very glad of the kind offer made by her cousin Hortense to
teach her French and fine needle-work.
Mlle. Moore, for her part, delighted in the task, because it gave her
importance; she liked to lord it a little over a docile yet quick pupil. When she
found that Caroline made rapid and eager progress, she ascribed the
improvement entirely to her own superior teaching. She imagined that
everything Caroline knew, she had learned from her, even on subjects of which
she knew little herself. The idea was not logical, but Hortense had perfect faith
in it.
Mademoiselle kept her young cousin to dry studies as closely as she
could. She worked her unrelentingly at French grammar, giving her endless
“analyses logiques.” These were not pleasant to Caroline; she thought she could
have learned French just as well without them, and grudged the time spent in
pondering over “propositions, principales, et incidents;” and examining whether
the proposition was “pleine,” “elliptique,” or “implicite.”
Sometimes she lost herself in the maze, and while Hortense was busy
upstairs, would carry her book to Robert in the counting-house, and get the
rough place made smooth by his aid. Mr. Moore possessed a clear, tranquil
brain. Caroline’s little difficulties seemed to dissolve beneath his eye. In two
minutes he would explain all. Repaying him by an admiring and grateful smile,
she would leave the mill reluctantly to go back to the cottage, wishing nature
had made her a boy instead of a girl, so that she might be Robert’s clerk, and sit
with him in the counting-house.
Very occasionally she spent the evening at Hollow’s Cottage. Sometimes
during these visits Moore was away; but sometimes he was at home, and free to
talk. When this was the case, the evening hours passed on wings of light. There
was no room in England so pleasant as that small parlour when the three
cousins occupied it. Hortense, when she was not teaching, or scolding, was
good-humoured; she relaxed, and was kind to her young English kinswoman.
Sometimes Caroline would ask her to play her guitar and sing; she played with
skill, and had a well-toned voice. Her performance would have been completely
agreeable, but for her self-important manner.
Mr. Moore, released from business, was, if not lively himself, a willing
spectator of Caroline’s liveliness, agreeable and ready to respond to her
questions. Sometimes he was almost animated, quite gentle and friendly.
The drawback was that by the next morning he was sure to be frozen up
again; and however much he seemed, in his quiet way, to enjoy these social
evenings, he rarely asked for their recurrence. This puzzled his inexperienced
cousin.
“If I had a means of happiness at my command,” she thought, “I would
employ it often, and not let it lie for weeks aside.”
Yet she was careful not to visit unasked, much though she enjoyed her
evenings there. Often, indeed, when pressed by Hortense to come, she would
refuse, because Robert did not second the request. This morning was the first
time he had ever given her an invitation unprompted; and he had spoken so
kindly that she was glad for the whole day.
The morning passed as usual. Mademoiselle spent it in bustling from
kitchen to parlour, now scolding Sarah, now looking over Caroline’s exercise or
hearing her lesson. However faultlessly these tasks were achieved, Hortense
never praised her, believing that praise was inconsistent with a teacher’s
dignity. She thought reprimand, however, necessary to maintain authority; and
if no error was to be found in the lesson, she would correct the pupil’s
deportment or dress.
The usual affray took place about the dinner, which Sarah almost flung
upon the table, with a look that said quite plainly, “I never dished such stuff i’
my life afore; it’s not fit for dogs.” It was a savoury repast enough. The soup
was a purée of dried peas, followed by a dish of miscellaneous meat – chopped
up with breadcrumbs, seasoned uniquely though not unpleasantly, and baked in
a mould – a strange but tasty dish.
Caroline had no objection to this Belgian cookery – indeed, she rather
liked it; and it was just as well, for showing any distaste would have injured her
in mademoiselle’s good graces for ever.
Soon after dinner Caroline coaxed her governess to dress. This manœuvre
required management. To have hinted that the jupon – the stiff petticoat –
camisole and curl-papers were odious objects would have been unwise, and
would be likely to result in Hortense wearing them all day. However, the pupil
managed to get the teacher upstairs; and, once in the bedroom, she persuaded
her that she might as well get changed now; and while mademoiselle delivered
a solemn homily on her own merit in disregarding all frivolities of fashion,
Caroline denuded her of the camisole, invested her with a decent gown,
arranged her collar and hair, and made her quite presentable.
But Hortense would put on the finishing touches herself – a thick
handkerchief tied round the throat, and a large, servant-like black apron, which
spoiled everything. The handkerchief was a fichu, worn for propriety; the apron
was the sign of a good housewife – she appeared to think that it somehow
caused a large saving in her brother’s income. She had given Caroline similar
items; and Caroline’s refusal to accept them had caused the only serious quarrel
they had ever had.
“I wear a high collar,” said Caroline, “and I should feel suffocated with a
handkerchief in addition; and my short aprons do quite as well as that long
one.”
Yet Hortense would have insisted, had not Mr. Moore chanced to
overhear, and decided that Caroline’s little aprons would suffice, and that as she
was still a child, she might for the present dispense with the fichu.
His sister was compelled to yield; but she disapproved of the piquant and
ladylike neatness of Caroline’s costume. Something more solid and homely she
would have considered much more fitting.
The afternoon was devoted to sewing. Mademoiselle, like most Belgian
ladies, was skilful with her needle, and devoted countless hours to fine
embroidery, sight-destroying lace-work, netting, knitting, and, above all,
elaborate stocking-mending. She would give a day to mending two holes in a
stocking, and think it a mission nobly fulfilled.
Caroline was condemned to learn this style of darning, which had to
imitate exactly the fabric of the stocking – a wearisome process, but considered
by Hortense as one of the first duties of a woman. She herself had been expert
at darning since she was six; and when she first discovered that Caroline was
ignorant of this essential skill, she could have wept with pity. She found a
hopeless pair of stockings, and set the ignorant English girl to work.
This task had begun two years ago, and Caroline had the stockings in her
work-bag still. They were a grievous burden to her; she would have liked to put
them in the fire; and once Mr. Moore, who had observed her sighing over them,
had proposed a private cremation in the counting-house; but Caroline knew it
would have been unwise.
All this afternoon the two ladies sat and sewed. The sky had darkened; it
had begun to rain again. Secret fears began to steal on Caroline that Robert
would stay at Whinbury till it cleared. Five o’clock struck, and still the clouds
streamed. A sighing wind whispered in the trees; day seemed already closing.
“It will not be fine till the moon rises,” pronounced Mlle Moore, “and I
am sure that my brother will not return till then. We will have coffee. It would
be vain to wait for him.”
“I am tired. May I leave my work now, cousin?”
“You may, since it grows too dark to do it well. Fold it up; put it away
carefully; then step into the kitchen and desire Sarah to bring in the tray.”
“But it has not yet struck six. He may still come.”
“He will not, I tell you. I understand my brother.”
Caroline went obediently into the kitchen, where Sarah was sewing
herself a dress.
“You are to bring in coffee,” she said in a spiritless tone; and then she
leaned her arm and head against the kitchen mantelpiece, and hung listlessly
over the fire.
“How low you seem, miss! It’s because your cousin keeps you so close at
work. It’s a shame!”
“Nothing of the kind, Sarah,” was the reply.
“Oh! but I know it is. You’re fit to cry, just because you’ve sat still the
whole day. It would make a kitten dull to be mewed up so.”
“Sarah, does your master often come home early from market when it is
wet?”
“Hardly ever; but just today he has. I saw Murgatroyd lead his horse into
the yard five minutes since. He was in the counting-house with Joe Scott, I
believe. I heard him saying something to Joe about having a new set of frames
in the mill next week, and that this time he would get four soldiers from Stilbro’
barracks to guard the wagon.”
“Sarah, are you making a gown?”
“Yes. Is it handsome?”
“Beautiful! Get the coffee. I’ll finish cutting out that sleeve for you, and
I’ll give you some trimming for it. I have some satin ribbon that will just match
it.”
“You’re very kind, miss.”
“Be quick; there’s a good girl. But first put your master’s shoes on the
hearth for him. I hear him coming.”
The kitchen door opened; Mr. Moore entered, very wet and cold. Caroline
half turned, but then bent over the dress again, her face hidden. There was an
attempt to settle her features, which failed. When she at last looked up, she
beamed.
“They said you would not come,” she said.
“But I promised to return. You expected me, I suppose?”
“No, Robert; it rained so fast. And you are wet and chilled. Change your
clothes. If you took cold, I should – we should blame ourselves.”
“I am not wet through: my riding-coat is waterproof. Dry shoes are all I
require. There – the fire is pleasant.”
He stood on the hearth and glanced down for an instant on an uplifted
face, flushed and smiling, shaded with silky curls. Sarah was gone into the
parlour with the tray; Moore placed his hand a moment on his young cousin’s
shoulder, stooped, and left a kiss on her forehead.
“Oh!” said she, “I was miserable when I thought you would not come. I
am almost too happy now. Are you happy, Robert? Do you like to come
home?”
“I think I do – tonight, at least.”
“You are not fretting about your frames, and your business, and the war?”
“Not just now.”
“Are you positive you don’t feel Hollow’s Cottage too small and dismal
for you?”
“At this moment, no.”
“And you are not bitter at heart because rich and great people forget
you?”
“No more questions. You are mistaken if you think I am anxious to curry
favour with the rich. I only want a career.”
“Which your own talent and goodness shall win you. You were made to
be great.”
“And how would that happen? Oh, life is not what you think it, Lina!”
“But you are what I think you.”
“I am not. I am far worse,” said Moore.
“No; far better. I know you are good. I feel in my heart you are so.”
“Ah! You should judge me with your head, Lina.”
“I do; and then I am quite proud of you.”
Mr. Moore’s face coloured; his lips smiled, and yet were compressed; his
eyes laughed, and yet he knit his brow.
“Think meanly of me, Lina,” said he. “Men, in general, are a sort of
scum, and I am no better than my fellows.”
“It is because you are modest that I have such confidence in your merit.”
“Then why do you say this, Caroline?” he demanded sharply.
“Only to ease my mind by expressing what I think for once; and to make
you better satisfied with yourself.”
“By assuring me that you are my sincere friend?”
“Just so, Robert. You are not my enemy, are you?”
The answer was cut short by Sarah and her mistress entering the kitchen
in some commotion. They had been disputing about “café au lait,” which Sarah
said was the queerest mess she ever saw, and a waste of God’s good gifts, as
coffee should be boiled in water; and which mademoiselle affirmed to be a
royal beverage, a thousand times too good for Sarah.
As they all withdrew into the parlour, Caroline had only time again to
question, “Not my enemy, Robert?”
And Moore had replied: “Could I be?” before he sat down at the table.
Caroline scarcely heard mademoiselle’s explosion of wrath about Sarah;
Robert laughed a little, and then, entreating his sister to be tranquil, assured her
that she should have her choice of maid from all the girls in his mill. Only he
feared they would scarcely suit her, as they were ignorant of household work;
and just as pert and self-willed as Sarah was.
Mademoiselle admitted the truth of this.
“Shall I try and get you an Antwerp girl?” asked Mr. Moore, who, stern in
public, was kind in private.
“An Antwerp girl would not stay, sneered at as she would be by all the
young coquines in your factory;” then softening, “You are very good, dear
brother – excuse my petulance – but my domestic trials are severe. Yet I
recollect that our revered mother experienced similar sufferings, though she had
the choice of all the best servants in Antwerp.”
Mr. Moore recalled his good mother’s kitchen in Antwerp, and let the
subject drop. He consoled Hortense by fetching her guitar, and asking her to
play some of their mother’s favourite songs.
Hortense, pleased, looked almost graceful, almost handsome; as she
played, her everyday fretful look was gone. She sang with feeling. Seeing that
Caroline listened with interest, this increased her good-humour. Caroline’s
exclamation at the close of the song, “I wish I could sing and play like
Hortense!” rendered her charming for the evening.
Cradled in blissful self-complacency, Hortense took up her knitting.
Drawn curtains, a clear fire, a softly-shining lamp, gave the little parlour its best
charm.
“What shall we do now, Caroline?” asked Mr. Moore.
“What shall we do, Robert?” repeated she playfully. “You decide.”
“Not play at chess?”
“No.”
“Nor draughts, nor backgammon?”
“No, no; we both hate silent games that only keep one’s hands employed,
don’t we?”
“I believe we do. Then shall we talk scandal?”
“About whom? Are we sufficiently interested in anybody to take a
pleasure in pulling their character to pieces?”
“For my part, I must say no.”
“And I too. But it is strange, though we want no third – fourth, I mean
(she hastily glanced at Hortense), living person here – it would be pleasant to
go back to the past, to hear people of long gone generations speak to us and tell
us their thoughts.”
“Who shall be the speaker? Is he French?”
“No, Robert. Tonight you shall be entirely English. You shall read an
English book. An old book – that shall waken your nature, fill your mind with
music; it shall pass like a skilful hand over your heart, and make its strings
sound like a lyre. Let glorious William touch your heart.”
“I must read Shakespeare? – with a view to making me better? Is it to
operate like a sermon?”
“It is to stir you, to give you new sensations. It is to make you feel your
life strongly – not only your virtues, but your vices.”
“What is she saying?” cried Hortense, who had been counting stitches.
“Never mind, sister; let her talk. Let her say anything she pleases tonight.
It amuses me.”
Caroline, who had been rummaging at the bookcase, returned with a
book.
“Here’s Coriolanus,” she said. “Now, read, and discover at once how low
and how high you are.”
“Come, then, sit near me, and correct when I mispronounce.”
“I am to be the teacher then? If you are all French, and sceptical and
sneering, I’ll put on my bonnet and go home.”
“Sit down. Here I begin.”
He placed the book between them, reposed his arm on the back of
Caroline’s chair, and began to read.
He relished the very first scene in Coriolanus; as he read he warmed. He
delivered the haughty speech of Caius Marcius to the starving citizens suavely,
as if he thought his irrational pride was right. Caroline looked up at him with a
singular smile.
“There’s a vicious point already,” she said. “You sympathize with that
proud patrician who insults his famished fellow-men. Go on.”
He proceeded. The warlike parts did not rouse him much; yet the singlehanded fight between Marcius and Tullus Aufidius he delighted in. As he went
on, he began to revel in the picture of human nature, to feel the reality stamped
upon the characters on the page.
He did not read the comic scenes well; so Caroline read these parts for
him, with unexpected spirit and expression. Indeed, her conversation that
evening, whether grave or gay, was intuitive – glittering like the fleeting ripple
on a stream.
Coriolanus in glory, Coriolanus in disaster, Coriolanus banished, followed
one after the other. Before the vision of the banished man Moore’s spirit
seemed to pause. He stood on the hearth of Aufidius’s hall, seeing greatness
fallen, but greater than ever in that low estate. With the revenge of Caius
Marcius, Moore perfectly sympathized; and again Caroline whispered, “There I
see another glimpse of brotherhood in error.”
The march on Rome, the mother’s supplication, the long resistance, the
final yielding of bad passions to good, the death of Coriolanus and his enemy’s
final sorrow – all flowed on deep and fast, carrying with them the heart and
mind of the reader.
“Now, have you felt anything in Coriolanus like you?” asked Caroline,
after her cousin had closed the book.
“Perhaps I have.”
“Was he not faulty as well as great?”
Moore nodded.
“And what was his fault? What made him hated by the citizens? What
caused him to be banished by his countrymen?”
“What do you think it was?”
“It was pride,” said Caroline. “You must not be proud to your
workpeople; you must soothe them; you must not be inflexible and austere.”
“What puts such notions into your head?”
“A care for your safety, dear Robert, and a fear that you will come to
harm. I hear my uncle talk about you. He praises your hard and determined
spirit, your scorn of low enemies, and your resolution not ‘to truckle to the
mob.’ Yet I cannot help thinking it unjust to include all poor working-people
under the insulting name of ‘the mob,’ and to treat them haughtily.”
“You are a little democrat, Caroline. If your uncle knew, what would he
say?”
“I rarely talk to my uncle, and never about such things. He thinks
everything but sewing and cooking above women’s comprehension.”
“And do you fancy you comprehend the subjects on which you advise
me?”
“I know it would be better for you to be loved by your workpeople than to
be hated by them, and I am sure that kindness is more likely to win their regard
than pride. If you were proud and cold to me and Hortense, should we love
you? When you are cold to me, as you are sometimes, how can I venture to be
affectionate in return?”
“Now, Lina, I’ve had my lesson; it is your turn. Hortense tells me you
were much taken by a little piece of poetry you learned the other day, by
Chénier – ‘La Jeune Captive.’ Do you remember it still?”
“I think so.”
“Repeat it, then. Take your time and mind your accent; let us have no
English u’s.”
Caroline, beginning in a low, rather tremulous voice, but gaining courage
as she proceeded, repeated the sweet verses of Chénier.
Moore listened at first with his eyes cast down, but soon he raised them.
Leaning back in his chair he could watch Caroline without her noticing. Her
eyes had an animating light this evening: at the present moment, she might be
called beautiful. When she had finished, she turned to Moore.
“Is that pretty well repeated?” she inquired, smiling like a happy child.
“I really don’t know.”
“Have you not listened?”
“Yes – and looked. You are fond of poetry, Lina?”
“When I meet with real poetry, I cannot rest till I have learned it by heart,
and so made it partly mine.”
It struck nine o’clock. Sarah entered, and said that Mr. Helstone’s servant
was come for Miss Caroline.
“Then the evening is gone already,” Caroline observed, “and it will be
long, I suppose, before I pass another here.”
Hortense had been for some time dozing over her knitting, and made no
response.
“You would not mind coming here oftener of an evening?” inquired
Robert, as he carefully wrapped her mantle round her.
“I like to come; but I have no desire to be intrusive. I am not hinting to be
asked; you must understand that.”
“Oh! I understand thee, child. You sometimes lecture me for wishing to
be rich, Lina; but if I were rich, you should live here always.”
“That would be pleasant, even if you were poor. Good-night, Robert.”
“I promised to walk with you up to the rectory.”
“I know you did; but I thought you had forgotten. It is a cold night, and as
Fanny is come, there is no need–”
“Here is your muff; don’t wake Hortense. Come.”
The half mile to the rectory was soon traversed. They parted in the garden
without a kiss, scarcely with a pressure of hands; yet Robert sent his cousin in
excited and joyously troubled. He had been singularly kind to her that day.
For himself, he came home grave, almost morose. As he stood leaning on
his yard-gate, musing in the moonlight, he exclaimed abruptly:
“This won’t do! There’s weakness and downright ruin in all this.
However,” he added, dropping his voice, “the frenzy is quite temporary. I know
it very well; I have had it before. It will be gone tomorrow.”
↑

Chapter 7

THE CURATES AT TEA


Caroline Helstone was just eighteen years old, and at eighteen the true
narrative of life is yet to begin. Before that age we sit listening to a tale, a
marvellous fiction: our world is heroic, its scenes are dream-scenes, with darker
woods and stranger hills, brighter skies, more dangerous waters, wider plains,
and sunnier fields than are found in nature.
At eighteen, Elf-land lies behind us, the shores of Reality rise ahead.
These shores are still distant; they look so blue, soft, and gentle, we long to
reach them. There, we think, we would hunger and thirst no more; whereas
many a wilderness or stream of sorrow is to be crossed before true bliss can be
tasted. Every joy that life gives must be earned; and earned with hardship.
At eighteen we are not aware of this. Hope, when she smiles on us, and
promises happiness, is believed; Love, when he comes wandering like a lost
angel to our door, is at once welcomed and embraced. If his arrows penetrate,
their wound is like a thrill of new life. That perilous passion – even agony – is
believed to be an unqualified good. In short, at eighteen the school of
experience is yet to be entered, and her humbling, crushing, grinding, but
purifying lessons are yet to be learned.
Alas, Experience! No other teacher has so wasted and frozen a face as
yours, none wears a robe so black, none bears a rod so heavy. It is by your
lessons alone that man or woman can ever find a safe track through life’s wilds.
Caroline, having walked home with Robert, had no wish to pass the rest
of the evening with her uncle, and kept aloof till the bell rang for prayers. Mr.
Helstone read part of the evening church service in his clear, nasal voice.
Afterwards, his niece, as usual, stepped up to him.
“Good-night, uncle.”
“Hey! You’ve been gadding abroad all day – visiting, dining out, and
what not!”
“Only at the cottage.”
“And have you learned your lessons?”
“Yes.”
“And made a shirt?”
“Part of one.”
“Well, that will do. Stick to the needle, and you’ll be a clever woman
some day. Go to bed now. I’m busy with a pamphlet here.”
Presently the niece was in her small bedroom, in her white dressinggown, her long hair loosened and falling thick and soft to her waist. As she
leaned her cheek on her hand and fixed her eyes on the carpet, before her rose
the visions we see at eighteen years.
Her thoughts were pleasant, it seemed, for she smiled. The flattering
prophet Hope told her that she had entered on the dawn of a summer day, and
her sun would quickly rise. Her expectations seemed based on a solid
foundation.
“When people love, the next step is they marry,” she thought. “Now, I
love Robert, and I feel sure that Robert loves me. When I looked up at him after
repeating Chénier’s poem, his handsome eyes sent the truth through my heart.
Sometimes I am afraid to speak to him, lest I should be too frank and forward;
but tonight I could have dared to express any thought, he was so indulgent.
How kind he was as we walked up the lane! He does not flatter or say foolish
things; his love-making (friendship, I mean; I don’t account him my lover, but I
hope he will be so some day) is not like what we read of in books. It is quiet,
manly, sincere. I do like him; I would be an excellent wife to him; I would tell
him of his faults (for he has a few faults), but I would study his comfort, and
cherish him, and do my best to make him happy. Now, I feel almost certain that
tomorrow evening he will either come here, or ask me to go there.”
She began combing her hair. Turning her head she saw herself in the
glass. She made a charming picture; and in undiminished gladness she sought
her bed.
And in undiminished gladness she rose the next day. As she entered her
uncle’s breakfast-room, and with soft cheerfulness wished him good-morning,
even that little man of bronze thought, for an instant, that his niece was growing
“a fine girl.” Generally she was quiet and timid with him, but this morning she
found many things to say. Only slight topics might be discussed; for with a
woman Mr. Helstone would touch on no other. She had taken an early walk in
the garden, and she told him what flowers were beginning to spring there; she
inquired when the gardener was to trim the borders; she informed him that
starlings were beginning to build their nests in the nearby church-tower, and she
wondered that the tolling of the church bells did not scare them.
Mr. Helstone opined that “they were like other fools who had just paired
– insensible.” Caroline, made perhaps a little too courageous by her good
spirits, here hazarded a remark of a kind she had never before ventured to make.
“Uncle,” said she, “you always speak of marriage scornfully. Do you
think people shouldn’t marry?”
“It is decidedly the wisest plan to remain single.”
“Are all marriages unhappy?”
“Millions of marriages are unhappy. If everybody confessed the truth,
perhaps all are more or less so.”
“You are always vexed when you are asked to marry a couple. Why?”
“Because one does not like to act as accessory to a piece of pure folly.”
Mr. Helstone seemed rather glad of the opportunity to give his niece a
piece of his mind on this point. Emboldened, she went a little further.
“But why,” said she, “should it be pure folly? If two people like each
other, why shouldn’t they live together?”
“They tire of each other in a month. They are not companions, but fellowsufferers.”
It was not naïveté which inspired Caroline’s next remark; it was a sense
of antipathy to such opinions, and displeasure.
“One would think you had never been married, uncle. Why were you so
inconsistent as to marry?”
“Every man is mad once or twice in his life.”
“So you tired of my aunt, and my aunt of you, and you were miserable
together?”
Mr. Helstone pushed out his cynical lip, wrinkled his forehead, and gave
an inarticulate grunt.
“Did she not suit you? Was she not good-tempered? Were you not sorry
when she died?”
“Caroline,” said Mr. Helstone, bringing his hand slowly down to within
an inch of the table, and then smiting it suddenly on the mahogany, “in every
case there is the rule and there are exceptions. Your questions are stupid and
babyish. Ring the bell.”
The breakfast was taken away. Usually uncle and niece would now
separate until dinner; but today the niece, instead of quitting the room, went to
the window-seat, and sat there. Mr. Helstone looked round uneasily once or
twice, as if he wished her away; but she was gazing from the window, and did
not seem to mind him. So he continued reading his morning paper – a
particularly interesting one, as it contained long dispatches from General Lord
Wellington. He little knew what tumultuous thoughts were busy in his niece’s
mind, like disturbed bees in a hive.
She was reviewing his character and his sentiments on marriage. Many a
time had she reviewed them before, and sounded the gulf between her own
mind and his; and then, on the other side of the chasm, she had seen, and now
saw, another figure standing beside her uncle: a strange, sinister shape – the
half-remembered image of her own father, James Helstone, Matthewson
Helstone’s brother.
She had heard rumours of that father’s character; old servants had
dropped hints; she knew that he was not a good man, and that he was never
kind to her. She recollected some dismal weeks that she had spent with him in a
great town somewhere, with no maid to take care of her. She had been shut up,
day and night, in a high garret-room, without a carpet, with a bare bed, and
scarcely any other furniture. He went out early every morning, and often forgot
to return and give her dinner during the day; and at night, when he came back,
was like a madman, furious, terrible, or – still more painful – like an idiot,
senseless. She knew she had fallen ill in this place, and that one night, when she
was very sick, he had come raving into the room, and said he would kill her, for
she was a burden to him. Her screams had brought aid; and from the moment
she was rescued from him she had never seen him again, except as a dead man
in his coffin.
That was her father. Also she had a mother, of whom Mr. Helstone never
spoke. Caroline could not remember having seen her; but she knew that she was
alive. This mother was then the drunkard’s wife. What had their marriage been?
Turning from the window, she said in a low, sad voice:
“You call marriage miserable, I suppose, from what you saw of my father
and mother’s. If my mother suffered what I suffered when I was with papa, she
must have had a dreadful life.”
Mr. Helstone wheeled about in his chair, and looked over his spectacles at
his niece. He was taken aback.
Her father and mother! What had put them into her head? During the
twelve years she had lived with him, he had never mentioned them. That she
had any recollections or ideas about her parents, he could not imagine.
“Your father and mother? Who has been talking to you about them?”
“Nobody; but I remember something of what papa was, and I pity
mamma. Where is she?”
This “Where is she?” had been on Caroline’s lips hundreds of times
before, but till now she had never uttered it.
“I hardly know,” returned Mr. Helstone. “I have not heard from her for
years: but wherever she is, she thinks nothing of you; she never inquires about
you. I have reason to believe she does not wish to see you. Come, it is schooltime. You go to your cousin at ten, don’t you?”
Perhaps Caroline would have said more, but Fanny came in with a
message for the rector; and his niece set out for the cottage.
The road from the rectory to Hollow’s Mill led downwards; she ran
almost all the way. Exercise, the fresh air, and the thought of seeing Robert
revived her somewhat depressed spirits. Arriving in sight of the white house,
the first thing she saw was Moore at his garden gate. He stood in his belted
Holland shirt, a light cap on, looking the other way down the lane. She stopped
behind a willow, and studied him.
“He has no equal,” she thought. “He is as handsome as he is intelligent.
What a keen eye he has! What clearly-cut, thin and serious features! I do like
his face. I do like him so much – better that those shuffling curates – better than
anybody; bonny Robert!”
She greeted “bonny Robert”. For his part, I believe he would have
disappeared like a phantom, if he could; but he was obliged to stay. He made
his greeting brief and cousin-like. The charm of last night had left his manner:
he was no longer the same man.
Such sharp disappointment! At first the eager girl would not believe in the
change. It was difficult to withdraw her hand from his; it was difficult to turn
her eyes from his eyes, till he had expressed something fonder than that cool
welcome.
A masculine lover can urge explanation: a feminine lover can say nothing
– if she did, the result would be shame and anguish. Take the matter as you find
it: ask no questions, utter no remonstrance. You expected bread, and you have
got a stone: break your teeth on it, and don’t shriek. You held out your hand for
an egg, and you were given a scorpion. Show no consternation: close your
fingers firmly upon the gift; let it sting you. Never mind; in time, after your
hand has quivered long with torture, the scorpion will die, and you will have
learned the great lesson – how to endure without a sob. For the rest of your life,
if you survive the test – some, it is said, die under it – you will be stronger,
wiser, less sensitive. You will pretend an easy and placid manner at first,
settling down to sorrow and paleness in time, and then a half-bitter stoicism.
Half-bitter? No; it should be bitter: bitterness is strength – it is a tonic.
Caroline felt that Robert had done her no wrong; he had told her no lie. It
was she that was to blame, if anyone was. Any bitterness should be poured on
her own head. She had loved without being asked to love.
Robert, indeed, had sometimes seemed to be fond of her; but why? He
could not help finding her pleasing – but his judgment did not approve the
feeling, nor did he wish it. He withdrew because he did not choose to have his
affections entangled, nor to be drawn into a marriage he believed imprudent.
Now, what was she to do? To give way to her feelings, or to vanquish
them? To pursue him, or to turn upon herself? If she is weak, she will try the
first and will lose his esteem; if she has any sense, she will govern her
emotions. She will determine to look on life steadily, as it is; to begin to learn
its severe truths.
It appeared she had a little sense, for she quitted Robert quietly, without
complaint, without moving a muscle or shedding a tear, betook herself to her
studies under Hortense as usual, and at dinner-time went home without
lingering.
When she had dined, and found herself alone, the difficulty that occurred
to her was, “How am I to get through this day?”
Last night she had hoped that the evening would be again passed happily
with Robert. She had learned her mistake; and yet she could not settle down.
More than once, Robert had walked up after tea to spend an hour with her
uncle. The door-bell had rung, his voice had been heard in the passage at
twilight; and this had happened twice after he had treated her with peculiar
reserve. Though he rarely talked to her in her uncle’s presence, he had looked at
her relentingly, and had bid her good-night kindly. Now, he might come this
evening, False Hope whispered. She almost knew it was False Hope, and yet
she listened.
She tried to read – her thoughts wandered; she tried to sew – but it was
unbearably tedious; she opened her desk and attempted to write a French
composition – she wrote nothing but mistakes.
Suddenly the door-bell rang. Her heart leaped; she sprang to the door, and
peeped through. Fanny was admitting a visitor – a tall man – just the height of
Robert. For one second she exulted; but the voice asking for Mr. Helstone was
Irish. It was the curate, Malone. He was ushered into the dining-room.
At whatever house one curate dropped in to dine, another presently
followed, often two more. Not that they gave each other the rendezvous, but
they were usually all on the run at the same time; so that when Donne, for
instance, sought Malone at his lodgings and found him gone out, he inquired of
the landlady where he was and then hastened after him.
Thus it chanced on that afternoon that Caroline’s ears were three times
tortured with the ringing of the bell; for Donne followed Malone, and Sweeting
followed Donne. More wine was ordered up from the cellar; and through the
closed doors Caroline heard their boyish laughter, and the vacant cackle of their
voices. She was afraid they would stay to tea, for she had no pleasure in making
tea for that trio.
Yet not only was she destined to be favoured with their company, but also
with four other guests – ladies packed in a phaeton now rolling heavily along
the road from Whinbury: an elderly lady and three of her buxom daughters
were coming to see her. Yes, a fourth time the bell clanged. Fanny announced:
“Mrs. Sykes and the three Misses Sykes.”
Caroline wrung her hands, and stood up nervously, awaiting their
entrance. In stalked a tall, bilious gentlewoman. In sailed her three daughters, a
showy trio, all well-grown, and more or less handsome.
English country ladies, whether young or old, pretty or plain, almost all
have a certain expression stamped on their features, which seems to say, “I
know – I do not boast of it, but I know that I am the standard of what is proper;
let everyone else, therefore, keep a sharp lookout, for if they differ from me in
dress, opinion or anything else, then they are wrong.”
Mrs. and Misses Sykes were illustrations of this. Miss Mary – a welllooking, well-meaning girl – wore her complacency with some state, though
without harshness. Miss Harriet – a beauty – carried it more overbearingly; she
looked high and cold. Miss Hannah, who was conceited, dashing and pushing,
flourished hers openly. The mother showed it with the gravity proper to her age.
The reception was got through somehow. Caroline “was glad to see
them”, hoped they were well, hoped Mrs. Sykes’s cough was better (Mrs. Sykes
had had a cough for the last twenty years), hoped the younger sisters at home
were well; to which inquiry the Misses Sykes replied by one simultaneous bow,
very majestic and mighty awful.
A pause followed. Mrs. Sykes then inquired after Mr. Helstone, and his
rheumatism; and she and all her daughters, combining in chorus, expressed
their opinion that he was “a wonderful man for his years.”
Pause second.
Miss Mary, getting up steam in her turn, asked whether Caroline had
attended the Bible Society meeting at Nunnely last Thursday night. Caroline’s
negative answer brought a simultaneous expression of surprise from the lips of
the four ladies.
“We were all there,” said Miss Mary. “We even persuaded papa to go.
But he fell asleep while the German Moravian minister was speaking. I felt
quite ashamed.”
“And there was Dr. Broadbent,” cried Hannah, “such a beautiful speaker!
Yet he is almost a vulgar-looking man.”
“But such a dear man,” interrupted Mary.
“And such a good man, such a useful man,” added her mother.
“Only like a butcher in appearance,” interposed the fair, proud Harriet. “I
couldn’t bear to look at him. I listened with my eyes shut.”
Miss Helstone felt her ignorance. Not having seen Dr. Broadbent, she
could not give her opinion. Pause third came on. During it, Caroline was feeling
what a dreaming fool she was, and how unfit to mix with the ordinary world.
She was conscious of how exclusively she had attached herself to the white
cottage in the Hollow, and one inmate of that cottage. She was aware that this
would not do, and that some day she would be forced to change. She did not
exactly wish to resemble the ladies before her, but she wished to become
superior to her present self, so as to feel less scared by their dignity.
The sole means she found of reviving the flagging discourse was by
asking them if they would stay to tea. Mrs. Sykes had begun, “We are much
obliged to you, but–” when in came Fanny.
“The gentlemen will stay the evening, ma’am,” was the message she
brought.
“What gentlemen have you?” inquired Mrs. Sykes. At their names, she
and her daughters exchanged glances. The curates were not to them what they
were to Caroline. Mr. Sweeting was quite a favourite with them; even Mr.
Malone rather so, because he was a clergyman.
“Really, since you have company already, I think we will stay,” remarked
Mrs. Sykes. “I always like to meet the clergy.”
And now Caroline had to usher them upstairs, help them to unshawl,
smooth their hair and make themselves smart; to lead them to the drawingroom, to distribute amongst them books of engravings, or odd things purchased
from the Jew-basket.
It ought perhaps to be explained, for the benefit of those who are not au
fait with the mysteries of the “Jew-basket” and “missionary-basket,” that these
are the size of a clothes-basket, dedicated to the purpose of conveying from
house to house a monster collection of pin-cushions, needle-books, card-racks,
articles of infant wear, etc., made by the willing or reluctant hands of the
Christian ladies of a parish, and sold to the heathenish gentlemen thereof, at
exorbitant prices. The proceeds are applied to the conversion of the Jews, or to
the regeneration of the interesting coloured population of the globe. Each lady
contributor keeps the basket a month, to sew for it, and to foist off its contents
on a shrinking male public. Some active-minded women like it; other feebler
souls object to it, and would rather see the prince of darkness at their door than
that basket, brought with “Mrs. Rouse’s compliments; and please, ma’am, she
says it’s your turn now.”
After Miss Helstone had performed the duties of a hostess, she betook
herself to the kitchen, to consult with Fanny and Eliza about the tea.
“What a lot of ’em!” cried Eliza, the cook. “And I put off the baking
today because I thought there would be plenty of bread till morning. We shall
never have enow.”
“Are there any tea-cakes?” asked Caroline.
“Only three and a loaf. I wish these fine folk would stay at home till
they’re asked; and I want to finish trimming my hat.”
“Fanny must run down to Briarfield and buy some muffins and crumpets
and biscuits. And don’t be cross, Eliza; we can’t help it now.”
“And which tea-things are we to have?”
“Oh, the best, I suppose. I’ll get out the silver service. Get it ready as
quickly as you can, for the sooner we have tea the sooner they will go – at least,
I hope so.”
She sighed as she returned to the drawing-room. “Still,” she thought, “if
Robert would come even now, how bright all would be! There would be an
interest in hearing him talk. There can be no interest in hearing any of them.
How they will gabble when the curates come in! But I suppose I am a selfish
fool. These are very respectable gentlefolks. They are just different from me.”
She went in.
Yorkshire people in those days took their tea round the table, sitting with
their knees under the mahogany. It was essential to have a multitude of plates of
bread and butter. It was thought proper, too, that on the centre plate should
stand a glass dish of marmalade. They expected to find an assortment of
cheesecakes and tarts. If there was also a plate of thin slices of pink ham
garnished with parsley, so much the better.
Eliza, the rector’s cook, fortunately knew her business. She had been put
out of humour at first, but in due time the tea was spread forth in handsome
style, and neither ham, tarts, nor marmalade were lacking.
The curates, summoned to this repast, entered joyous; but at once, on
seeing the ladies, of whose presence they had not been warned, they came to a
halt in the doorway. Malone, in front, stopped short and fell back, almost
capsizing Donne behind him. Donne, staggering three paces in retreat, sent little
Sweeting into the arms of old Helstone, who brought up the rear. There was
some expostulation, some tittering. Malone was requested to mind what he was
doing, and pushed forward at last, blushing.
Helstone welcomed his fair guests, shook hands and passed a jest with
each, and seated himself snugly between the lovely Harriet and the dashing
Hannah. Miss Mary he requested to move to the seat opposite him, so that he
might see her if he couldn’t be near her. He was always perfectly easy and
gallant to young ladies, and popular amongst them; yet at heart he neither
respected nor liked the sex, and those who had been brought into close relation
with him had ever feared rather than loved him.
Sweeting, the least embarrassed of the curates, took refuge beside Mrs.
Sykes, who he knew was fond of him. Donne, after bowing and saying in a high
voice, “How d’ye do, Miss Helstone?” dropped into a seat at Caroline’s elbow,
to her annoyance, for she had a peculiar antipathy to Donne, on account of his
immovable self-conceit and narrowness of mind. Malone, grinning
meaninglessly, sat on her other side. She knew neither man would be of any
mortal use in keeping up the conversation, handing round cups, or even passing
the muffins. Little Sweeting, small and boyish as he was, would have been
worth twenty of them.
Malone, though a ceaseless talker when there were only men present, was
usually tongue-tied in the presence of ladies. Three phrases, however, he had
ready, which he never failed to produce:
1st. “Have you had a walk today, Miss Helstone?”
2nd. “Have you seen your cousin Moore lately?”
3rd. “Does your class at the Sunday school keep up its number?”
These three questions being put and answered, between Caroline and
Malone silence reigned.
With Donne it was otherwise; he was exasperating. He had a stock of the
most trite small-talk that can be imagined – abuse of the people of Briarfield; of
the natives of Yorkshire generally; complaints of the lack of high society; of the
backward state of civilization in these districts; and ridicule of the want of style
and elegance in the area, as if he, Donne, had been accustomed to very great
doings, an insinuation which his underbred manner failed to bear out.
These comments, he seemed to think, must raise him in Miss Helstone’s
estimation; whereas they brought him to a level below contempt. A Yorkshire
girl herself, she hated to hear Yorkshire abused by such a pitiful prater. Then,
incensed, she would turn and say it was no proof of refinement to be forever
scolding others for vulgarity, and no sign of a good pastor to be eternally
censuring his flock. She would ask him what he had entered the church for,
since he complained there were only poor people to preach to. Had he been
ordained merely to sit in king’s houses? These questions were considered by all
the curates as bold and impious.
Tea was a long time in progress; the guests gabbled as their hostess had
expected. Mr. Helstone kept up a brilliant flow of easy prattle with his
neighbours, and even with Miss Mary; though, as Mary was the most sensible
and least coquettish of the three, to her the rector was the least attentive. He
could not abide sense in women. He liked to see them as silly, as light-headed,
as vain, as open to ridicule as possible, because that was what he held them to
be, and wished them to be – inferior, toys to play with, to amuse a vacant hour,
and to be thrown away.
Hannah was his favourite. Harriet, though beautiful, egotistical, and selfsatisfied, was not quite weak enough for him. She had some genuine selfrespect amidst much false pride, and she did not babble like one crazy; she
would not permit herself to be treated as a doll or a child; she expected to be
bent to like a queen.
Hannah, on the contrary, demanded no respect, only flattery. If her
admirers told her that she was an angel, she would let them treat her like an
idiot. So very credulous was she, so very silly when flattered and admired, that
there were moments when Helstone actually felt tempted to commit matrimony
a second time, and to try the experiment of taking her for his wife; but
fortunately the boredom of his first marriage, the memory of the weight of the
millstone he had once worn round his neck, checked his tenderness, and
restrained him from whispering any proposals to Hannah.
She would probably have married him if he had asked her; her parents
would have quite approved the match. To them his fifty-five years and leathery
heart would have been no obstacles; and as he was a rector, with an excellent
living and a good house, and was supposed to have private property (though in
that the world was mistaken; every penny of the £5,000 inherited by him from
his father had been devoted to the building of a new church at his native village
in Lancashire) – her parents, I say, would have delivered Hannah over to his
tender mercies without one scruple; and the second Mrs. Helstone would have
fluttered through the honeymoon a bright, admired butterfly, and crawled the
rest of her days a sordid, trampled worm.
Little Mr. Sweeting, seated between Mrs. Sykes and Miss Mary, looked
and felt more content than any monarch. He was fond of all the Misses Sykes;
he thought them magnificent girls. He only regretted that Miss Dora happened
to be absent – Dora being the one whom he secretly hoped one day to call Mrs.
David Sweeting.
The meal at last drew to a close. It would have been over long ago if Mr.
Donne had not persisted in sitting with his cup half full of cold tea before him,
long after the rest had finished – long, indeed, after chairs were impatiently
pushed back, talk flagged, and silence fell. Vainly did Caroline inquire if he
would take a little hot tea, as that must be cold, etc.; he would neither drink it
nor leave it. He seemed to think that this isolated position gave him importance,
that it was dignified and stately to keep all the others waiting. At length,
however, the old rector himself got impatient.
“For whom are we waiting?” he asked.
“For me, I believe,” returned Donne complacently.
“Tut!” cried Helstone. Standing up, he said grace, and all quitted the
table. Donne, unabashed, still sat ten minutes quite alone, until Mr. Helstone
rang the bell for the tea-things to be removed. The curate was at last forced to
empty his cup, and to relinquish the role which, he thought, had given him such
distinction.
And now music was asked for. This was Mr. Sweeting’s chance to show
off. He began, therefore, to persuade the young ladies to favour the company
with a song. He went through the whole business of begging, praying, and
resisting excuses, and at last succeeded in leading Miss Harriet to the piano.
Then out came the pieces of his flute (he always carried them in his pocket).
These were screwed together, Malone and Donne meanwhile sneering at him,
which the little man did not heed at all. He was convinced they were envious
because they could not accompany the ladies as he could.
His triumph began. Malone, chagrined at hearing him pipe up in most
superior style, determined to earn distinction too, and approached a sofa on
which Miss Helstone was seated. Depositing his great Irish frame near her, he
tried a fine speech or two, accompanied by extraordinary and incomprehensible
grins. In his efforts to make himself agreeable, he contrived to possess himself
of the two long sofa cushions and a square one; with which, after rolling them
about for some time, he managed to erect a sort of barrier between himself and
the object of his attentions. Caroline soon made an excuse for moving to the
opposite side of the room, and sat next to Mrs. Sykes, with whom she began to
discuss ornamental knitting; and thus Peter Augustus was thrown out.
Very sullen he looked when he found himself abandoned on a large sofa,
with the charge of three small cushions on his hands. He wanted seriously to
cultivate acquaintance with Miss Helstone, because he thought that her uncle
possessed money which he would probably leave to his niece. (Gérard Moore
knew better: he had seen the neat church that owed its origin to the rector’s zeal
and cash, and had cursed the expensive caprice which crossed his wishes.)
The evening seemed long to Caroline. She dropped her knitting on her
lap, and gave herself up to a sort of brain-lethargy, caused by the unmeaning
hum around her – the rattle of the piano keys, the squeaking and gasping of the
flute, her uncle’s laughter; and more than all, the interminable gossip of Mrs.
Sykes murmured close at her ear.
At length, when Mr. Sweeting came up to speak to Mrs. Sykes, she took
the opportunity to slip quietly out of the room, and seek a moment’s solitude.
She went to the dining-room, where the low remnant of a fire still burned in the
grate. The place was empty and quiet. Caroline sank into her uncle’s large easychair, half shut her eyes, and rested her limbs. As to her mind, however, that
flew directly to the Hollow. It stood on the threshold of the parlour there, then it
passed to the counting-house, and wondered which spot was blessed by the
presence of Robert.
It so happened that Robert was much nearer to Caroline than she
suspected. He was at this moment crossing the churchyard, approaching the
rectory garden-gate – not, however, coming to see his cousin, but intent solely
on giving a piece of news to the rector.
Yes, Caroline; you hear the bell ring for the fifth time this afternoon. You
start, and you are certain now that this must be he. You lean forward, listening
eagerly as Fanny opens the door. Right! That is the voice – low, with the slight
foreign accent, but so sweet. You half rise, thinking, “Fanny will tell him Mr.
Helstone is with company, and he will go away.”
Oh! she cannot let him go. In spite of herself, she walks half across the
room, ready to dart out in case he should retreat; but he enters the passage.
“Since your master is engaged,” he says, “just show me into the dining-room.
Bring me pen and ink. I will write a short note for him.”
Now, hearing him advance, Caroline would leave the dining room and
disappear if she could. She feels caught; she dreads her unexpected presence
may annoy him. But there is no way of escape. Her cousin enters: the look of
troubled surprise she expected has appeared on his face, has shocked her, and is
gone. She has stammered,
“I only left the drawing-room a minute for a little quiet.”
There was something so diffident in the way she said this, that anyone
might see some saddening change had passed over her prospects. Mr. Moore
probably remembered how she had used to meet him with hopeful confidence.
He must have seen how the check of this morning had operated. Here was an
opportunity for carrying out his new system with effect. Perhaps he found it
easier to practise that system in broad daylight, in his busy mill-yard, than in a
quiet parlour in the evening.
Fanny lit the candles, brought writing materials, and left the room.
Caroline was about to follow her. Moore, if consistent, should have let her go;
whereas he stood in the doorway, and gently kept her back.
“Shall I tell my uncle you are here?” asked she, in the same subdued
voice.
“No; I can say to you all I had to say to him. You will be my messenger?”
“Yes, Robert.”
“Then you may inform him that I have got a clue to the identity of one, at
least, of the men who broke my frames; and that I hope to have him in custody
tomorrow. You can remember that?”
“Oh yes!” These two monosyllables were uttered in a sadder tone than
ever; and she sighed. “Will you prosecute him?”
“Doubtless.”
“No, Robert. It will set the neighbourhood against you more than ever.”
“That is no reason why I should not do my duty, and defend my property.
This fellow is a scoundrel.”
“But his accomplices will take revenge on you. You do not know how the
people of this country bear malice. Some of them boast that they can keep a
stone in their pocket for years, before they hurl it and hit their mark.”
Moore laughed. “Don’t fear for me, Lina. I am on my guard. Don’t make
yourself uneasy about me.”
“How can I help it? You are my cousin. If anything happened–” She
stopped.
“Nothing will happen, Lina. To speak in your own language, there is a
Providence above all – and if prayers work, yours will benefit me. You pray for
me sometimes?”
“You, Louis, and Hortense are always remembered in my prayers.”
“So I have often imagined,” he said. “When, weary and vexed, I have
gone to bed without praying, it has occurred to me that another had asked
forgiveness for my day, and safety for my night. I hope your prayers for me are
acceptable to God; they doubtless would be, if I deserved them.”
“Annihilate that doubt. It is groundless.”
“When a man has been brought up only to make money, and scarcely
breathes any other air than that of mills and markets, it seems odd to utter his
name in a prayer; and very strange it seems that a good, pure heart should take
him in and harbour him. If I could guide that heart, I believe I should counsel it
to exclude one who has no higher aim in life than that of patching up his broken
fortune.”
The hint, though conveyed tenderly, was understood and felt keenly by
Caroline.
“Indeed, I only think – or I will only think – of you as my cousin,” was
the quick answer. “I am beginning to understand things better than I did,
Robert. I know it is your duty to try to get on, and that it won’t do for you to be
romantic; but you must not misunderstand me if I seem friendly. You
misunderstood me this morning, did you not?”
“What made you think so?”
“Your look – your manner.”
“But look at me now–”
“Oh! you are different now. At present I dare speak to you.”
“Yet I am the same, except that I have left the tradesman behind me, and
am your kinsman now. Caroline–”
Here the company was heard rising in the other room. The carriage was
ordered; shawls and bonnets were demanded.
“I must go, Robert.”
“Yes, you must, or they will come in and find us here; and rather than
meet all that host in the passage, I will leave through the French window. One
minute only – put down the candle – good-night. I kiss you because we are
cousins, and so one – two – three kisses are allowable. Caroline, good-night.”
↑

Chapter 8

NOAH AND MOSES


The next day Moore had risen before the sun, and had ridden to Whinbury
and back before his sister had made his coffee and breakfast. What business he
did there he kept to himself. Hortense asked no questions.
Breakfast over, he went to his counting-house. Henry, Joe Scott’s boy,
brought in the letters; Moore sat down and glanced them over. They were all
short, but not, it seemed, sweet – probably rather sour, on the contrary; for as
Moore laid down the last, he sniffed derisively, and his eye glittered in anger.
He dashed off a batch of answers, sealed them, and then went to walk through
the mill. On coming back he sat down to read his newspaper.
The contents seemed not to absorb him; he turned his head towards the
window; he looked at his watch, and appeared preoccupied. It was a fine, mild
morning; perhaps he wished to be out in the fields. The door of his countinghouse stood wide open, and the breeze and sunshine entered freely.
A dark-blue apparition – Joe Scott, fresh from a dyeing vat – appeared at
the open door, uttered the words “He’s comed, sir,” and vanished.
A large man, broad-shouldered and massive-limbed, clad in fustian
garments and grey woollen stockings, entered, was received with a nod, and
told to take a seat. He removed his hat (a very bad one), stowed it away under
his chair, and wiped his forehead with a spotted cotton handkerchief, saying
that it was “raight dahn warm for Febewerry.”
Mr. Moore uttered some slight sound of agreement. The visitor carefully
deposited an official-looking staff in the corner; then he began to whistle.
“You have what is necessary, I suppose?” said Mr. Moore.
“Ay, ay! all’s right.”
He renewed his whistling, Mr. Moore his reading. Presently, however,
Moore turned to his cupboard, opened it without rising, took out a black bottle –
the same he had produced for Malone’s benefit – a tumbler, and a jug, placed
them on the table, and said:
“Help yourself; there’s water in that jar over there.”
“Will you tak naught yourseln, Mr. Moore?” inquired his guest, as he
mixed a portion, tasted it, and sank back satisfied in his seat. Moore shook his
head.
“Yah’d as good,” continued his visitor; “it’d set ye up. Tak my advice and
try a glass. Them lads that’s coming ’ll keep ye talking. Ye’ll need propping.”
“Have you seen Mr. Sykes this morning?” inquired Moore.
“I seed him just afore I set off. He said he aimed to come here, and I
sudn’t wonder but ye’ll have old Helstone too. I seed ’em saddling his little nag
as I passed t’ rectory.”
The trot of the little nag’s hoofs was, five minutes after, heard in the yard.
A well-known nasal voice cried aloud, “Boy, lead my horse into the stable.”
Then Helstone came marching in, looking keener and livelier than usual.
“Beautiful morning, Moore. How do? Ha! whom have we here? Sugden!
On my word, you lose no time. Your message was delivered to me, Moore. Are
you sure you are on the right scent? Have you got a warrant?”
“Sugden has.”
“Then you are going to seek him now? I’ll accompany you.”
“You will be spared that trouble, sir; he is coming to seek me. I’m
awaiting his arrival.”
“And who is it?”
Joe Scott had entered, like a sinister indigo phantom. He said:
“It’s a friend of yours, Mr. Helstone: the Rev. Moses Barraclough. The
tub orator you call him sometimes, I think.”
“Ah!” said the rector, taking out his snuff-box, and helping himself to a
long pinch. “Why, he never was a workman of yours, Moore. He’s a tailor.”
“And so much the worse grudge I owe him, for interfering and setting my
men against me.”
“And Moses was actually present at the battle of Stilbro’ Moor, wooden
leg and all?”
“Ay, sir,” said Joe; “he went there on horseback. He was the captain, and
wore a mask.”
“And how was he found out?”
“He courted Sarah, Mr. Moore’s sarvant lass,” said Joe, “and she would
have nothing to say to him. Happen she’d have encouraged him, in spite of his
leg and his deceit, just to pass time like. I’ve known some on ’em do as much –
ay, I’ve seen trim young women, that looked as pure as daisies, turn out to be
nowt but stinging nettles.”
“Sensible fellow,” said Helstone.
“Howsiver, Sarah had another string to her bow. Fred Murgatroyd, one of
our lads, is for her; and two-three months ago, Murgatroyd and Moses chanced
to meet one Sunday night. They’d both come to ax Sarah to tak a walk wi’
them. They fell out, had a tussle, and Fred was worsted, for he’s young and
small, and Barraclough, for all he has only one leg, is almost as strong as
Sugden there.”
“In short,” broke in Mr. Moore, “Murgatroyd was jealous of Barraclough;
and last night, as he and a friend took shelter in a barn from a shower, they
heard Moses talking with some associates within. From their talk it was plain he
had been the leader, not only at Stilbro’ Moor, but in the attack on Sykes’s
property. Moreover they planned to send a deputation to me this morning,
which Barraclough is to head, and which, in the most religious and peaceful
spirit, is to entreat me to give up my frames. I rode over to Whinbury this
morning, got a constable and a warrant, and I am now waiting for the group.
Here comes Sykes.”
Mr. Sykes entered – a tall stout man of about fifty, who looked anxious.
“Have they been? Have you got him? Is it over?” he asked.
“Not yet,” returned Moore. “We are waiting for them.”
“They’ll not come; it’s near noon. Better give it up. It will make a stir –
may have fatal consequences.”
“You need not appear,” said Moore. “I shall meet them in the yard; you
can stay here.”
“But my name will be seen in the law proceedings. A wife and family
make a man cautious.”
Moore looked disgusted. “I have no objection to act alone,” he said; “only
you will not find safety in yielding. Your partner Pearson gave way, but that did
not prevent them from trying to shoot him in his own house.”
“My dear sir, take a little wine and water,” recommended Mr. Helstone. A
brimming tumbler transfigured Mr. Sykes in two minutes. He now announced
that he would endure the insolence of the working-classes no longer; he had
made up his mind to put them down.
“Take another glass,” urged Moore.
Mr. Sykes didn’t mind if he did – just to keep the damp out; he had a little
cough (here he coughed to prove the fact), and it really was prudent to take
precautions.
“Quite prudent, and take them by all means,” urged the host.
Mr. Sykes now addressed Mr. Helstone, who stood watching him keenly.
“You, sir, as a clergyman,” said he, “may feel it disagreeable to be present
amidst scenes of peril. I dare say your nerves won’t stand it. You’re a man of
peace, sir; but we manufacturers, living in the world, and always in turmoil, get
quite belligerent. Really, if anybody was to attack my house – thieves or
anything – I believe I should enjoy it, such is my spirit.”
The rector laughed. Moore would have pressed a third tumbler upon the
heroic mill-owner, but Helstone, for the sake of decorum, prevented him.
“Enough is as good as a feast, is it not, Mr. Sykes?” he said; and Mr.
Sykes assented regretfully. Moore looked mischievous and sardonic. What
would a certain young kinswoman of his have said if she could have seen her
dear, good, great Robert just now?
Yes, it was the same man, only seen on a different side – a side Caroline
had not yet beheld, though perhaps she suspected its existence. Well, Caroline
had, doubtless, her defective side too. And Moore, with all his faults, might be
respected, as might old Helstone. Neither of these two would look, think, or
speak a lie; the wretched black bottle had no charms for either of them. Both of
them looked and were superior beings to poor Sykes.
A trampling sound was heard in the yard. Moore walked to the window;
Helstone followed. They looked forth carefully, so that they might not be
visible from outside.
A flourishing oratorical cough was now heard, followed by “Whisht!”
Moore opened his window an inch or two to admit sound.
“Joseph Scott,” began a snuffling voice – Scott was standing sentinel at
the counting-house door – “might we inquire if your master be within?”
“He’s within, ay,” said Joe.
“Would you then, if you please, tell him that twelve gentlemen wants to
see him.”
“He’d happen ax what for,” suggested Joe.
“For a purpose,” was the answer.
Joe entered. “Please, sir, there’s twelve gentlemen wants to see ye, ‘for a
purpose.’”
“Good. Sugden, come when I whistle.” Moore went out, chuckling dryly.
He advanced into the yard, one hand in his pocket, the other in his waistcoat,
his cap brim over his eyes, shading their deep dancing ray of scorn.
Twelve men waited in the yard, with two in front: one, a little dapper
strutting man with a turned-up nose; the other a broad-shouldered fellow, with
demure, cat like, trustless eyes, and a wooden leg and crutch. He seemed
laughing in his sleeve at some person or thing.
“Good-morning, Mr. Barraclough,” said Moore to him.
“Peace be unto you!” answered Mr. Barraclough, entirely closing his
naturally half-shut eyes.
“I’m obliged to you. Peace is an excellent thing; but I imagine peace is
not your purpose?”
“As to our purpose,” began Barraclough, “it’s one that may sound strange
and perhaps foolish to ears like yours, for the childer of this world is wiser in
their generation than the childer of light.”
“To the point, if you please.”
“Ye’se hear, sir. It is a grand purpose, and” (changing his voice to a
whine) “it’s the Looard’s own purpose.”
“Do you want a subscription to a new Ranter’s chapel, Mr. Barraclough?”
“I hadn’t that duty on my mind, sir; but since ye mention the subject, I’ll
tak ony small trifle ye may have to spare.”
With that he doffed his hat, and held it out as a begging-box with a brazen
grin.
“If I gave you sixpence you would drink it. You seem a fine fellow,” said
Moore dryly; “you don’t mind showing me that your trade is hypocrisy and
fraud. You expect to make me laugh at your cleverness, while at the same time
you think you are deceiving the men behind you.”
Moses Barraclough’s countenance lowered. He was going to answer,
when the second leader stepped forward impatiently, with a self-confident and
conceited air.
“Mr. Moore,” commenced he, enunciating each word very slowly, “it
might, perhaps, be said that reason rather than peace is our purpose. We come,
in the first place, to request you to hear reason; and should you refuse, it is my
duty to warn you that measures will be had resort to which will bring you to a
sense of the foolishness which seems to guide your proceedings as a tradesman.
Hem! Sir, I would beg to allude that as a furriner, coming from a distant quarter
of this globe, thrown, as I may say, a perfect outcast on these cliffs of Albion,
you have not that understanding of the ways which might conduce to the benefit
of the working-classes. If you’d consider to give up this here mill, and go
straight home to where you belong, it ’ud happen be as well.”
The other members of the deputation responded: “Hear, hear!”
“Brayvo, Noah!” murmured Joe Scott, who stood behind Mr. Moore.
“Moses’ll niver beat that. Cliffs o’ Albion! Moses is dished.”
Moses, however, refused to be dished. Casting a somewhat ireful glance
at Noah, he launched out in a more serious tone.
“Before you set up your tent among us, Mr. Moore, we lived i’ peace and
quietness – yea, in loving-kindness. I can remember some twenty year back,
when hand-labour were respected, and no mischief-maker had ventured to
introduce these here machines. Now, I’m a tailor myself. Howsiver, my heart is
of a softish nature. I’m a very feeling man, and when I see my brethren
oppressed, I stand up for ’em. Therefore I advise you to part wi’ your infernal
machinery, and tak on more hands.”
“What if I don’t follow your advice, Mr. Barraclough?”
“The Looard pardon you!”
“Are you a Wesleyan now, Mr. Barraclough?”
“Praise God! Bless His name! I’m a joined Methody!”
“Which does not prevent you from being a drunkard and a swindler. I saw
you a week ago laid dead-drunk by the roadside, as I returned from Stilbro’
market; and while you preach peace, you spend your life stirring up dissension.
You no more sympathize with the poor than you do with me. You incite them to
outrage for bad purposes of your own; so does this Noah. You two are restless,
meddling, impudent scoundrels, whose motive is selfish ambition. Behind you
are some honest though misguided men; but you two I count altogether bad.”
Barraclough was going to speak.
“Silence! You have had your say, and now I will have mine. I will not be
dictated to by you. You want me to quit the country, and to part with my
machinery. If I refuse, you threaten me. I do refuse. Here I stay, and by this mill
I stand, and into it will I convey the best machinery invented. What will you
do? Burn down my mill and shoot me? What then? Suppose that building was a
ruin and I was a corpse – would that stop invention? Not for a second! Another
mill would rise on the ruins of this, and perhaps a more enterprising owner
come in my place. Hear me! I’ll make my cloth as I please, and using what
means I choose. Whoever interferes with me may take the consequences. I’ll
prove I’m in earnest.”
He whistled shrilly and loud. Sugden came out with his staff and warrant.
Moore turned sharply to Barraclough. “You were on Stilbro’ moor,” said
he; “I have proof of that. You wore a mask, you knocked down one of my men
with your own hand – you! a preacher of the gospel! Sugden, arrest him!”
Moses was captured. There was a cry and a rush to rescue him, but
Moore’s right hand, which had lain hidden in his breast, reappeared holding a
pistol.
“Both barrels are loaded,” said he. “Keep off!”
He guarded his prey to the counting-house. He ordered Joe Scott to enter
with Sugden and the prisoner, and to bolt the door from inside. Then he walked
backwards and forwards along the front of the mill, looking meditatively on the
ground, but still holding the pistol.
The eleven remaining deputies watched him, talking under their breath to
each other. At length one of them approached.
“I’ve not much faith i’ Moses Barraclough,” said he, “and I would speak a
word to you myseln, Mr. Moore. It’s out o’ no ill-will that I’m here; it’s just to
try to get things straightened. Ye see we’re ill off; our families is poor and
pined. We’re thrown out o’ work wi’ these frames; we can earn nought. What is
to be done? Mun we lay us down and dee? I’ve no grand words, Mr. Moore, but
I feel that a reasonable man should not starve to death. I’m not for shedding
blood, and I’m not for pulling down mills and breaking machines – for as ye
say, that niver stops invention; but I’ll mak as big a din as ever I can. I know it
isn’t right for poor folks to starve. Them that governs mun find a way to help
us. Ye’ll say that’s hard to do. So much louder mun we shout out then, to set t’
Parliament-men on to the job.”
“Worry the Parliament-men as much as you please,” said Moore; “but to
worry the mill-owners is absurd, and I won’t stand it.”
“Ye’re a raight hard un!” returned the workman. “Won’t ye gie us a bit o’
time? Won’t ye mak your changes more slowly?”
“Others won’t stop. If I did, I should be bankrupt in a month; and would
that put bread into your hungry children’s mouths? William Farren, talk to me
no more about machinery. I shall get new frames in tomorrow. If you broke
these, I would still get more. I’ll never give in.”
Here the mill-bell rang twelve o’clock. Moore abruptly turned away and
re-entered his counting-house.
His last words had left a harsh impression. By speaking kindly to William
Farren, who was a very honest, hard-working man, Moore might have made a
friend. It seemed extraordinary that he could turn from such a man without any
sympathy. The poor fellow looked haggard with want and hunger; yet there was
no malignity in his face; it was worn, dejected, but still patient. How could
Moore leave him thus, with the words, “I’ll never give in,” and not a whisper of
good-will, or aid?
Farren, as he went home to his cottage – once a decent, pleasant place, but
now, though still clean, very dreary, because so poor – asked himself this
question. He concluded that the foreign mill-owner was a selfish, unfeeling, and
foolish man. He felt cast down – almost hopeless.
On his entrance his wife served out such dinner as she had to give him
and the bairns. It was only porridge, and too little of that. Some of the younger
children asked for more, which disturbed William much. While his wife quieted
them as well as she could, he went to the doorway to conceal from his family
the tears which were gathering in his grey eyes. He cleared his vision with his
sleeve, and the melting mood over, a very stern one followed.
He stood brooding in silence, when a gentleman in black came up – a
clergyman, but not one we have met before. He was about forty years old;
plain-looking, and rather grey-haired. He wore an abstracted and somewhat
doleful air; but on approaching Farren he looked up with a hearty expression.
“Is it you, William? How are you?” he asked.
“Middling, Mr. Hall. How are ye? Will ye step in and rest ye?”
Mr. Hall was vicar of Nunnely, from which parish Farren originally came,
before he had moved to Briarfield to work in the mill. He entered the cottage,
and having greeted the wife and children, sat down. He talked very cheerfully
about events in his parish since the family had left; he answered questions about
his sister Margaret; he asked questions in his turn, and at last, glancing
anxiously round at the bare room, and at the faces of the children by his knee,
he said abruptly:
“How are you all? How do you get on?”
“We get on poorly,” said William; “we’re all out of work. I’ve selled
most o’ t’ household stuff, as ye may see; and what we’re to do next, God
knows.”
“Has Mr. Moore turned you off?”
“He has turned us off; and if he’d tak me on again tomorrow I wouldn’t
work for him.”
“That is not like you, William.”
“I know; but I feel I am changing. T’ bairns and t’ wife are that pinched–”
“Well, my lad, and so are you. These are grievous times; I see suffering
wherever I turn. Sit down, and let us talk it over.”
Mr. Hall lifted the smallest child on to his knee, and placed his hand on
the head of the next smallest.
“Sad times,” he said, “and they last long. It is the will of God. His will be
done. But He tries us to the utmost.”
Again he reflected.
“You’ve no money, William, and you’ve nothing you could sell to raise
any?”
“No. I’ve selled t’ chest o’ drawers, and t’ clock, and a mahogany stand,
and t’ wife’s bonny tea-tray and set o’ wedding chiney.”
“If somebody lent you a pound or two, could you make any good use of
it? Could you get into a new way of doing something?”
Farren did not answer, but his wife said quickly, “Ay, I’m sure he could,
sir. He’s a very contriving chap, is our William. If he’d two or three pounds he
could begin selling stuff.”
“Please God,” returned William deliberately, “I could buy groceries, and
bits o’ tapes, and thread, and I could begin hawking at first.”
“And you know, sir,” interposed Grace, “William would neither drink,
nor idle, nor waste, in any way. He’s my husband, and I shouldn’t praise him;
but I will say there’s not a soberer, honester man i’ England.”
“Well, I’ll speak to one or two friends, and I think I can promise to let
him have five pounds in a day or two – as a loan, mind, not a gift. He must pay
it back.”
“I understand, sir. I’m quite agreeable to that.”
“Meantime, there’s a few shillings for you, Grace, just to keep the pot
boiling. – Now, bairns, stand in a row and say your catechism, while your
mother goes and buys some dinner; for you’ve not had much today, I’ll be
bound. You begin, Ben.”
Mr. Hall stayed till Grace came back; then he took his leave, shaking
hands with both Farren and his wife, and saying a few brief but very earnest
words of religious consolation.
With a mutual “God bless you, sir!” “God bless you, my friends!” they
separated.
↑

Chapter 9

BRIARMAINS


Messrs. Helstone and Sykes congratulated Mr. Moore when he returned
to them. He was so quiet, however, and so still and grim, that the rector, after
glancing shrewdly into his eyes, buttoned up his coat, and said to Sykes:
“Come, sir; your road and mine lie partly together. We’ll bid Moore
good-morning.”
“Where is Sugden?” demanded Moore.
“Ah, ha!” cried Helstone. “I’ve not been quite idle. While you were busy
parleying with that Farren, I opened this back window, shouted to Murgatroyd
to bring Mr. Sykes’s gig round; then I smuggled Sugden and brother Moses –
wooden leg and all – through the opening, and saw them mount the gig. Sugden
took the reins, and in another quarter of an hour Barraclough will be safe in
Stilbro’ jail.”
“Very good; thank you,” said Moore; “and good-morning, gentlemen.”
He politely conducted them to the door.
He was taciturn and serious the rest of the day. He did not even bandy
repartee with Joe Scott, who looked at him a good deal out of the corners of his
eyes, and as he was locking up for the day, observed that it was a grand
evening, and he “could wish Mr. Moore to take a bit of a walk up th’ Hollow. It
would do him good.”
At this, Mr. Moore burst into a short laugh, and after demanding whether
Joe took him for a woman or a child, he seized the keys from his hand, and
shoved him out by the shoulders. He called him back, however, to ask:
“Joe, do you know those Farrens? They are not well off, I suppose?”
“No, sir, for they’ve not had work for three month. They’ve selled most
o’ t’ stuff out o’ th’ house.”
“He was not a bad workman?”
“Ye never had a better, sir.”
“And decent people – the family?”
“None dacenter. Th’ wife’s a raight cant body, and so clean ye mught eat
your porridge off th’ floor. They’re sorely comed down. I wish William could
get a job as gardener or summat; he understands gardening.”
“You can go, Joe. You need not stand there staring at me.”
“Ye’ve no orders to give, sir?”
“None. Take yourself off.”
Which Joe did accordingly.
Though this had been a fine day, the air chilled at sunset, the ground
crisped, and by dusk frost was insidiously stealing over the grass. It whitened
the pavement in front of Briarmains, Mr. Yorke’s house, and made silent havoc
among the tender plants in his garden.
In the moonless night, lights from the windows shone vividly. This was
no lonely scene; Briarmains stood near the highway. It was an old place, built
before the highway was cut. Briarfield town lay scarce a mile off; its hum was
heard, its glare distinctly seen. Briar Chapel, a large, new, raw Wesleyan place
of worship, rose a hundred yards distant; and as there was a prayer-meeting
being held within its walls, its windows cast a bright reflection on the road,
while a hymn roused cheery echoes. The words were distinctly audible, sung
with a jaunty buoyancy:
 “Oh! who can explain
 This struggle for life,
 This travail and pain,
 This trembling and strife?”
After the hymn followed clamorous prayer, accompanied by fearful
groans and frantic shouts, and more noisy singing.
Briarmains was quieter. Its windows too were aglow; curtains concealed
the interior, but did not entirely muffle the sound of voices and laughter. We are
privileged to enter that front door, and to join Mr. Yorke’s family within.
This is the usual sitting-room of an evening. Those windows are of
brilliantly-stained glass, with purple and amber glittering round a medallion in
the centre of each, representing the heads of Shakespeare and Milton. Some
Canadian views hang on the walls – green forest and blue water – and in the
midst of them blazes a night-eruption of Vesuvius.
The fire is heaped high in the ample chimney. Mr. Yorke sits beside it
with a book; but he is not reading – he is watching his children. Opposite him
sits his lady: a large woman of grave aspect, wearing an expression of care – the
sort of care of a person who deems it her duty to be gloomy. In Mrs. Yorke’s
opinion, to be cheerful was to be frivolous. Yet she was a very good wife, a
careful mother, looked after her children unceasingly, and was sincerely
attached to her husband; although if she could, she would not have allowed him
any friend in the world besides herself.
Mr. Yorke and she agreed perfectly well; yet he was a social, hospitable
man, and in his youth, as has been said, he liked lively, cheerful women. Why
he chose her is puzzling. But Yorke had a shadowy side as well as a sunny side
to his character, and his shadowy side found sympathy in his wife’s overcast
nature. For the rest, she was a strong-minded woman; never said a weak or a
trite thing; was rather stern and cynical; considered herself right, and the rest of
the world all wrong. Her main fault was a brooding suspicion of all men, things
and beliefs, which hindered her vision.
It may be supposed that the children of such a pair were not likely to turn
out commonplace beings; and they were not. You see six of them, reader. The
youngest is a baby on the mother’s knee. It is all her own still, and therefore she
loves it.
The two next are girls, Rose and Jessy; they are both at their father’s
knee; they seldom go near their mother, except when obliged to do so. Rose, the
elder, is twelve years old; she is like her father, but softened, with round cheeks
and grey eyes lit by a serious soul – a young soul yet, but it will mature; and
neither father nor mother have a spirit to compare with it. Rose is sometimes a
stubborn girl, with a mind thick-sown with the germs of ideas her mother never
knew. She has never rebelled yet; but if hard driven, she will rebel one day.
Rose loves her father, for he is good to her. He sometimes fears she will not live
long, and this idea makes him sadly tender to her.
He has no idea that little Jessy will die young, she is so gay and
chattering, arch and original; by turns gentle and rattling; exacting, yet
generous; fearless of her mother, yet reliant on anyone who will help her. Jessy,
with her engaging prattle and winning ways, is made to be a pet, and her
father’s pet she accordingly is.
Let us hold up a magic mirror, and see their destinies.
This place is unfamiliar, but the stone crosses are not; we recognize the
cypress and the yew. Here is the place where Jessy sleeps. Much loved was she,
much loving. Her death was tranquil and happy in Rose’s arms, for Rose had
been her stay and defence through many trials.
Now, behold Rose two years later. This landscape is far from England;
remote must be those wild, luxuriant shores. Unknown birds flutter round the
skirts of that forest; no European river this, on whose banks Rose sits thinking.
The little quiet Yorkshire girl is a lonely emigrant in the southern hemisphere.
Will she ever come back?
The three eldest of the family are all boys – Matthew, Mark, and Martin.
They are seated together in the corner, their three heads much alike at first
glance. Dark-haired, dark-eyed, red-cheeked are the whole trio; yet a distinctive
character belongs to each.
Matthew, the first-born, seems to have an affinity to one picture in the
room – the eruption of Vesuvius. Flame and shadow make up that lad’s soul, no
English sunshine. You would say he is an Italian stiletto in a sheath of British
workmanship. Look at his scowl. Mr. Yorke sees it, and in a low voice he
pleads, “Mark and Martin, don’t anger your brother.” This is the tone adopted
by both parents. Matthew is never to be vexed, never to be opposed; they avert
provocation from him as assiduously as they would avert fire from a barrel of
gunpowder. They are fast making him a tyrant. The younger children feel this,
and rebel against the injustice. The dragon’s teeth are already sown; discord
will one day be the harvest.
Mark is a bonny-looking boy. He is calm and shrewd; he can say the
driest, most cutting things in the quietest of tones. Despite his tranquillity, a
somewhat heavy brow speaks of temper. Life will never have much joy in it for
Mark. By the time he is five-and-twenty he will wonder why people ever laugh,
and think merry men are all fools. Mark is now fourteen, but his soul is already
thirty.
Martin, the youngest of the three, has another nature. Life may, or may
not, be brief for him, but it will certainly be brilliant. He will pass through all its
illusions, half believe in them, wholly enjoy them, then outlive them. The boy is
plainer than his brothers; but at near twenty he will become handsome. For a
space he will be a vain puppy, eager for pleasure and admiration, but also
thirsty for knowledge. And what next? I know not.
Altogether, there is much mental power in those six young Yorke heads,
much originality and vigour of brain. Mr. Yorke knows this, and is proud of
them. Yorkshire has such families here and there – peculiar, racy, strong and
clever; somewhat turbulent and proud, wanting polish, but sound and spirited.
A low tap is heard at the parlour door.
“Come in,” says Mrs. Yorke, in her funereal tone. And in comes Robert
Moore.
Moore’s habitual gravity has recommended him to Mrs. Yorke. She has
not yet tried to stop her husband from seeing him; she has not yet found out that
Moore is a wolf in sheep’s clothing – a discovery which she made soon after
marriage about most of her husband’s bachelor friends, excluding them from
her house accordingly.
“Well, is it you?” she says to Mr. Moore. “What are you roving about at
this time of night for? You should be at home.”
“Can a single man be said to have a home, madam?” he asks.
“Pooh!” says Mrs. Yorke. “You need not talk nonsense to me; a single
man can have a home if he likes. Pray, does not your sister make a home for
you?”
“When I was Robert’s age I had five or six sisters,” said Mr. Yorke, “but
it did not hinder me from looking out for a wife.”
“And sorely he has repented marrying me,” added Mrs. Yorke, who liked
occasionally to crack a dry jest against matrimony, even at her own expense.
“He has repented it in sackcloth and ashes, Robert Moore, as you may well
believe when you see his punishment” (here she pointed to her children). “Who
would burden themselves with such great, rough lads as those, if they could
help it? Young sir, when you feel tempted to marry, look twice before you
leap.”
“I am not tempted now, at any rate. I think these are not times for
marrying.”
Mrs. Yorke nodded in approval; but she said, “That wisdom will be upset
by the first fancy that crosses you. Sit down, sir.”
He had no sooner obeyed than little Jessy jumped from her father’s knee
and ran into Mr. Moore’s arms, which were promptly held out to receive her.
“He is married now, or as good,” said she to her mother, quite
indignantly, as she was lifted lightly to his knee, “for he promised that I should
be his wife last summer, the first time he saw me in my new frock. Didn’t he,
father?”
“Ay, my little lassie, he promised; I’ll bear witness. He is false.”
“He is not false. He is too bonny to be false,” said Jessy, looking up
confidently at her tall sweetheart.
“Bonny!” cried Mr. Yorke. “That’s the proof that he’s a scoundrel.”
“But he looks too sorrowful to be false,” interposed Rose quietly. “If he
was always laughing, I should think he forgot promises soon, but Mr. Moore
never laughs.”
“Your sentimental buck is the greatest cheat of all, Rose,” remarked Mr.
Yorke.
“He’s not sentimental,” said Rose.
Mr. Moore turned to her, surprised and smiling.
“How do you know I am not sentimental, Rose?”
“Because I heard a lady say you were not.”
“A lady!” exclaimed Mr. Yorke. “That has quite a romantic twang. We
must guess who it is. Rosy, whisper the name to your father.”
“Rose, don’t be forward,” interrupted Mrs. Yorke, “nor Jessy either. All
children, especially girls, should be silent in the presence of their elders.”
“Why have we tongues, then?” asked Jessy pertly; while Rose only
looked at her mother with grave deliberation, before asking, “And why
especially girls, mother?”
“Firstly, because I say so; and secondly, because reserve is a girl’s best
wisdom.”
“My dear madam,” observed Moore, “what you say is excellent; but
really it does not apply to these little ones. Let Rose and Jessy talk. I like their
prattle; it does me good.”
“Does it not?” asked Jessy. “More good than the rough lads. There are
plenty of people who take notice of the boys. When gentlemen come here to
dine, it is always the boys that are talked to, and never Rose and me. Mr. Moore
is our friend. But mind, Rose, he’s not so much your friend as he is mine.
Remember that!” And she held up her small hand with a warning gesture.
Rose was quite accustomed to be admonished by that small hand. Her will
daily bent itself to that of the impetuous little Jessy. On pleasant occasions
Jessy took the lead, and Rose fell quietly into the background; whereas in the
difficulties of life, Rose took her sister’s share upon her, as well as her own.
Jessy had already decided that when she married, Rose, an old maid, would live
with her, look after her children and keep her house. Jessy possessed charm;
while Rose had a fine, generous, true soul, but charm she had not.
“Now, Rose, tell me the name of this lady who denied that I was
sentimental,” urged Mr. Moore.
“I don’t know her name.”
“What was she like? Where did you see her?”
“When Jessy and I went to spend the day with Kate and Susan Pearson,
the Misses Sykes were sitting in Mrs. Pearson’s drawing-room talking about
you.”
“Good. Were they abusing me, Rosy?”
“Some of them called you a misanthrope. I looked for it in the dictionary
when I came home. It means a man-hater. And Hannah Sykes said you were a
solemn puppy.”
“Better!” cried Mr. Yorke, laughing. “Oh, excellent! Hannah’s a fine girl,
but half-witted.”
“A solemn puppy, indeed!” said Moore. “Well, Rose, go on.”
“Miss Pearson said you were affected, and that with your dark hair and
pale face you looked like a sentimental noodle.”
Again Mr. Yorke laughed. Mrs. Yorke even joined in this time. “You see
in what esteem you are held,” said she; “yet I believe Miss Pearson would like
to catch you.”
“And who contradicted her, Rosy?” inquired Moore.
“A lady whom I don’t know, though every Sunday at church she sits in
the pew near the pulpit. She is like a picture in our dining-room, that woman
with the dove in her hand – at least she has eyes like it, and a straight nose, that
makes her face look, somehow, clear.”
“And you don’t know her!” exclaimed Jessy, in a tone of exceeding
surprise. “Mr. Moore, I often wonder what world my sister lives in. To think of
her going to church every Sunday, and never asking that person’s name. She
means Caroline Helstone, the rector’s niece. She was quite angry with Anne
Pearson. She said, ‘Robert Moore is neither affected nor sentimental; you
mistake his character utterly.’ Miss Helstone is nice; she has a pretty white
slender throat; she has long soft curls; she speaks quietly, and she never makes
a bustle in moving; she often wears a grey silk dress; she is neat all over. She is
what I call a lady, and when I am as tall as she is, I mean to be like her. Shall I
suit you if I am? Will you really marry me?”
Moore stroked Jessy’s hair, but then put her a little farther off.
“Oh! you won’t have me? You push me away.”
“Why, Jessy, you care nothing about me. You never come to see me now
at the Hollow.”
“Because you don’t ask me.”
Hereupon Mr. Moore gave both the little girls an invitation to visit next
day, promising that, as he was going to Stilbro’ in the morning, he would buy
them each a present. Jessy was about to reply, when one of the boys broke in:
“I know that Miss Helstone you have been palavering about. She’s an
ugly girl. I hate her. I hate all womenites. I wonder what they were made for.”
“Martin!” said his father. “Martin, my lad, thou’rt a swaggering whelp
now; thou wilt some day be an outrageous puppy. But stick to those sentiments
of thine. See, I’ll write down the words now i’ my pocket-book. Ten years
hence, Martin, I’ll remind thee of that speech.”
“I’ll say the same then. I mean always to hate women. They’re such dolls;
they do nothing but dress themselves finely, and go swimming about to be
admired. I’ll never marry.”
“Stick to it! – Hesther” (addressing his wife), “I was like him when I was
his age; and, behold! by the time I was three-and-twenty I curled my hair every
night, and wore a ring i’ my ear, and would have worn one i’ my nose if it
might charm the ladies. Martin will do the like.”
Martin looked disdainful, but made no reply. Meantime Mark, who had
been rummaging amongst some books on a side-table, spoke in a slow, quiet
voice, and with an ironic expression.
“Mr. Moore,” said he, “you think perhaps it was a compliment on Miss
Caroline Helstone’s part to say you were not sentimental. You turned red, as if
you felt flattered. I’ve been looking up ‘sentimental’ in the dictionary, and I
find it to mean ‘tinctured with sentiment.’ And ‘sentiment’ means thought, idea,
notion. A sentimental man, then, is one who has thoughts and ideas; an
unsentimental man is one without thoughts or ideas.”
Rose replied. “There are different kinds of thoughts and ideas, good and
bad. Miss Helstone must have taken sentimental to mean having bad thoughts,
for she was not blaming Mr. Moore; she was defending him, just as I should
have done in her place, for the other ladies seemed to speak spitefully.”
“Ladies always speak spitefully,” observed Martin. “It is the nature of
womenites to be spiteful.”
Matthew now spoke for the first time. “What a fool Martin is, always
gabbling about what he does not understand!”
“It is my privilege, as a freeman, to gabble on whatever subject I like,”
responded Martin.
“You ought to have been a slave,” rejoined the elder brother.
“A slave!”
“Mountebank!” said Matthew.
“Lads, be silent!” exclaimed Mr. Yorke. “Martin, you are a mischiefmaker.”
“Did I begin, or Matthew? He accused me of gabbling like a fool!”
“A presumptuous fool!” repeated Matthew.
Here Mrs. Yorke began rocking herself – rather a portentous movement
with her, as it was occasionally followed by a fit of hysterics, especially when
Matthew was worsted in a conflict.
“I don’t see what right Matthew has to use bad language to me,” said
Martin.
“He has no right, my lad; but forgive your brother until seventy-andseven times,” said Mr. Yorke soothingly.
“Always the same!” murmured Martin, leaving the room.
“Where art thou going, my son?” asked the father.
“Somewhere where I shall be safe from insult. I suppose I may go?”
Matthew laughed insolently. Martin threw a strange look at him, and
trembled; but he restrained himself.
“Go, my lad,” said Mr. Yorke; “but remember not to bear malice.”
Martin went, and Matthew sent another insolent laugh after him. Rose,
lifting her fair head from Moore’s shoulder, said to Matthew, “Martin is
grieved, and you are glad; but I would rather be Martin than you. I dislike your
nature.”
Here Mr. Moore, by way of averting a scene, stood up and kissed Jessy
and Rose, reminding them to come to the Hollow tomorrow afternoon. He said
to Mr. Yorke:
“May I speak a word with you?”
They conferred briefly in the hall.
“Have you employment for a good workman?” asked Moore.
“A nonsense question in these times, when you know that every master
has many good workmen to whom he cannot give work.”
“Oblige me by taking on this man, if possible. I must find him a place
somewhere.”
“Who is he?”
“William Farren.”
“I know William. An honest man.”
“He has been out of work three months. He has a large family. He was
one of the cloth-dressers who came to me this morning to complain and
threaten. William did not threaten. He only asked me to give them more time,
but you know I cannot do that. I sent them away, after arresting a rascal
amongst them – a fellow who preaches at the chapel yonder.”
“Not Moses Barraclough?”
“Yes. But I’m determined to get Farren a place, and I rely on you to give
him one.”
“This is cool!” exclaimed Mr. Yorke. “What right have you to rely on me
to provide for your dismissed workmen? I’ve heard he’s an honest man, but am
I to support all the honest men in Yorkshire? I’ll none of it.”
“Come, Mr. Yorke, what can you find for him to do? You have land. Find
him some work on your land, Mr. Yorke.”
“Bob, I thought you cared nothing about the workmen. I don’t understand
this change.”
“The fellow spoke truth and sense, while the others merely jabbered. Let
him have work.”
“Let him have it yourself, if you are so very much in earnest.”
“I received letters this morning which showed me pretty clearly where I
stand,” said Moore, “and it is not far off the end of the plank. If there is no
change – if the Orders in Council are not suspended – I do not know where I am
to turn. I see no light, and for me to pretend to offer a man a livelihood would
be dishonest.”
“Come, let us take a turn outside. It is a starlit night,” said Mr. Yorke.
They went out, and paced the frost-white pavement.
 “You have large fruit-gardens at Yorke Mills,” urged Mr. Moore. “Farren
is a good gardener. Give him work there.”
“Well, I’ll send for him tomorrow, and we’ll see. And now, my lad,
you’re concerned about your affairs?”
“Yes. A second failure would blight the name of Moore completely; and
you are aware I had fine intentions of paying off every debt and re-establishing
the old firm.”
“You need capital – that’s all.”
“Yes; but you might as well say that breath is all a dead man needs to
live.”
“If you were married with a family, I should think your case pretty
desperate; but you’re young and unencumbered. I hear gossip now and then
about your being on the eve of marriage with this miss and that; but I suppose
none of it is true?”
“I am not in a position to be dreaming of marriage. Marriage! I cannot
bear the word; it sounds so silly and utopian. I have decided that marriage and
love are only for the rich; or the deeply wretched, who never hope to rise out of
the slough of utter poverty.”
“If I were you, I should think I could very likely get a wife with a few
thousands, who would suit both me and my affairs. Would you try if you had a
chance?”
“I don’t know.”
“Would you take an old woman?”
“I’d rather break stones on the road.”
“So would I,” said Yorke. “Would you take an ugly one?”
“Bah! I won’t have an ugly wife.”
“Not if she were rich?”
“Not if she were dressed in gems. I could not love her – I could not
endure her. My disgust would break out in despotism, or worse – freeze to utter
iciness.”
“What! Bob, if you married an honest, good-natured, wealthy lass, though
a little hard-favoured, couldn’t you put up with the plain features?”
“I’ll never try, I tell you. I will have youth, and beauty.”
“And poverty, and a nursery full of bairns you can neither clothe nor feed,
and very soon an anxious, faded mother; and then bankruptcy and a life-long
struggle.”
“Let me alone, Yorke.”
“If you are romantic, Robert, and especially if you are already in love, it
is of no use talking.”
“I am not romantic.”
 “And there is no love affair to disturb your judgment?”
“I thought I had said that before.”
“Well, then, there is no reason why you should not profit by a good
chance if it offers; therefore, wait and see. I promise ye naught and I advise ye
naught; but keep your heart up. Go home, now. Miss Hortense will be
wondering where ye are.”
↑

Chapter 10

OLD MAIDS


Spring matured, and the surface of England began to look pleasant: her
fields grew green, her gardens bloomed; but at heart she was no better. Still her
poor were wretched, still their employers were harassed. Commerce seemed
threatened with paralysis, for the war continued; England’s blood was shed and
her wealth lavished, it seemed, in vain. There were occasionally tidings of
successes in the Peninsula, but these came in slowly. Men like Yorke and
Moore, shuddering on the verge of bankruptcy, insisted on peace with the
energy of desperation.
The British merchant classes are intensely selfish. They think exclusively
of making money; they are oblivious of every national consideration but that of
extending England’s commerce. Chivalry is dead in their hearts. Tradesmen
profess to hate war because it is bloody and barbarous; you would think, to hear
them talk, that they are gentle and kindly to their fellow-men. This is not the
case. Many of them are extremely narrow and cold-hearted; distant, even
hostile, to all classes but their own, questioning their very right to exist. Long
may it be ere England really becomes a nation of shop-keepers!
Moore was no self-sacrificing patriot, and spoke out against the war.
Sometimes, by flashes, he felt there was little reason in his demands. When he
heard of all Europe threatened by Bonaparte, and arming to resist him; when he
saw Russia menaced, and Russia rising, incensed and stern, to defend her
frozen soil, he knew that England could not make concessions to the grasping
French leader. When he read Lord Wellington’s dispatches in the newspapers,
Moore felt that vigilant commander must win victory in the end. But the end, he
thought, was still far off; and meantime he, Moore, would be crushed, his hopes
ground to dust. It was himself he had to care for.
He soon came to a decisive rupture with his old Tory friend the rector.
They quarrelled at a public meeting, and afterwards exchanged some pungent
letters in the newspapers. Mr. Helstone denounced Moore as a Jacobin, and
would not speak to him when they met. He told his niece that her
communications with Hollow’s Cottage must cease; she must give up taking
French lessons. The language, he observed, was a bad and frivolous one, and
most works in French were highly injurious to weak female minds. Caroline
must give up French, and give up her cousins too. They were dangerous people.
Mr. Helstone quite expected tears. He had a vague idea that she was fond
of going to Hollow’s Cottage; also he suspected that she liked Robert Moore’s
occasional presence at the rectory. He had perceived that when the Irish curate
Malone visited, Caroline would disappear upstairs, and remain invisible till
called down to supper. On the other hand, when Robert Moore was the guest,
she stayed in the room, quietly stitching pin-cushions. Robert paid her little
attention; but Mr. Helstone had watched them when they bade each other goodnight. He had seen their eyes meet only once. There was nothing in that glance
to offend: only Moore smiled slightly, and Caroline coloured as slightly.
Mr. Helstone was annoyed. Why? Impossible to say. If you had asked
him, he would have stormed against flirtation and love-making, and vowed he
would have no such folly going on under his roof.
For this reason, as well as political ones, he resolved to separate the
cousins. He announced his will to Caroline one evening as she was sitting at
work near the drawing-room window. The light fell on her face, and it struck
him that she was looking paler and quieter than she used to. He had noticed that
Robert Moore’s name had never, for some three weeks, dropped from her lips;
nor had Moore during that time visited the rectory. Some suspicion of secret
meetings haunted Mr. Helstone. He thought women needed constant watching.
In a dryly significant tone he desired Caroline to cease her daily visits to the
Hollow. He expected a start; but saw only a very slight one.
“Do you hear me?” he asked.
“Yes, uncle.”
“Of course you mean to attend to what I say?”
“Yes, certainly.”
“And there must be no letter-scribbling to your cousin Hortense – no
communication whatever. I do not approve of the principles of the family. They
are Jacobinical.”
“Very well,” said Caroline quietly. There was no vexed flushing of the
face, no gathering tears; she was thoughtful and obedient.
Yes, perfectly; because the order coincided with her own decision. It was
now painful to her to go to Hollow’s Cottage; nothing met her there but
disappointment. Hope and love had left that little house, for Robert seemed to
have deserted it. Whenever she asked after him, he was away from home, or
taken up with business.
Only at church had Caroline the chance of seeing him, and there she
rarely looked at him. It was both too much pain and too much pleasure to look –
it brought too much emotion; and that it was all wasted emotion she had learned
to comprehend.
Once, on a dark, wet Sunday, when there were few people at church,
Caroline had allowed her eye to seek Robert’s pew. He was there alone.
Hortense had been kept at home by the rain. He sat with folded arms and eyes
cast down, looking very sad and abstracted. By instinct Caroline knew that his
thoughts were far away, not merely from her, but from all in which she could
sympathize. He was wrapped up in responsibilities in which she could have no
part.
She speculated on his feelings, on his life, on his fears, on his fate; mused
over the mystery of “business,” tried to understand its perplexities and duties,
and to enter into his state of mind, to feel what he would feel. She wished
earnestly to see things as they were, and not to be romantic. By dint of effort
she contrived to get a glimpse of the truth here and there.
“Different, indeed,” she concluded, “is Robert’s mental condition to mine.
I think only of him; he has no leisure to think of me. Love is the chief emotion
of my heart – always there, always awake. Quite other feelings absorb him. He
is rising now to leave the church, for service is over. Will he turn his head
towards me? No. That is hard. A kind glance would have made me happy till
tomorrow. He would not give it; he is gone. Strange that grief should now
almost choke me, because another human’s eye has failed to greet mine.”
That Sunday evening, when Mr. Malone came as usual to visit his rector,
Caroline withdrew to her chamber, where Fanny had lit her a fire. Closeted
there, silent and solitary, what could she do but think? She noiselessly paced to
and fro, her head drooped, her hands folded.
Mute was the room, mute the house. The double door of the study
muffled the voices of the gentlemen. She had a religious book open on the
table, but she could not read it. Its theology was incomprehensible to her, and
her own mind was too busy to listen to the language of another mind.
Her imagination was full of pictures – images of Moore, scenes where he
and she had been together; winter fireside sketches; a hot summer afternoon in
Nunnely Wood; mild spring or mellow autumn moments, when she had sat at
his side in Hollow’s Copse, listening to the call of the May cuckoo, or sharing
the September treasure of nuts and blackberries.
Robert’s face was with her; his voice was quite distinct in her ear; his few
caresses seemed renewed. But the pictures faded, the voice failed, and where
the warm lips had made impress on her forehead, it felt now as if a cold
raindrop had fallen. She returned to the real world: she saw her narrow
chamber, and heard the rain on the window; for companionship she had own
dim shadow on the wall.
Sitting down, she said to herself, “I have to live, perhaps, till I am
seventy. Half a century of existence may lie before me. How am I to occupy it?
What am I to do to fill the time which spreads between me and the grave?”
She reflected.
“I shall not be married, it appears,” she continued. “I suppose, as Robert
does not care for me, I shall never have a husband to love, nor little children to
take care of. Till lately I had reckoned securely on the duties and affections of
wife and mother to occupy my existence; but now I perceive plainly I may have
been mistaken. Probably I shall be an old maid. I shall live to see Robert
married to some rich lady. I shall never marry. What was I created for, I
wonder? Where is my place in the world?”
She mused again.
“Ah! that is the question which most old maids are puzzled to solve.
Other people solve it for them by saying, ‘Your place is to do good and help
others.’ That is right in some measure, and a very convenient doctrine for the
people who hold it; but I perceive that certain sets of human beings are very apt
to say that other sets should give up their lives to them, and then they reward
them by calling them devoted and virtuous. Is this enough? Is there not a
terrible hollowness, mockery, want, in that existence which is given away to
others? I suspect there is. Does virtue lie in denial of self? I do not believe it.
Undue humility creates tyranny in others; weak concession creates selfishness.
Each human being has his share of rights. Queer thoughts these that surge in my
mind. Are they right thoughts? I am not certain.
“Well, life is short at the best. Seventy years, they say, pass like a dream;
and every path trod by human feet ends in the grave, the furrow where the
mighty husbandman with the scythe sets the seed he has shaken from the ripe
stem; there it falls, decays, and thence it springs again, when the world has
rolled round a few times more. So much for the body. The soul meantime wings
its long flight upward, folds its wings on the brink of the sea of fire and glass,
and gazing through the burning clearness, finds there mirrored the vision of the
sovereign Father, the mediating Son, the Creator Spirit. Such words, at least,
have been chosen to express what is inexpressible. The soul’s real hereafter
who shall guess?”
Her fire was out; the study bell rang for prayers.
The next day Caroline had to spend alone, since her uncle was dining
with Dr. Boultby, vicar of Whinbury. The whole time she talked inwardly in the
same way, asking what she was to do with life. Fanny, passing in and out of the
room on housemaid errands, perceived that her young mistress sat very still,
always in the same place, always bent over a piece of work. She did not lift her
head to speak to Fanny as usual, and when Fanny remarked that the day was
fine, and that she ought to take a walk, she only said, “It is cold.”
“You are very diligent at that sewing, Miss Caroline.”
“I am tired of it, Fanny.”
“Then why do you go on with it? Put it down. Read, or do something to
amuse you.”
“It is lonely in this house, Fanny. Don’t you think so?”
“I don’t find it so, miss. Me and Eliza are company for one another; but
you are too still. You should visit more. Go upstairs and dress yourself smart,
and go and take tea with Miss Mann or Miss Ainley. I am certain either of those
ladies would be delighted to see you.”
“But their houses are dismal: they are both old maids. I am certain old
maids are a very unhappy race.”
“Not they, miss. They can’t be unhappy; they take such care of
themselves. They are all selfish.”
“Miss Ainley is not selfish, Fanny. She is always doing good. How
devotedly kind she was to her step-mother while the old lady lived; and now
when she is quite alone in the world, how charitable she is to the poor, as far as
her means permit! Still nobody thinks much of her; and gentlemen always sneer
at her!”
“They shouldn’t, miss. I believe she is a good woman. But gentlemen
think only of ladies’ looks.”
“I’ll go and see her,” exclaimed Caroline, starting up; “and if she asks me
to stay to tea, I’ll stay. How wrong it is to neglect people because they are not
pretty and young! And I will call to see Miss Mann too. She may not be
amiable, but what has made her unamiable? What has life been to her?”
Fanny helped her dress. “You’ll not be an old maid, Miss Caroline,” she
said, as she tied the sash of her brown silk frock, and smoothed her shining
curls; “there are no signs of an old maid about you.”
Caroline looked at the mirror. She could see that she had altered within
the last month; her complexion was paler, her eyes were circled with shadow;
she was not so pretty or so fresh as she used to be. She hinted this to Fanny,
who answered that at her age a little falling away signified nothing; she would
soon come round again, and be rosier than ever. Fanny then showed singular
zeal in wrapping her up in warm shawls, till Caroline was smothered with the
weight.
She paid her visits – first to Miss Mann, for this was the most difficult
point. Miss Mann was certainly not quite a lovable person. Caroline had always
declared she disliked her, and more than once she had joined her cousin Robert
in laughing at her. Moore was not usually sarcastic, especially about people
weaker than himself; but he had once or twice been present when Miss Mann
had visited his sister, and after a while he had gone out into the garden where
Caroline was tending flowers. While watching her he had amused himself with
comparing fair, delicate youth with shrivelled age, livid and loveless, and had
repeated to the smiling girl the vinegar discourse of the sour old maid. Caroline
had said to him:
“Ah! Robert, you do not like old maids. I, too, should come under the lash
of your sarcasm if I were an old maid.”
“You an old maid!” he had replied. “A strange idea coming from those
lips. I can imagine you, though, at forty, quietly dressed, pale and sunk, but still
with those soft eyes. I suppose, too, you will keep your voice, unlike that hard,
deep voice of Miss Mann’s. Courage, Cary! Even at fifty you will not be
repulsive.”
“Miss Mann did not make herself, or her voice, Robert.”
“Nature made her in the mood in which she makes briars and thorns;
whereas for the creation of some women she reserves the May morning hours,
when she makes the primrose and the lily.”
Today, ushered into Miss Mann’s little parlour, Caroline found her
surrounded by perfect neatness, cleanliness, and comfort, with fresh flowers in
the vase on the table, and a bright fire in the grate. Miss Mann herself sat primly
and somewhat grimly in a rocking-chair, knitting. She scarcely rose as Caroline
entered.
To avoid excitement was one of Miss Mann’s aims in life. She had been
composing herself ever since she came down in the morning, and had just
attained a state of tranquillity when the visitor’s knock at the door startled her.
She was not pleased, therefore, to see Miss Helstone. She received her with
reserve, bade her be seated with austerity, and then fixed her with her eye.
This was no ordinary doom – to be fixed with Miss Mann’s eye. Robert
Moore had undergone it once, and had never forgotten it. He considered it quite
equal to anything Medusa could do.
Certainly Miss Mann had a formidable eye. It was prominent, and showed
a great deal of the white, and looked as unwinkingly at you as if it were a steel
ball soldered in her head; and when she began to talk in her dry, monotonous
tone, you felt as if a graven image of some bad spirit were addressing you. But
it was all on the surface. Miss Mann’s goblin grimness scarcely went deeper
than the angel sweetness of hundreds of beauties. She was a perfectly honest,
conscientious woman, who had performed duties in her day from whose severe
anguish many a gazelle-eyed enchantress would have shrunk appalled. She had
passed alone through long scenes of suffering, exercised rigid self-denial,
sacrificed her time, money and health for those who had repaid her by
ingratitude; and now her main – almost her sole – fault was that she was
censorious.
Censorious she certainly was. Caroline had not sat five minutes before her
hostess, still keeping her under the spell of that Gorgon gaze, began flaying
alive certain families in the neighbourhood. She went about this in a cool,
deliberate manner. If Caroline ventured to put in a softening word she set it
aside with disdain. Still, though pitiless, she was no scandal-monger. She never
spread malignant or dangerous reports. It was not her heart so much as her
temper that was wrong.
Caroline made this discovery for the first time today, and began to talk to
her softly, not in sympathizing words, but with a sympathizing voice. Miss
Mann’s loneliness struck her in a new light, as did the character of her ugliness
– a bloodless pallor, and deeply lined face. The girl pitied her; and her
tenderness touched Miss Mann in her turn. She did not usually talk about her
own affairs, because no one cared to listen; but today she did, and Caroline shed
tears as she heard her speak of cruel, slow-wasting sufferings. Well might she
be corpse-like, and never smile; well might she wish to avoid excitement!
Caroline, when she knew all, acknowledged that Miss Mann was rather to be
admired for fortitude than blamed for moroseness.
Miss Mann felt that she was partly understood, and wished to be
understood further; for however old, plain and desolate we may be, our hearts
preserve still a starved, ghostly longing for appreciation and affection. Miss
Mann, drawn on by her listener’s attention, spoke of her past life simply; she
did not boast, nor exaggerate. Caroline found that the old maid had been a
devoted daughter and sister, an unwearied watcher by lingering deathbeds; her
malady owed its origin to that long attendance on the sick. To one wretched
relative she had been a support in the depths of degradation, and she still kept
him from utter destitution.
Miss Helstone stayed the whole evening; and when she left Miss Mann it
was with the determination to try in future to excuse her faults; never again to
laugh at her; and, above all, not to neglect her, but to come once a week, and
offer her sincere affection and respect.
Caroline, on her return, told Fanny she was very glad she had gone out, as
she felt much better for the visit. The next day she sought out Miss Ainley. This
lady was poorer than Miss Mann, and her dwelling was more humble. It was,
however, if possible, yet more exquisitely clean, though Miss Ainley could not
afford to keep a servant.
Miss Ainley was very ugly. At first sight, all but very well-disciplined
minds were apt to be prejudiced against her, simply on the ground of her
unattractiveness. Then she was prim in dress and manner; she looked the
complete old maid.
Her welcome to Caroline was formal, though kind; but Miss Helstone
knew something of the benevolence of Miss Ainley’s heart; all the female
neighbourhood knew something of it. No one spoke against Miss Ainley,
except lively young gentlemen and inconsiderate old ones, who declared her
hideous.
Caroline was soon at home in that tiny parlour, installed in the most
comfortable seat near the fire. The young and the old woman were presently
deep in kindly conversation, and Caroline became aware of the power of an
unselfish and benign mind. Miss Ainley talked never of herself, always of
others: and not of their faults, but their wants and sufferings, which she longed
to alleviate. She was religious, and spoke of religion often in a way which some
people would have enjoyed ridiculing. They would have been hugely mistaken.
Sincerity is never ludicrous; it is always to be respected.
Not from Miss Ainley’s own lips did Caroline hear of her good works,
but she knew much of them nevertheless, from the poor in Briarfield. They
were not works of almsgiving. The old maid was too poor to give much. They
were the works of a Sister of Charity – far more difficult to perform than those
of a Lady Bountiful. She would watch by any sick-bed; she seemed to fear no
disease. She would nurse the poorest whom no one else would nurse. She was
serene, humble, kind, and equable through everything.
For this goodness she got little reward. Many of the poor became so
accustomed to her services that they hardly thanked her. The rich heard of them
with wonder, but were silent, from a sense of shame at the difference between
her sacrifices and their own. Many ladies, however, respected her deeply. One
gentleman – one only – gave her his friendship and perfect confidence. This
was Mr. Hall, the vicar of Nunnely, who said that her life came nearer the life
of Christ than that of any other human being he had ever met. You must not
think, reader, that Miss Ainley’s character is a figment of imagination. No. We
seek the originals of such portraits in real life only.
Miss Helstone studied well the mind and heart now revealed to her. She
found no high intellect – the old maid was merely sensible – but she discovered
so much goodness, usefulness, mildness, patience, truth, that she revered Miss
Ainley. What was her own love of nature, her sense of beauty, her fervent
emotions, compared to the practical excellence of this good woman?
It is true she still felt with pain that the life which made Miss Ainley
happy could not make her happy. Active as it was, it seemed deeply dreary,
because it was so loveless. Yet, doubtless, it needed only habit to make it
practicable. Caroline felt it was despicable to pine sentimentally, to waste youth
in aching languor, to grow old doing nothing.
“I will bestir myself,” was her resolution, “and try to be wise if I cannot
be good.”
She proceeded to ask Miss Ainley if she could help her in anything. Miss
Ainley told her of some poor families in Briarfield that she could visit, and gave
her some needlework to do for certain poor women who had many children, and
who were unskilled with the needle.
Caroline went home, and laid her plans. She allotted a portion of her time
for her studies, and a portion for doing anything Miss Ainley might direct her to
do. The remainder was to be spent in exercise; not a moment was to be left for
the indulgence of such fevered thoughts as had poisoned last Sunday evening.
To do her justice, she carried out her plans perseveringly. It was very hard
work at first, but it helped her to keep down anguish; it forced her to be busy; it
forbade her to brood; and gleams of satisfaction chequered her grey life here
and there when she found she had done some good.
Yet I must speak truth. These efforts brought her neither health of body
nor peace of mind. She grew more joyless and more wan; her memory kept
harping on the name of Robert Moore; an elegy over the past still rung
constantly in her ear; the heaviness of a broken spirit settled slow on her
buoyant youth. Winter seemed conquering her spring; the mind’s soil and its
treasures were freezing gradually to barren stagnation.
↑

Chapter 11

FIELDHEAD


Yet Caroline refused tamely to succumb. She had strength in her girl’s
heart; and men and women never struggle so hard as when they struggle alone,
unadvised and unpitied.
Caroline’s sufferings were her only spur, and being very real and sharp,
they roused her spirit keenly. Bent on victory over a mortal pain, she did her
best to quell it. Never had she been so busy, so studious, and, above all, so
active. She took long walks in all weathers. Day by day she came back in the
evening, pale and weary-looking, yet seemingly not fatigued; for as soon as she
had thrown off her bonnet and shawl, she would, instead of resting, begin to
pace her apartment. Sometimes she would not sit down till she was literally
faint.
She said she did this to tire herself well, so that she might sleep soundly at
night. But if that was her aim it was unattained; for at night, when others
slumbered, she was tossing on her pillow, or sitting at the foot of her bed in the
darkness. Often, unhappy girl! she was crying in a sort of intolerable despair,
which smote down her strength, and reduced her to childlike helplessness.
When thus prostrate, temptations besieged her. Weak suggestions
whispered in her weary heart to write to Robert, and say that she was unhappy
because she was forbidden to see him and Hortense, and beg him to remember
her. One or two such letters she actually wrote, but she never sent them: shame
and good sense stopped her.
At last she reached the point when it seemed she could bear her life no
longer, that she must find a change somehow, or her heart and head would fail
under the pressure. She longed to leave Briarfield, to go to some very distant
place.
She longed for something else too: the deep, secret, anxious yearning to
find and know her mother strengthened daily; but with the desire came doubt –
if she knew her mother, would she love her? She had never heard that mother
praised. Her uncle seemed to regard her with antipathy; an old servant, who had
lived with Mrs. James Helstone for a short time after her marriage, spoke of her
with chilling reserve, and said she did not understand her. These expressions
were ice to the daughter’s heart.
But one plan seemed likely to bring her hope of relief. It was to take a
situation as a governess; she could do nothing else. Eventually she found
courage to speak of it to her uncle.
Her long walks lay on lonely roads; but in whatever direction she had
rambled, her homeward path always led her near the Hollow. She regularly
visited its brink at twilight, and rested at a certain stile. From there she could
look down on the cottage, the mill, the dewy garden: from there was visible the
counting-house window, from whose panes at a fixed hour shone the ray of the
lamp. Her errand was to watch for this ray, her reward to catch it.
There were nights when it failed to appear. She knew then that Robert
was from home, and went away doubly sad; whereas its kindling elated her, like
the promise of some indefinite hope. If, while she gazed, a shadow appeared
before the light, her heart leaped. That was Robert; she had seen him. She
would return home comforted, and persuaded that, if she could get near him, he
might welcome her yet, he might extend his hand and draw her to him, as he
used to do. That night, though she might weep, she would fancy her tears less
scalding; her head ached less.
The shortest path from the Hollow to the rectory passed a certain
mansion: the old and tenantless dwelling called Fieldhead. Tenantless it had
been for ten years, but it was no ruin. Mr. Yorke had kept it in good repair, and
an old gardener and his wife had lived in it, cultivated the grounds, and
maintained the house.
Fieldhead was picturesque, grey and mossy: the old latticed windows, the
stone porch, the walls, the chimney-stacks, were rich in sepia lights and shades.
The trees behind were fine and spreading; the cedar on the front lawn was
grand; and the granite urns over the arch of the gateway were pleasing to the
eye.
One mild May evening Caroline, passing near about moonrise, and
unwilling yet to go home, sat down on the mossy ground near the gate of
Fieldhead, and gazed through it towards the cedar and the mansion. It was a
still, cloudless night; the gables, facing west, reflected the clear amber of the
horizon; the cedar was black. Under its dense, raven boughs a glimpse of sky
opened gravely blue. It was full of the moon, which looked solemnly down on
Caroline.
She felt the view was mournfully lovely. She wished she could be happy
and have peace. Where now was Robert? she asked. Not at the Hollow; she had
watched for his lamp, and had not seen it.
Suddenly the door within the stone porch of the hall opened, and two men
came out – one elderly and white-headed, the other young, dark-haired, and tall.
They walked across the lawn and through a gate in the garden wall. Caroline
saw them pass the stile, descend the fields and disappear. Robert Moore had
passed before her with his friend Mr. Yorke. Neither had seen her.
The apparition was fleeting; but at its electric passage her veins kindled,
her soul surged. It left her desperate.
“Oh, had he only been alone! had he only seen me!” was her cry. “He
would have said something. He would have given me his hand. He does, he
must, love me a little. Oh, Heaven is cruel!” Thus, in the utter sickness of
longing and disappointment, she went home.
The next morning at breakfast, where she appeared white-faced and
miserable-looking, she asked Mr. Helstone:
“Have you any objection, uncle, to my inquiring for a situation in a
family?”
Her uncle, ignorant of all his niece was undergoing, scarcely believed his
ears.
“What whim now? Are you bewitched? What can you mean?”
“I am not well, and need a change,” she said.
He examined her. He saw that the rose had faded to a snowdrop; her
bloom had vanished, her flesh wasted; she sat before him drooping, colourless,
and thin. But for the soft expression of her brown eyes, the delicate lines of her
features, and the flowing abundance of her hair, she would no longer have any
claim to be called pretty.
“What on earth is the matter with you?” he asked. “How are you ailing?”
No answer; only the brown eyes filled, the pale lips trembled.
“Look out for a situation, indeed! For what situation are you fit? What
have you been doing with yourself? You are not well.”
“I should be well if I left home.”
“These women are incomprehensible. They are full of unpleasant
surprises. Today you see them bouncing, red as cherries, and round as apples;
tomorrow they look as feeble as dead weeds. And why? That’s the puzzle. She
has her meals, her liberty, a good house to live in, and good clothes to wear. Yet
there she sits a poor, little, pale, puling chit. Provoking! I suppose I must send
for advice. Will you have a doctor, child?”
“No, uncle. A doctor could do me no good. I merely want change of air
and scene.”
“Well, that you can have. You shall go to a watering-place. I don’t mind
the expense. Fanny shall accompany you.”
“But, uncle, some day I must do something for myself; I have no fortune.
I had better begin now.”
“While I live, you shall not be a governess, Caroline. I will not have it
said that my niece is a governess.”
“But the later in life one makes a change of that sort, uncle, the more
difficult and painful it is. I should wish to get accustomed to the work.”
“I beg you will not harass me, Caroline. I mean to provide for you. Bless
me! I am only fifty-five; my health is excellent. There is plenty of time to take
measures. Don’t make yourself anxious about the future. Is that what frets
you?”
“No, uncle; but I long for a change.”
He laughed. “There speaks the very woman!” cried he. “A change!
Always fantastical and whimsical! Well, it’s in her sex.”
“But it is not fantasy and whim, uncle. It is necessity, I think. I feel
weaker than formerly. I believe I should have more to do.”
“Admirable! She feels weak, and therefore she should be set to hard
labour. There are two guineas to buy a new frock. Come, Cary, never fear.”
“Uncle, I wish you were less generous and more–”
“More what?”
Sympathizing was the word on Caroline’s lips, but she checked herself.
Her uncle would have laughed at that namby-pamby word.
Finding her silent, he said, “The fact is, you don’t know precisely what
you want.”
“Only to be a governess.”
“Pooh! mere nonsense! Don’t mention it again. I have finished breakfast.
Ring the bell, and then run away and amuse yourself.”
“What with? My doll?” asked Caroline to herself as she quitted the room.
A week or two passed; her bodily and mental health neither grew worse
nor better. She was now precisely in that state when, if her constitution had
contained the seeds of consumption or slow fever, those diseases would have
rapidly developed, and would soon have carried her quietly from the world.
People never die of love or grief alone. If they have no other malady, they may
become pale and thin, but they live on; and though they cannot regain youth
and gaiety, they may regain strength and serenity.
Everyone noticed the change in Miss Helstone’s appearance, and most
people said she was going to die. She never thought so herself. Her appetite was
diminished; she knew it was because she wept so much at night. Her strength
was lessened; she could account for it. Sleep was hard, and her dreams were
distressing. But she felt that in the far future this time of misery should be got
over, and she should once more be calm, though perhaps never again happy.
Meanwhile her uncle urged her to visit their acquaintance. This she
evaded doing. She could not be cheerful in company; she felt she was observed
with more curiosity than sympathy. Old ladies were always offering her their
advice, recommending remedies; young ladies looked at her in a way from
which she shrank. Their eyes said they knew she had been “disappointed”; by
whom, they were not certain.
Commonplace young ladies can be quite as worldly and hard as
commonplace young gentlemen. Grief and calamity they despise; they regard
them as the judgments of God on the lowly. With them, to “love” is merely to
contrive a scheme for achieving a good match; to be “disappointed” is to have
their scheme frustrated.
All this Caroline knew, and she kept her pale face and wasted figure as
much out of sight as she could. Living thus in seclusion, she ceased to hear
news of the little events of the neighbourhood.
One morning her uncle came into the parlour, where she sat trying to find
some pleasure in painting wild flowers, and said to her in his abrupt manner,
“Come, child, leave that work. Get your bonnet on. I want you to make a call
with me.”
“With you, uncle?” She was surprised; she was not accustomed to make
calls with her uncle.
“Quick! I have no time to lose. I am going to Fieldhead.”
“Fieldhead! Why?”
“We are going to see Miss Shirley Keeldar. She has been at Fieldhead a
week. I met her at a party last night – that party to which you would not go. I
was pleased with her. I choose that you shall make her acquaintance. It will do
you good.”
“She is now twenty-one and come of age, I suppose?”
“Yes, and will reside for a time on her property. I lectured her on the
subject; I showed her her duty. She is not intractable. She is rather a fine girl;
nothing lackadaisical about her.”
“I don’t think she will want to see me. What good can I do her?”
“Pshaw! Put your bonnet on.”
“Is she proud, uncle?”
“Don’t know. She holds her head high, and probably can be saucy
enough. She wouldn’t be a woman otherwise. Away now for your bonnet at
once!”
Caroline was not naturally very confident, and her depression of spirits
had not increased her courage to face strangers. She quailed as she and her
uncle walked up the broad approach to Fieldhead. She followed Mr. Helstone
reluctantly into the sombre old hallway.
Very sombre it was – long, vast, and dark; one window lit it dimly. The
wide old chimney contained no fire; it was filled instead with willow-boughs.
The high gallery, opposite the entrance, was in shadow. Carved stags’ heads,
with real antlers, looked down grotesquely from the walls. This was neither a
grand nor a comfortable house; it was antique, rambling, and inconvenient. A
property of a thousand a year belonged to it, which had descended, for lack of
male heirs, on a female. There were richer families in the district, but the
Keeldars were the oldest family, and as lords of the manor, took precedence.
Mr. and Miss Helstone were ushered into a gloomy, oak-lined parlour,
furnished in old style. On each side of the high mantelpiece stood two antique
chairs of oak, solid as thrones, and in one of these sat a lady. But if this were
Miss Keeldar, she must have come of age at least twenty years ago. She was
matronly, and her attire was plain and old-fashioned to the point of eccentricity.
This lady received the visitors with a mixture of ceremony and diffidence.
She seemed anxious to be proper, yet uncertain and embarrassed. Miss Helstone
felt this, sympathized with the stranger, and knowing by experience what was
good for the timid, took a seat quietly and began to talk to her with a gentle
ease, made confident for the moment by the presence of one less self-possessed
than herself.
She and this lady would, if alone, have got on extremely well together.
The lady had a soft and tuneful voice, which Caroline liked; it atoned for the
formal manner. In ten minutes they would have been friends. But Mr. Helstone
stood on the rug looking at the strange lady with his keen, sarcastic eye,
impatient at her lack of aplomb. His hard gaze discomfited the lady. She tried to
make little speeches about the weather, etc.; but Mr. Helstone found himself
somewhat deaf. Whatever she said he pretended not to hear distinctly, and she
was obliged to go over each elaborately-constructed nothing twice.
The effort soon became too much for her. She was just rising in a
perplexed flutter, nervously murmuring that she would go and look for Miss
Keeldar, when Miss Keeldar saved her the trouble by appearing. It was to be
presumed at least that this was she who now came in from the garden.
There is real grace in ease of manner, and so old Helstone felt when an
erect, slight girl walked up to him, holding with her left hand her little silk
apron full of flowers; and, giving him her right hand, said pleasantly, “I knew
you would come to see me, though you do think Mr. Yorke has made me a
Jacobin. Good-morning.”
“But we’ll not have you a Jacobin,” returned he. “No, Miss Shirley; now
that you are amongst us, I’ll teach you sound doctrine.”
“Mrs. Pryor has anticipated you,” she replied, turning to the elder lady.
“Mrs. Pryor, you know, was my governess, and is still my friend. She has
drilled me well in both theology and history, I assure you, Mr. Helstone.”
The rector immediately bowed very low to Mrs. Pryor. The ex-governess
disclaimed skill either in political or religious controversy, explained that she
thought such matters little adapted for female minds, but assured him she was
truly attached to the Establishment. She added that she was averse to change,
and said something scarcely audible about the danger of new ideas.
“Miss Keeldar thinks as you think, I hope, madam.”
“It can scarcely be expected that the eager and young should hold the
opinions of the cool and middle-aged.”
“Oh! oh! we are independent; we think for ourselves!” cried Mr.
Helstone. “We are a little Jacobin, for anything I know – a little freethinker. Let
us have a confession of faith on the spot.”
And he took the heiress’s two hands – causing her to let fall her cargo of
flowers – and seated her by him on the sofa.
“Say your creed,” he ordered.
“The Apostles’ Creed?”
“Yes.”
She said it like a child.
“Now for St. Athanasius’s.”
“Let me gather up my flowers. Here is Tartar coming; he will tread upon
them.”
Tartar was a rather large, strong, ugly and fierce-looking dog, of a breed
between mastiff and bulldog, who at this moment entered through the glass
door, and snuffed the fresh flowers scattered on the rug. As he was turning
round preparatory to lying down upon them, Miss Helstone and Miss Keeldar
simultaneously stooped to the rescue.
“Thank you,” said the heiress. “Is this your daughter, Mr. Helstone?”
“My niece Caroline.”
Miss Keeldar shook hands with her, and they looked at each other.
Shirley Keeldar (she had no Christian name but Shirley: her parents, who
had wished to have a son, bestowed on her the family name they would have
bestowed on a boy) – Shirley Keeldar was no ugly heiress. She was agreeable
to the eye. She was perhaps an inch or two taller than Miss Helstone, and
gracefully made. Her face, too, possessed a graceful charm. It was intelligent
and expressive. Her eyes were of the darkest grey, and her hair of the darkest
brown. Her features were distinguished – by which I do not mean that they
were high, bony, and Roman, being indeed rather small and slight; but only that
they were spirited and mobile. She examined Caroline seriously, her head a
little on one side, with a thoughtful air.
“You see she is only a feeble chick,” observed Mr. Helstone.
“She looks younger than I. How old are you?” she inquired in a manner
that would have been patronizing if it had not been solemn and simple.
“Eighteen years and six months.”
“And I am twenty-one.” She said no more, but busied herself in arranging
her flowers.
“And St. Athanasius’s Creed?” urged the rector. “You believe it all, don’t
you?”
“I can’t remember it quite all. I will give you a nosegay, Mr. Helstone,
when I have given your niece one.”
She selected a little bouquet of delicate flowers, relieved by a spray of
dark greenery. Tying it with silk from her work-box, she placed it on Caroline’s
lap; and then she put her hands behind her, and stood bending slightly towards
her guest, in the attitude of a grave but gallant little cavalier. This effect was
aided by the style in which she wore her hair, parted on one temple, and
brushed in a glossy sweep above the forehead, whence it fell freely in naturallooking curls.
“Are you tired with your walk?” she inquired.
“No; it is only a mile.”
“You look pale. Is she always so pale?” she asked, turning to the rector.
“She used to be as rosy as the reddest of your flowers.”
“Why is she altered? Has she been ill?”
“She tells me she wants a change.”
“She ought to have one. You ought to give her one. You should send her
to the coast.”
“I will, before summer is over. Meantime, I intend her to make
acquaintance with you, if you have no objection.”
“I am sure Miss Keeldar will have no objection,” here observed Mrs.
Pryor. “I think I may say that Miss Helstone’s frequent presence at Fieldhead
will be esteemed a favour.”
“You speak my sentiments precisely, ma’am,” said Shirley, “and I thank
you. Let me tell you,” she continued, turning again to Caroline, “that my
governess does not welcome everyone as she has welcomed you. You are
distinguished more than you think. As soon as you are gone, I shall ask Mrs.
Pryor’s opinion of you, for I have found her judgment of character wondrous
accurate. Already I foresee a favourable answer. Do I not guess rightly, Mrs.
Pryor?”
“My dear, you said you would ask my opinion when Miss Helstone was
gone, not in her presence.”
“No; and perhaps it will be long before I obtain it. – I am sometimes sadly
tantalized, Mr. Helstone, by Mrs. Pryor’s extreme caution. On some people’s
characters I cannot get her to pronounce a sentence, entreat as I may.”
Mrs. Pryor smiled.
“Yes,” said her pupil, “I know what that smile means. You are thinking of
Mr. Moore of the Hollow. Do you know him?” she asked Mr. Helstone.
“Ay! ay! Your tenant. You have seen a good deal of him, no doubt, since
you came?”
“I have been obliged to see him. There was business to transact. Business!
Really the word makes me conscious I am indeed no longer a girl. I am an
esquire! Shirley Keeldar, Esquire, ought to be my title. They gave me a man’s
name; I hold a man’s position. And when I see such people as that stately
Anglo-Belgian – that Gérard Moore – before me, gravely talking to me of
business, really I feel quite gentlemanlike. But I find it a little difficult to
understand Mr. Moore, whether to like him or not. I have entreated Mrs. Pryor
to say what she thinks of him, but she still avoids returning a direct answer. Do
you like him, Mr. Helstone?”
“Not at all, just now. His name is entirely blotted from my good books.”
“What is the matter? What has he done?”
“My uncle and he disagree on politics,” interposed the low voice of
Caroline. At once she felt with nervous acuteness that she had better not have
spoken, and coloured to the eyes.
“What are Moore’s politics?” inquired Shirley.
“Those of a tradesman,” returned the rector; “narrow, selfish, and
unpatriotic. The man is eternally speaking against the continuance of the war. I
have no patience with him.”
“The war hurts his trade. He said that yesterday. What other objection
have you to him?”
“That is enough.”
“He looks the gentleman,” pursued Shirley, “and it pleases me to think he
is such.”
Caroline, shredding a flower, answered in distinct tones, “Decidedly he
is.” Shirley flashed an arch, searching glance at her.
“You are his friend, at any rate,” she said.
“I am both his friend and his relative,” was the prompt reply. “Robert
Moore is my cousin.”
“Oh, then you can tell me all about him. Give me a sketch of his
character.”
Embarrassment seized Caroline. She could not, and did not, attempt to
comply. Her silence was immediately covered by Mrs. Pryor, who asked Mr.
Helstone about various families in the neighbourhood, with whose connections
she was acquainted.
Shirley soon withdrew her gaze from Miss Helstone. She did not renew
her interrogations, but proceeded to make a nosegay of flowers for the rector.
She presented it to him as he left.
“Be sure you wear it for my sake,” said she.
“Next my heart, of course,” responded Helstone. “Mrs. Pryor, take care of
this young squire of Briarfield. Don’t let him exert himself too much; don’t let
him break his neck in hunting; especially, let him mind how he rides down that
dangerous hill near the Hollow.”
“I like a descent,” said Shirley; “and I like that romantic Hollow with all
my heart.”
“Romantic, with a mill in it?”
“Romantic with a mill in it. The old mill and the white cottage are each
admirable in their way.”
“And the counting-house, Mr. Keeldar?”
“I adore the counting-house.”
“And the trade? The greasy wool, the polluting dyeing-vats?”
“The trade is to be thoroughly respected.”
“And the tradesman is a hero? Good!”
“I am glad to hear you say so. I thought the tradesman looked heroic.”
Mischief and glee sparkled all over her face as she bandied words with the old
Cossack, who almost equally enjoyed the contest.
“Captain Keeldar, why are you so fond of trade?”
“Because I am a mill-owner, of course. Half my income comes from the
works in that Hollow.”
“Don’t enter into partnership – that’s all.”
“You’ve put it into my head!” she exclaimed, with a joyous laugh. “It will
never get out. Thank you.” And waving her white hand, she vanished within the
porch, while the rector and his niece passed out through the arched gateway.
↑

Chapter 12

SHIRLEY AND CAROLINE


Shirley showed she had been sincere in saying she should be glad of
Caroline’s society, by frequently seeking it. Indeed, if she had not sought it, she
would not have had it, for Miss Helstone was slow to make friends. She was
always held back by the idea that people could not want her, that she could not
amuse them; and she felt that a brilliant, happy, youthful creature like the
heiress of Fieldhead would not find her interesting.
Though in about a month Shirley had made the acquaintance of most of
the nearby families, and was on quite free and easy terms with all the Misses
Sykes and Misses Pearson, yet it appeared she found none of them very
congenial: she fraternized with none of them, to use her own words. If she had
really been lord of the manor of Briarfield, there was not a single fair one
amongst them whom she would have wished to ask to become Mrs. Keeldar,
lady of the manor. She made this remark to Mrs. Pryor, who received it very
quietly, as she did most of her pupil’s off-hand speeches, responding, “My dear,
do not allow that strange habit of alluding to yourself as a gentleman to become
usual.”
Shirley never laughed at her former governess; therefore she took her
remonstrance in silence. She stood near the window, looking at the grand cedar
on her lawn, watching a bird on one of its boughs. Presently she began to
chirrup to the bird; her chirrup grew clearer; before long she was whistling a
tune, very deftly.
“My dear!” expostulated Mrs. Pryor.
“Was I whistling?” said Shirley. “I beg your pardon, ma’am. I had
resolved not to whistle in your company. But yesterday evening, as I was
coming up our lane, I heard a gentleman whistling that very tune on the other
side of the hedge, and that reminded me.”
“What gentleman was it?”
“Mr. Moore – the only gentleman in the neighbourhood who is not greyhaired. My two venerable favourites, Mr. Helstone and Mr. Yorke, it is true, are
fine old beaus, infinitely better than any of the stupid young ones.”
Mrs. Pryor was silent.
“You do not like Mr. Helstone, ma’am?” asked Shirley.
“My dear, Mr. Helstone’s office secures him from criticism.”
“You generally leave the room when he is announced.”
“Do you walk out this morning, my dear?”
“Yes, I shall go to the rectory, and find Caroline Helstone, and make her
take some exercise. She shall have a breezy walk over Nunnely Common.”
“If you do, my dear, please remind Miss Helstone to wrap up well, as
there is a fresh wind, and she appears to me to require care.”
“You shall be obeyed, Mrs. Pryor. Will you not accompany us?”
“No, my love; I cannot walk so quickly as you.”
Shirley easily persuaded Caroline to go with her, and when they were out
on the quiet road, traversing the solitary sweep of Nunnely Common, she as
easily drew her into conversation. The first feelings of diffidence overcome,
Caroline felt glad to talk with Miss Keeldar. Shirley said she liked the green
sweep of the common, and, better still, the heath on its ridges, which reminded
her of moors. She had seen moors when she was travelling on the borders near
Scotland. She remembered particularly a journey on a sultry day, when they had
crossed what seemed a boundless waste of deep heath, and had seen nothing but
wild sheep, heard nothing but the cries of wild birds.
“I know how the heath would look on such a day,” said Caroline; “purpleblack – a deeper shade of the sky, and that would be livid.”
“Yes, there were brassy edges to the clouds, and here and there a white
gleam, which you expected would kindle into lightning.”
“Did it thunder?”
“It muttered distant peals, but the storm did not break till evening, after
we had reached our inn at the foot of a range of mountains. I stood at the
window an hour watching the clouds come down. The hills seemed rolled in a
sullen mist, and when the rain fell in sheets, suddenly they were blotted out;
they were washed from the world.”
“I have seen such storms in Yorkshire, and they made me think of the
Deluge. Miss Keeldar, just stand still now, and look at Nunnely dale and
wood.”
They halted on the green brow of the common, and looked down on the
deep valley; on meadows, some pearled with daisies, some golden with kingcups. On Nunnwood – the sole remnant of an ancient forest – slept the shadow
of a cloud; the distant hills were dappled, the horizon tinted like mother-ofpearl; silvery blues, soft purples and rose-shades, all melting into fleeces of
white cloud, like a remote glimpse of heaven’s foundations.
“Our England is a bonny island,” said Shirley, “and Yorkshire is one of
her bonniest nooks.”
“You are a Yorkshire girl too?”
“I am. Five generations of my race sleep under Briarfield Church.”
Caroline offered her hand, which was accordingly shaken. “We are
compatriots,” said she.
“Yes,” agreed Shirley, with a grave nod. She pointed to the forest. “Were
you ever in the heart of Nunnwood?”
“Many a time.”
“What is it like?”
“The trees are huge and old, with trunks as firm as pillars, while the
boughs sway to every breeze. In the deepest calm their leaves are never quite
hushed, and in a high wind a sea thunders above you. Can you see a break in
the forest? That is a dell, lined with green, and crowded about with the very
oldest oaks. In the bottom lie the ruins of a nunnery.”
“We will go – you and I, Caroline – to that wood, early some fine summer
morning, and spend a long day there. We can take pencils and sketch-books,
and any interesting reading book we like; and of course something to eat. We
could carry our own provisions. It would not tire you too much to walk so far?”
“Oh no; especially if we rested in the wood. And I know all the
pleasantest spots. I know where wild strawberries abound; I know some lonely,
quite untrodden glades, carpeted with strange mosses. I know groups of trees
that ravish the eye – oak, delicate birch, glossy beech; and ash trees stately as
Saul, standing isolated; and wood-giants clad in bright shrouds of ivy. Miss
Keeldar, I could guide you.”
“You would be dull with me alone?”
“I should not. I think we should suit; and what third person is there who
would not spoil our pleasure?”
“Indeed, I know of none of our own ages – no lady at least. And as to
gentlemen—”
“An excursion becomes quite a different thing when there are gentlemen,”
interrupted Caroline. “We were going simply to see the old trees, the old ruins;
to pass a day in quietude.”
“You are right; and the presence of gentlemen dispels the last charm, I
think. If they are of the wrong sort, like your Malones, and your young Sykes,
irritation takes the place of serenity. If they are of the right sort, there is still a
change that is difficult to describe.”
“We forget Nature.”
“And then Nature forgets us, and withdraws the peaceful joy with which
she would have filled our hearts. Instead she gives us more elation and more
anxiety.”
“Our power of being happy lies a good deal in ourselves, I believe,”
remarked Caroline. “I have gone to Nunnwood with a large party – all the
curates and other gentry and ladies – and I found it insufferably tedious; and I
have gone quite alone, or accompanied only by Fanny, and have roamed about
and sketched, or read; and enjoyed much quiet happiness. But that was when I
was young – two years ago.”
“Did you ever go with your cousin, Robert Moore?”
“Yes; once.”
“What sort of a companion is he?”
“A cousin, you know, is different to a stranger.”
“I am aware of that; but cousins, if they are stupid, are more insupportable
than strangers, because you cannot so easily keep them at a distance. But your
cousin is not stupid?”
“No; but the society of clever men brings its own peculiar pain also. You
wonder whether you are worthy to be his associate.”
“Oh! there I cannot follow you,” cried Shirley. “I consider myself worthy
to be the associate of the best of gentlemen. Your uncle, by-the-bye, is not a bad
specimen of the elderly gentleman. I am always glad to see his brown, keen,
sensible old face. Are you fond of him? Is he kind to you? Now, speak the
truth.”
“He has brought me up from childhood, I doubt not, precisely as he would
have brought up his own daughter, if he had had one; and that is kindness. But I
am not fond of him. I would rather be out of his presence than in it.”
“Strange, when he makes himself so agreeable.”
“Yes, in company; but he is stern and silent at home. As he puts away his
hat in the rectory hall, so he locks away his liveliness: the smile and jest are for
society.”
“Is he tyrannical?” asked Shirley.
“Not in the least. He is simply a man who is liberal rather than goodnatured, and scrupulously equitable rather than truly just – if you understand
me.”
“Oh yes! Genuine justice springs from sympathy and considerateness, of
which, I can imagine, my bronzed old friend is quite devoid.”
“I often wonder, Shirley, whether most men resemble my uncle at home;
whether it is necessary for us to be new and unfamiliar to them in order to seem
agreeable in their eyes; and whether it is impossible for them to retain a
constant interest and affection for those people they see every day.”
“I don’t know. I can’t clear up your doubts. I ponder over similar ones
myself sometimes. But if I were convinced they were all hard and
unsympathizing, I would never marry. I should not like to find out that what I
loved did not love me, and never could despite any effort I might make to
please. Once I made that discovery, I would long to go away.”
“But you could not if you were married.”
“No, I could not. There it is. I could never be my own mistress more. A
terrible thought! It suffocates me! Nothing irks me like the idea of being a
burden and a bore! Now, when I feel my company superfluous, I can
comfortably fold my independence round me like a mantle, and drop my pride
like a veil, and withdraw to solitude. If married, that could not be.”
“I wonder we don’t all make up our minds to remain single,” said
Caroline. “We should if we listened to my uncle. He always speaks of marriage
as a burden; and I believe whenever he hears of a man being married, he
regards him as a fool.”
“But, Caroline, surely men are not all like your uncle.”
“I suppose we each find an exception in the one we love, till we are
married,” suggested Caroline.
“I suppose so. And we fancy him to be like ourselves; we imagine a sense
of harmony. We think his voice promises a heart that will never harden against
us; we read faithful affection in his eyes. I don’t think we should trust to what
they call passion, Caroline. I believe it is a mere fire of dry sticks, blazing up
and vanishing. But we see him kind to animals, to children, to poor people, and
kind to us likewise, good, considerate. He does not flatter women, but he is
patient with them, and seems to find their company congenial. Then we observe
that he is just, that he always speaks the truth, that he is conscientious. We feel
joy and peace when he comes into a room; we feel sad when he leaves it. We
know that this man has been a kind son, and a kind brother. Will any one dare
to tell me that he will not be a kind husband?”
“My uncle would say it unhesitatingly. ‘He will be sick of you in a
month,’ he would say.”
“Mrs. Pryor would seriously hint the same.”
“Mrs. Yorke and Miss Mann would darkly suggest ditto.”
“If they are right,” said Shirley, “it is good never to fall in love.”
“Very good, if you can avoid it.”
“I choose to doubt them.”
“I am afraid that proves you are already caught,” said Caroline.
“Not I. But if I were, I would consult neither man nor woman, but the
mouse that steals out of the wainscot; the bird that pecks at my window for a
crumb; the dog that licks my hand and sits beside my knee. Did you ever see
anyone whom such creatures seemed instinctively to rely on?”
“We have a black cat and an old dog at the rectory. I know somebody
onto whose knee that black cat loves to climb; and the old dog always comes
out of his kennel and wags his tail, and whines affectionately when somebody
passes.”
“And what does that somebody do?”
“He quietly strokes the cat, and when he must disturb her by rising, he
puts her softly down. He always whistles to the dog and gives him a caress.”
“Does he? Is it not Robert?”
“It is Robert.”
“Handsome fellow!” said Shirley, with enthusiasm. Her eyes sparkled.
“Bless him! he is both graceful and good.”
“I was sure you would see that he was.”
“I liked him when I met him. I admire him now. When beauty is blended
with goodness, Caroline, there is a powerful charm.”
“When intelligence is added, Shirley?”
“Who can resist it? He is a noble being. I tell you when they are good
they are the lords of the creation – they are the sons of God. Indisputably, a
great, good, handsome man is the first of created things.”
“Above us?”
“I would scorn to contend for empire with him. Shall my left hand dispute
for precedence with my right? Shall my heart quarrel with my pulse?”
“Husbands and wives quarrel horribly, Shirley. But are we men’s equals,
or are we not?”
“Nothing ever charms me more than when I meet my superior – one who
makes me sincerely feel that he is my superior. It degrades to stoop; it is
glorious to look up. What frets me is that when I try to esteem, I am baffled.”
“Miss Keeldar, will you come in? We are now at the rectory gates.”
“Not today, but tomorrow I shall fetch you to spend the evening with me.
Caroline Helstone, if you really are what at present you seem, you and I will
suit. I have never in my whole life been able to talk to a young lady as I have
talked to you this morning. Kiss me – and good-bye.”
Mrs. Pryor seemed as friendly as Shirley. She, who went nowhere else,
called at the rectory one afternoon, when the rector happened to be out. It was
rather a close day; the heat had flushed her, and she seemed flustered too at
entering a strange house. She sat on the sofa, trembling, and fanning herself
with her handkerchief with nervous discomposure.
Caroline marvelled at this unusual want of self-command in a lady of her
years, and also at the lack of strength in one who appeared robust – for Mrs.
Pryor said repeatedly that the fatigue of her walk and the heat were the reasons
for her weakness. Caroline gently removed her shawl and bonnet: attentions
that Mrs. Pryor would not have accepted from everyone. In general she recoiled
from touch with embarrassment and coldness. To Miss Helstone’s little light
hand, however, she yielded, and seemed soothed. In a few minutes she ceased
to tremble, and grew quiet and tranquil.
Her usual manner being resumed, she began to talk of ordinary topics.
She was a good converser. Her language, always a little formal, was well
chosen; her sentiments were just; her information was varied and correct.
Caroline felt it more pleasant to listen to her than she could have anticipated.
On the wall opposite them hung three pictures – the centre one, that of a
lady; the two others, male portraits.
“That is a beautiful face,” said Mrs. Pryor, after a brief pause. “It is a
portrait from the life, I presume?”
“It is a portrait of Mrs. Helstone.”
“Of Mrs. Matthewson Helstone? Of your uncle’s wife?”
“It is, and is said to be a good likeness. Before her marriage she was
thought the beauty of the district.”
“I should say she was. It is, however, a passive face. She could not have
been what is generally termed ‘a woman of spirit.’”
“I believe she was a remarkably still, silent person,” said Caroline.
“One would scarcely have expected, my dear, that your uncle should have
chosen a partner of that description. Is he not fond of being amused by lively
chat?”
“In company he is. But he always says he could never do with a talking
wife. He must have quiet at home.”
“Mrs. Matthewson lived only a few years after her marriage, I believe?”
“About five years.”
“Well, my dear,” pursued Mrs. Pryor, rising to go, “I hope you will
frequently come to Fieldhead. You must feel lonely here, having no female
relative in the house; you must pass much of your time alone.”
“I am inured to it. I have grown up by myself. May I arrange your shawl
for you?”
Mrs. Pryor submitted. “Should you require help in your studies,” she said,
“you may command me. I hope to have frequent conversations with you. I
should wish to be of use to you.”
Miss Helstone thanked her, thinking what a kind heart was hidden under
her visitor’s seeming chilliness. Observing that Mrs. Pryor again glanced at the
portraits, Caroline explained:
“The likeness that hangs near the window, you will see, is my uncle,
taken twenty years ago; the other is his brother James, my father.”
“They resemble each other,” said Mrs. Pryor; “yet a difference of
character may be traced in the brow and mouth.”
“What difference?” inquired Caroline, accompanying her to the door.
“James Helstone – my father – is generally considered by strangers to be the
better-looking of the two. Do you think his picture handsome, Mrs. Pryor?”
“It is much finer featured than that of your uncle.”
“But what is the difference of character you mean? Tell me. I wish to see
if you guess right.”
“My dear, your uncle is a man of principle. His forehead and his lips are
firm, and his eye is steady.”
“And my father? Do not be afraid of offending me. I always like the
truth.”
“Do you like the truth? Good. Keep to that preference. The other, my
dear, if he had been living now, would probably have given little support to his
daughter. It is, however, a graceful head. My dear” (turning abruptly), “you
believe in the importance of principle?”
“I am sure no character can have true worth without it.”
“You have considered the subject?”
“Often. Circumstances early forced it upon my attention.”
“The lesson was not lost, then, though it came so prematurely. My dear,
do not stand in the draught; you will take cold. Good-afternoon.”
Miss Helstone’s new acquaintances soon became of value to her: their
society was, she felt, a privilege and a chance of relief. A new turn was given to
her thoughts, lessening the force of their pressure on one worn-down point.
Soon she was content to spend whole days at Fieldhead, doing by turns
whatever Shirley or Mrs. Pryor wished; now one would claim her, now the
other. The elder lady was not demonstrative, but she was assiduous. I have
hinted that she was a peculiar person, and this was evident in the interest she
showed in Caroline. She watched all her movements; it seemed as if she wished
to guard her steps. It gave her pleasure to be asked by Miss Helstone for advice.
She gave her aid with such quiet enjoyment that Caroline before long took
delight in depending on her.
Shirley Keeldar’s complete docility with Mrs. Pryor had at first surprised
Caroline, as did the fact of the reserved ex-governess being so much at ease in
the house of her young pupil; but she soon found everyone must prize Mrs.
Pryor when they knew her. Despite her old-fashioned gowns and formal speech,
she was a kind and truthful counsellor.
As to dependency or inferiority – Caroline did not feel it in talking to
Shirley, so why would Mrs. Pryor? Shirley was rich: she possessed a thousand a
year, and Caroline not a penny; and yet there was a safe sense of equality when
with her, never known with the ordinary Briarfield gentry.
The reason was that Shirley’s head ran on other things than money and
position. She was glad to be independent; at times she was even elated at the
notion of being lady of the manor, and having tenants and an estate. She was
especially tickled when reminded of “all that property” down in the Hollow –
the mills, gardens and cottage; but her serious thoughts tended elsewhere. To
admire the great, reverence the good, and be joyous with the genial, was very
much Shirley’s way, rather than thinking of her social superiority.
Miss Keeldar had first taken an interest in Caroline because she was quiet,
and looked delicate and in need of care. Her liking increased greatly when she
discovered that Caroline understood and responded to her own way of thinking
and talking. She had hardly expected it. Miss Helstone, she fancied, looked too
pretty and soft to be anything out of the common way; and she wondered at the
self-won knowledge and speculations working in that girlish head.
Caroline’s taste, too, was like her own. They delighted in the same books,
and could have the comfort of laughing together over works of false
sentimentality and pompous pretension. Caroline, she found, could tell the true
from the false. The minds of the two girls often chimed sweetly in harmony.
One evening they chanced to be alone in the oak-parlour. They had
passed a long wet day together without tedium. It was now almost dark; candles
were not yet brought in; both were meditative and silent.
A western wind roared high round the hall, driving wild clouds and
stormy rain; all was tempest outside, all deep peace within. Shirley sat at the
window, listening to the restless complaints of the gale, which made her
pensive. Snatches of sweet ballads haunted her ear; now and then she sang a
stanza, obeying the fitful impulse of the wind. Caroline, at the darkest end of
the room, was just discernible by the ruby shine of the fire, pacing to and fro,
muttering fragments of poetry. She spoke very low, but Shirley heard her:
 “‘Obscurest night involved the sky,
 The Atlantic billows roared,
 When such a destined wretch as I,
 Washed headlong from on board,
 Of friends, of hope, of all bereft,
 His floating home for ever left.’”
Here she stopped.
“Go on,” said Shirley.
“I was only repeating ‘The Castaway.’”
“I know. If you can remember it, say it all.”
So Caroline went through it. The wild sea, the drowning mariner, the
reluctant ship swept on in the storm, were made real by her; and so was the
heart of the poet, who wept for his own God-abandoned misery, and cried from
the depths:
 “‘No voice divine the storm allayed,
 No light propitious shone,
 When, snatched from all effectual aid,
 We perished – each alone!
 But I beneath a rougher sea,
 And whelmed in deeper gulfs than he.’
“I hope William Cowper is safe and calm in heaven now,” continued
Caroline. “Poor man: he was nearly broken-hearted when he wrote that poem,
and it almost breaks one’s heart to read it. But he found relief in writing it – I
know he did. It seems to me, Shirley, that nobody should write poetry to show
off intellect. Who cares for that sort of poetry? And who does not care for real
feeling?”
“It seems you care for it; yet you managed to recite it with a steady voice,
Caroline.”
“Cowper’s hand did not tremble in writing the lines. Why should my
voice falter in repeating them? I believe that in writing ‘The Castaway’ the
deadly spasm passed from his heart, he wept abundantly, and was comforted.”
Shirley remarked, “One could have loved Cowper, if it were only for the
sake of comforting him.”
“You never would have loved Cowper,” rejoined Caroline promptly. “He
was not made to be loved by woman.”
“What do you mean?”
“What I say. I know there are natures in the world – and very noble
natures too – whom love never comes near. You might have sought Cowper
with the intention of loving him, and you would have looked at him, pitied him,
and left him, forced away by a sense of the impossible, the incongruous, as the
crew were borne from their drowning comrade by ‘the furious blast.’”
“You may be right. Who told you this?”
“And what I say of Cowper, I say of Rousseau. Was he ever loved? He
loved passionately; but was his passion ever returned? I am certain, never. And
if there were any female Cowpers and Rousseaus, I should say the same of
them.”
“Who told you this? Did Moore?”
“Why should anybody have told me? Have I not an instinct? Moore never
talked to me either about Cowper, or Rousseau, or love.”
“Do you like characters of the Rousseau type, Caroline?”
“Not at all, as a whole. I sympathize intensely with certain dazzling
qualities they possess. But they are made of clay and gold: taken altogether, I
feel them unnatural, unhealthy, repulsive.”
“I dare say I should be more tolerant of a Rousseau than you would, Cary.
By the way, you must miss that Cousin Robert of yours very much, now that
you and he never meet.”
“I do.”
“And he must miss you?”
“He does not.”
“I imagine,” pursued Shirley, who had lately got a habit of introducing
Moore’s name into the conversation, even when it seemed to have no business
there – “I imagine that he was fond of you, since he took so much notice of
you.”
“He never was fond of me; he took pains to prove he only just tolerated
me.”
Caroline now habitually thought of Robert’s feelings in this scanty
measure. She had her own reasons for being less sanguine than ever about
hopeful views of the future.
“Of course, then,” observed Miss Keeldar, “you only just tolerated him in
return?”
“Shirley, men and women are so different; women have so few things to
think about, men so many. You may have a friendship for a man, while he is
almost indifferent to you. Robert used to go to London sometimes for a week or
a fortnight. Well, while he was away, I found his absence a void. Of course, I
had my usual occupations; still I missed him. As I sat by myself in the
evenings, I used to feel a strange conviction that if I could magically see Robert
– where he was, how occupied – I should learn the width of the chasm between
us.”
“Caroline,” demanded Miss Keeldar abruptly, “don’t you wish you had a
profession?”
“I wish it fifty times a day. I often wonder what I came into the world for.
I long to have something absorbing to fill my head and hands and to occupy my
thoughts. Labour may not make us happy, but it can prevent us from breaking
our hearts with a tyrant pain. Besides, successful labour has its reward.”
“But labour and professions, they say, make women masculine, coarse,
unwomanly.”
“And what does it signify if never-to-be-married women are unattractive
or not? Provided they are decorous and neat, it is enough. Old maids should be
allowed to be as grave and plain-looking as they please.”
“You might be an old maid yourself, Caroline, you speak so earnestly.”
“I shall be one. It is my destiny. I will never marry a Malone or a Sykes;
and no one else will ever marry me.”
Here fell a long pause. Shirley broke it.
“Lina – did not Moore call you Lina sometimes?”
“Yes. It is short for Caroline in his native country.”
“Well, Lina, do you remember my one day noticing a curl missing from
your hair, and your telling me that it was Robert’s fault, as he had once cut off a
lock?”
“Yes.”
“If he was as indifferent to you as you say, why did he steal your hair?”
“I don’t know – yes, I do. It was my doing, not his. He was going to
London; and the night before he went, I had found in his sister’s workbox a
short lock of black hair. Hortense told me it was her brother’s, and a keepsake.
He was sitting near the table. He has plenty of hair; I thought he could spare me
one curl, so I asked for it. He said, on condition that he might have a tress from
my head. So he got one of my long locks of hair, and I got one of his short ones.
I keep his, but I dare say he has lost mine. It was one of those silly deeds it
distresses the heart and sets the face on fire to think of; one of those small but
sharp recollections that return, lacerating your self-respect like tiny penknives,
and forcing from your lips, as you sit alone, sudden, insane-sounding
interjections.”
“Caroline!”
“I do think myself a fool, Shirley, in some respects. But I said I would not
make you my confessor, for you cannot reciprocate foible for foible; you are
not weak. How steadily you watch me now, like an eagle!”
“What a study of character you are. – Come in!”
This was said in answer to a tap at the door. Caroline saw the servant put
a note into Shirley’s hands, and heard the words, “From Mr. Moore, ma’am.”
“Bring candles,” said Miss Keeldar. “It is a note on business.” But when
candles were brought, she neither opened nor read it, before Caroline went
home.
↑

Chapter 13

FURTHER COMMUNICATIONS ON BUSINESS


Shirley enjoyed at times an easy indolence. There were periods when she
took delight in thinking and doing nothing – moments when her simple
existence, with the world around and heaven above her, seemed to give her
such happiness that she did not need to lift a finger to increase the joy. Often,
after an active morning, she would spend a sunny afternoon lying on the turf, in
the shade of a tree. No society did she need but Caroline’s; no spectacle did she
ask but the deep blue sky, and such cloudlets as sailed across it; no sound but
the bee’s hum, the leaf’s whisper. Her sole book in such hours was the dim
chronicle of memory, or the page of blissful anticipation of the future. In her
past were sweet passages, in her future rosy hopes.
Yet one such day when Caroline looked down at her, Shirley’s cheek was
wet.
“Shirley, why do you cry?” asked Caroline.
Miss Keeldar smiled, and turned her picturesque head. “Because it
pleases me mightily to cry,” she said. “My heart is both sad and glad. But you
good, patient child – why do you not cry too? I only weep tears; you might
weep gall, if you choose.”
“Why should I weep gall?”
“Mateless, solitary bird!” was the only answer.
“And are not you too mateless, Shirley?”
“At heart – no.”
“Oh! who nestles there, Shirley?”
But Shirley only laughed gaily at this question, and started up. “I have
dreamed a mere day-dream, bright and baseless!”
Miss Helstone was by this time free from illusions: she fancied she knew
pretty well where her own destiny and that of some others were leading. Yet
she was still frequently drawn of an evening to the field-stile overlooking the
Hollow.
On the night after the incident of the note, she had been there, watching
for her beacon – watching vainly: no lamp was lit. She turned for home; in
passing Fieldhead, its moonlight beauty attracted her glance. Tree and hall rose
peaceful under the moon; pearly paleness gilded the building. The broad
pavement in front shone pale also, gleaming as if some spell had transformed
the dark granite to marble. On the silvery space were two human figures, at first
motionless and mute; presently they moved in step, and spoke low. Caroline
scrutinized them earnestly.
“Is it Mrs. Pryor and Shirley?”
Certainly it is Shirley. Who else has a shape so lithe, and proud, and
graceful? And her face, too, is visible – careless and pensive, mocking and
tender. Her curls caress her shoulder with their tendril rings. That is Shirley.
Her companion then is, of course, Mrs. Pryor?
Yes, if Mrs. Pryor is six feet tall, and is wearing men’s clothes. The figure
walking at Miss Keeldar’s side is a tall young man; it is her tenant, Robert
Moore.
The pair speak softly – Caroline cannot hear them. She is not
eavesdropping; and so she lingers.
There was a time when, on summer nights, Moore used to walk with his
cousin along a narrow terrace in the Hollow.
“But he used to hold my hand,” thought Caroline; “he does not touch
hers. And yet she does not look haughty now. Robert must think hers a fine
face; she has such generous yet soft fire in her eyes. She smiles – what makes
her smile so sweet? Robert must have felt its beauty. They look to me like two
happy spirits on a silver shore, beyond the death-flood. They have reached it;
they walk there united. And what am I, standing here in shadow and
concealment, my mind darker than my hiding-place? I am one of this world – a
poor doomed mortal, who asks hopelessly why she was born, why she lives.
“This is the worst time I have come to yet; still I am prepared for it. I
gave Robert up to Shirley, the first moment I saw her – rich, youthful, and
lovely. She has him now. He is her lover. She is his darling. When they are
married, they will both be happy, and I do not grudge them their bliss; but I
groan under my own acute misery. Truly I ought not to have been born; they
should have smothered me at the first cry.”
Here, Shirley and her companion turned toward the gate, and some of
their conversation became audible. Caroline would not stay to listen. She
passed away noiselessly. The reader, however, may remain and hear.
“I cannot imagine why nature did not give you a bulldog’s head, for you
have a bulldog’s tenacity,” said Shirley.
“Not a flattering idea. Am I so ignoble?”
“And also you have the bulldog’s silent way of coming up noiselessly
behind, to seize fast, and hold on.”
“This is guess-work. In your presence I have been no bulldog.”
“Your very silence indicates your race. How little you talk, yet how
deeply you scheme!”
“I know the ways of these people. I have learnt their intentions. My note
last night informed you that Barraclough’s trial had ended in his conviction and
sentence to transportation. His associates will plot vengeance. I shall lay my
plans: I shall be prepared – that is all. Do you approve of what I propose?”
“I shall stand by you so long as you are defending yourself.”
“Good!” said Moore. “Even if you disapproved, I believe I should act the
same way; but I now feel satisfied. On the whole, I relish the task.”
“I dare say you do. So would old Helstone. Shall I speak to him? I will, if
you like.”
“Act as you please. But I should inform you that Mr. Helstone is
somewhat prejudiced against me.”
“I have heard all about your differences. Depend upon it, they will melt
away. He cannot resist the temptation of an alliance under present
circumstances.”
“I should be glad to have him; he is of true metal. An old blade, and rusty
somewhat, but the edge still excellent.”
“Well, you shall have him, Mr. Moore, if I can win him. It will cost me
several cups of tea, toast and cake, and an ample measure of persuasion. It
grows rather chill.”
“I see you shiver. Am I wrong to keep you here? Yet it is so calm – I even
feel warm – and society such as yours is a rare pleasure to me. If you were
wrapped in a thicker shawl–”
“I might stay longer, and forget how late it is, which would dismay Mrs.
Pryor. We keep early hours at Fieldhead, Mr. Moore; and so, I am sure, does
your sister at the cottage.”
“Yes; but Hortense and I have an understanding that we shall each do as
we please. Three nights a week I sleep in the mill; when it is moonlight and
mild, I often haunt the Hollow till daybreak.”
“When I was a very little girl, Mr. Moore, my nurse used to tell me tales
of fairies being seen in that Hollow. You will be falling under enchantment.”
“I fear it is done,” said Moore, in a low voice.
“But there are worse things than fairies to be guarded against,” pursued
Miss Keeldar.
“Things more perilous.”
“Far more so. For instance, how would you like to meet Michael Hartley,
that mad Calvinist and Jacobin weaver? They say he is a poacher, and often
goes abroad at night with his gun.”
“I have already had the luck to meet him. We held a long argument
together one night. A strange little incident it was; I liked it.”
“Liked it? I admire your taste! Michael is not sane. Where did you meet
him?”
“In the deepest spot in the glen,” said Moore. “We sat down near the
bridge in moonlight. We had a talk about politics and religion. Michael was
near crazed, but there was a wild interest in his ravings. The man would be half
a poet, if he were not wholly a maniac. He solemnly informed me that hell was
waiting for me, and that he read the mark of the beast on my brow. He said he
had beheld the manner of my doom, and left me with these words, ‘The end is
not yet.’”
“Have you seen him since?”
“About a month afterwards, in returning from market, I met him and
Moses Barraclough, both drunk. They were praying at the roadside. They
accosted me as Satan, and bid me flee. Then just a few days ago, Michael
appeared at my counting-house door, in his shirt-sleeves. He delivered the
comforting message that he wished Mr. Moore to set his house in order, as his
soul was likely shortly to be required.”
“Do you make light of these things?”
“The poor man had been drinking for weeks, and was in a state bordering
on delirium tremens.”
“Then he is the more likely to try to fulfil his own prophecies. Mr. Moore,
go home!”
“So soon? It is early yet.”
“It is late. For my part, I am going in. Will you promise me not to wander
in the Hollow tonight?”
“If you wish it.”
“I do wish it. Do you consider life valueless?”
“On the contrary, of late I regard my life as invaluable. Existence is
neither aimless nor hopeless to me now,” said Moore, “and it was both three
months ago. I was then drowning. All at once a hand was stretched to me – such
a delicate hand I scarcely dared trust it; its strength, however, has rescued me
from ruin.”
“Are you really rescued?”
“For the time. Your assistance has given me another chance.”
“Live to make the best of it. Don’t offer yourself as a target to Michael
Hartley; and good-night!”
Caroline had promised to spend the next evening at Fieldhead. The
gloomy hours beforehand she spent shut up in her own apartment, only leaving
it to join her uncle at meals, and avoiding inquiries from Fanny by telling her
that she was busy altering a dress.
She did sew. She plied her needle ceaselessly, but her brain worked faster
than her fingers. More intensely than ever, she desired a fixed occupation. Her
uncle must be once more entreated, but first she would consult Mrs. Pryor. Her
head laboured to make plans: now and then, a tear would fall on her busy
hands; but this sign of emotion was rare and quickly effaced. She would rethread her needle, and work on.
Late in the afternoon she reached Fieldhead, and appeared in the oak
parlour just as tea was brought in. Shirley asked her why she came so late.
“Because I have been making my summer dress,” said she.
“In which I will like to see you,” said Shirley. “You are a lady-like little
person, Caroline. Is she not, Mrs. Pryor?”
Mrs. Pryor never paid compliments on personal appearance. On this
occasion she only swept Caroline’s curls from her cheek, and observed, “You
get somewhat thin, my love, and somewhat pale. Do you sleep well?” And she
gazed at her anxiously.
“I sometimes dream melancholy dreams,” answered Caroline; “and if I lie
awake at night, the rectory seems a dreary old place. You know it is very near
the churchyard, and it is said that there are graves underneath the out-kitchens. I
rather long to leave the rectory.”
“My dear, you are surely not superstitious?”
“No, Mrs. Pryor; but I think I grow what is called nervous. I see things
under a darker aspect than I used to do. I have fears I never used to have; and I
have an inexpressible weight on my mind which I would give the world to
shake off, and I cannot do it.”
“Strange!” cried Shirley. “I never feel so.” Mrs. Pryor said nothing.
“Fine weather and pleasant scenes give me no pleasure,” continued
Caroline. “Calm evenings are not calm to me. Is this weakness of mind, Mrs.
Pryor, or what is it? I cannot help it. I often struggle against it. I reason; but
reason and effort make no difference.”
“You should take more exercise,” said Mrs. Pryor.
“Exercise! I exercise till I am ready to drop.”
“My dear, you should go away from home.”
“Mrs. Pryor, I should like to. I wish to be a governess, as you have been.
It would oblige me greatly if you would speak to my uncle on the subject.”
“Nonsense!” broke in Shirley. “What an idea! Be a governess! Better be a
slave. Why should you dream of such a painful step?”
“My dear,” said Mrs. Pryor, “you are very young to be a governess, and
not sufficiently robust. The duties a governess undertakes are often severe.”
“I believe I want severe duties to occupy me.”
“Occupy you!” cried Shirley. “When are you idle? I never saw a more
industrious girl. You are always at work. Come, sit by my side, and take some
tea. Don’t you care for my friendship, then, that you wish to leave me?”
“Indeed I do, Shirley; I shall never find another friend so dear.”
Miss Keeldar put her hand into Caroline’s with impulsive affection.
“If you think so, you had better make much of me,” she said, “and not run
away. I hate to part with those to whom I am become attached. Mrs. Pryor there
sometimes talks of leaving me, and says I might find someone more
advantageous, but I should as soon think of exchanging an old-fashioned
mother for something modish. As for you – why, I began to flatter myself we
were thoroughly friends; that you liked Shirley almost as well as Shirley likes
you.”
“I do like Shirley. I like her more every day. But that does not make me
strong or happy.”
“And would it make you strong or happy to go and live as a dependent
amongst utter strangers? It would not. It is not in your nature to bear the
desolate life governesses generally lead; you would fall ill. I won’t hear of it.”
And Miss Keeldar paused, having said this very decidedly. Soon she went
on, “Why, it is my daily pleasure now to look out for you, to know that my
quiet, shrewd companion and monitress is coming; that I shall have her sitting
in the room to look at or to talk to, as we please. This may be selfish, but it is
true.”
“I would write to you, Shirley.”
“And what are letters? Only a stopgap. Drink some tea, Caroline. Eat
something – you eat nothing. Laugh and be cheerful, and stay at home.”
Miss Helstone shook her head and sighed. She felt how difficult it would
be to persuade anyone to help her make the change which she believed
desirable. But this cure for circumstances which she could fully explain to none,
least of all to Shirley, seemed, in all eyes but her own, incomprehensible.
There really was no financial need for her to leave a comfortable home
and “take a situation.” So her friends thought; but of Caroline’s strange
sufferings, which she desired so eagerly to escape, they had no idea. It was both
impossible and hopeless to explain; to wait and endure was her only plan.
“Now, is your mind quieter?” inquired Shirley. “Will you stay at home?”
“I shall not leave it against the approval of my friends,” was the reply;
“but I think in time they will be obliged to think as I do.”
During this conversation Mrs. Pryor looked uneasy. Her extreme habitual
reserve would rarely permit her to interrogate others. She had a multitude of
questions she never ventured to put. Had she been alone with Caroline, she
might have spoken: but Miss Keeldar’s presence sealed her lips, and nervous
scruples kept her from interfering. She merely showed her concern for Miss
Helstone indirectly, by asking her if the fire made her too warm, closing a
window whence she imagined a draught blew, and often glancing at her.
Shirley resumed. “Having destroyed your plan,” she said, “which I hope I
have done, I shall construct a new one of my own. Every summer I make an
excursion. This season I propose spending two months either at the Scotch
lochs or the English lakes – that is, I shall go provided you consent to
accompany me. If you refuse, I shall not stir.”
“You are very good, Shirley.”
“I would be very good if you would let me. I have every intention to be
good. I know I think of myself more than anybody else; but who does not?
However, when Captain Keeldar is made comfortable, and has a sensible,
congenial comrade, it gives him a thorough pleasure to make that comrade
happy. Should we not be happy, Caroline, in the Highlands? Or if you can bear
a sea-voyage, we can go to the Isles – the Hebrides, Shetland, the Orkney
Islands. Would you not like that? I see you would. Your face is all sunshine at
the mention of it.”
“I should like it very much,” returned Caroline, to whom, indeed, the
notion of such a tour was gloriously reviving. Shirley rubbed her hands.
“Come; I can do a good deed with my cash,” she exclaimed. “My
thousand a year can bring health to the drooping, and consolation to the sad.
This summer, we shall go out into the North Atlantic, beyond the Shetlands,
perhaps to the Faroe Isles. We will see seals and mermaids. Caroline is
laughing, Mrs. Pryor. I have done her good.”
“I shall like to go, Shirley,” said Miss Helstone. “I long to hear the oceanwaves, and to see them as I have imagined them in dreams, like tossing banks
of green light, strewed with vanishing and reappearing wreaths of foam. I shall
delight to see those lone rock-islets where the sea-birds live unmolested. We
shall be on the track of the Vikings; we shall almost see the shores of Norway.”
“Will you think of Fitful Head now when you lie awake at night, of gulls
shrieking round it, and waves tumbling upon it, rather than of the graves under
the rectory back-kitchen?”
“I will try; and instead of musing about shrouds and coffins, I will fancy
seals lying in the sunshine on solitary shores; of happy flocks of unscared
birds.”
“And what will become of that weight you said you had on your mind?”
“I will try to forget it in imagining a herd of whales rushing through the
deep, a hundred of them wallowing and rolling in the wake of a patriarch bull.”
“I hope our boat will meet with no such herd, Caroline. I should not like
to be capsized by the patriarch bull.”
“I suppose you expect to see mermaids, Shirley?”
“One of them, at any rate – and she is to appear like this. I am to be
walking by myself on deck, under a full harvest moon. Something will rise
white on the surface of the sea, over which that moon hangs glorious. The
object glitters and sinks. It rises again. I think I hear it cry out; I call you up
from the cabin; we see an image emerging from the dim wave. We both see the
long hair, the lifted foam-white arm. It glides nearer; a human face is plainly
visible, with an alluring glance. It beckons. Were we men, we should spring
into the cold billow; being women, we stand safe, though not without dread.
She feels herself powerless; anger crosses her face; she cannot charm, but she
will appal us; she rises high, and glides revealed on the dark wave-ridge.
Temptress-terror! monstrous likeness of ourselves! Are you not glad, Caroline,
when at last, with a wild shriek, she dives?”
“But, Shirley, she is not like us. We are neither temptresses, nor terrors,
nor monsters.”
“Some of our kind, it is said, are all three. There are men who ascribe to
‘woman,’ in general, such attributes.”
“My dears,” here interrupted Mrs. Pryor, “does it not strike you that your
conversation is rather fanciful?”
“But there is no harm in our fancies; is there, ma’am?”
“Mermaids do not exist; why speak of them as if they did? My dear, I
think there is an arrival. I heard a step in the lane while you were talking.”
Shirley went to the window.
“Yes, there is some one,” said she, turning quietly away; a sensitive flush
animated her face. She cast her gaze down, and seemed to think as she waited.
The servant announced Mr. Moore, and Shirley turned. He seemed very
tall as he entered, and stood in contrast with the three ladies. He was looking
well; a renewed youth and hope glowed in his eye. His face was as cheerful as
it was earnest.
“I am just returned from Stilbro’,” he said to Miss Keeldar; “and I thought
I would call to tell you the result of my mission.”
“Your visit is well timed,” she said. “Sit down. We have not finished tea.
Are you English enough to enjoy tea, or do you faithfully adhere to coffee?”
Moore accepted tea, and paid his respects to Mrs. Pryor with grave
modesty. Then he looked at Caroline – not, however, for the first time: his
glance had fallen upon her before. He gave her his hand, and asked her how she
was. Miss Helstone replied quietly. She was in the shadow, and the friendly
protection of early twilight kept out of view each traitorous blush.
Moore took the empty chair near her, opposite Miss Keeldar. Caroline,
screened by his very closeness, and sheltered by the deepening dusk, soon
regained mastery of her feelings. He addressed Miss Keeldar.
“I went to the barracks,” he said, “and had an interview with Colonel
Ryde. He approved my plans, and promised the aid I wanted. Indeed, he offered
more soldiers than I require – half a dozen will suffice. I don’t intend to be
swamped by redcoats. They are needed for appearance rather than anything
else. My main reliance is on my own civilians.”
“And on their captain,” interposed Shirley.
“What, Captain Keeldar?” inquired Moore, smiling slightly, in a tone of
respectful raillery.
“No,” returned Shirley, answering the smile; “Captain Gérard Moore,
who trusts to the prowess of his own right arm, I believe.”
“Furnished with his counting-house ruler,” added Moore. Resuming his
usual gravity, he went on: “I received by this evening’s post a note from the
Home Secretary in answer to mine. It appears they are uneasy at the state of
matters here in the north; they especially condemn the weakness of the millowners. They say, as I have always said, that inaction can only encourage
disorder, and lead to bloodshed. There is the note – I brought it for your
perusal; and there is a batch of newspapers, containing further accounts of
uprisings in Nottingham, Manchester, and elsewhere.”
He laid them before Miss Keeldar. While she read them he took his tea
quietly; but his eyes were busy, watching the two young ladies.
Miss Keeldar, directly opposite, was easily seen. Her clear cheek was
tinted still with the colour which had risen into it a few minutes since. Her dark
lashes looking down as she read, the dusky yet delicate line of her eyebrows,
the gloss of her curls, made her heightened complexion look like the bloom of a
wild flower. There was natural grace in her attitude, and her silk dress, though
simply fashioned, was almost splendid in the shifting brightness of its tints. On
her arm she wore a bracelet of gold and ivory. There was something brilliant in
the whole picture. It is to be supposed that Moore thought so, as his eye dwelt
long on it, but he seldom permitted his feelings to show in his serious face.
He could not see Caroline without manœuvering a little. He leaned back
in his chair, and looked down on her. Miss Helstone had no brilliancy. Sitting in
the shade, without ornaments, her modest muslin dress colourless but for its
narrow stripe of pale azure, the very brownness of her hair and eyes invisible by
this faint light, she was, compared with the heiress, as a graceful pencil sketch
compared with a vivid painting. Since Robert had seen her last a great change
had been wrought in her. If he perceived it, he said nothing.
“How is Hortense?” asked Caroline softly.
“Very well; but she misses you.”
“Tell her that I miss her, and that I write and read some French every
day.”
“She will ask if you sent your love; she is always particular on that point.
You know she likes attention.”
“My very best love. And say to her that whenever she has time to write
me a little note I shall be glad to hear from her.”
“Hortense will be ready to shed tears. She is tenderhearted about her
pupil; yet she reproaches you sometimes for obeying your uncle’s injunctions
too literally. Affection, like love, will be unjust now and then.”
Caroline made no answer; for indeed her heart was troubled, and she
would have raised her handkerchief to her eyes if she had dared. If she had
dared, too, she would have declared how the very flowers in the garden of
Hollow’s Cottage were dear to her; how the little parlour of that house was her
earthly paradise; how she longed to return to it, as Eve, in her exile, must have
longed to revisit Eden. Not daring, however, to say these things, she held her
peace, waiting for Robert to say something more. It was long since his voice
had addressed her; if she could have imagined that the meeting gave him
pleasure, to her it would have been blissful. Yet, even in doubt, the meeting was
as welcome as sunshine to the cage of an imprisoned bird. To be near Robert
was to be revived.
Miss Keeldar laid down the papers.
“And are you glad or sad for all these menacing tidings?” she asked him.
“Neither; but I certainly am instructed. I see that our only plan is to be
firm. Efficient preparation and a resolute attitude are the best means of averting
bloodshed.”
As the candles were brought in, he rose to show her a particular
paragraph; it seemed that he expected disturbances around Briarfield, though in
what form was not specified. Neither Caroline nor Mrs. Pryor asked questions.
Miss Keeldar, however, spoke with interest, life, and earnestness. There
was nothing coquettish in her demeanour; whatever she felt for Moore, she felt
it seriously. And serious, too, were his feelings, apparently, for he made no
effort to dazzle or impress. Notwithstanding, his deeper voice and somewhat
harder mind gave him an aspect of command. Miss Keeldar looked happy in
conversing with him, and her joy seemed twofold – joy of the past and present,
of memory and of hope.
These were Caroline’s ideas of the pair. She tried not to suffer, but
suffered miserably nevertheless. A few minutes before, her famished heart had
tasted a crumb of nourishment; but the feast was snatched from her, spread
before another, and she remained a bystander at the banquet.
The clock struck nine; it was Caroline’s time for going home. She
gathered up her work, and bade Mrs. Pryor a quiet good-night, receiving from
her a warmer pressure of the hand than usual. She stepped up to Miss Keeldar.
“Good-night, Shirley!”
Shirley started up. “What! Are you going already?”
“It is past nine.”
“I never heard the clock. You will come again tomorrow, and be happy
tonight, will you not? Remember our plans.”
“Yes,” said Caroline; “I have not forgotten.”
But she felt that no plans could permanently restore her mental
tranquillity. She turned to Robert, who stood close behind her. As he looked up,
the light of the candles fell full on her face. All its paleness, all its change, all its
forlorn meaning were clearly revealed. Whether Robert saw it, nothing
indicated.
“Good-night!” she said, shaking like a leaf, hastily offering her thin hand,
anxious to depart quickly.
“You are going home?” he asked, not touching her hand.
“Yes.”
“Is Fanny come for you?”
“Yes.”
“I may as well accompany you a step of the way; not up to the rectory,
though, lest my old friend Helstone should shoot me from the window.”
He laughed, and took his hat. Caroline spoke of unnecessary trouble; he
told her to put on her bonnet and shawl. They were soon both in the open air.
Moore drew her hand under his arm, just in his old, kind manner.
“You may run on, Fanny,” he said to the housemaid. When the girl had
got a little in advance, he enclosed Caroline’s hand in his, and said he was glad
to find she was a familiar guest at Fieldhead. He hoped her intimacy with Miss
Keeldar would continue; such society would be both pleasant and improving.
Caroline replied that she liked Shirley.
“And there is no doubt the liking is mutual,” said Moore. “If she professes
friendship, be certain she is sincere. She cannot feign; she scorns hypocrisy.
And, Caroline, are we never to see you at Hollow’s Cottage again?”
“I suppose not, unless my uncle should change his mind.”
“Are you much alone now?”
“Yes, a good deal.”
“Have you been quite well lately?”
“Quite.”
“You must take care of yourself. Be sure not to neglect exercise. I fancied
you somewhat altered – a little fallen away, and pale. Is your uncle kind to
you?”
“Yes; he is just as he always is.”
“Not too attentive, then. And what ails you? Tell me, Lina.”
“Nothing, Robert.” But her voice faltered.
“That is to say, nothing that you will tell me. I am not to be taken into
confidence. Separation is to estrange us, is it?”
“I do not know. Sometimes I fear it is.”
“But it ought not to. ‘Should auld acquaintance be forgot?’”
“Robert, I don’t forget.”
“It is two months, I should think, Caroline, since you were at the cottage.
Have you ever passed that way in your walk?”
“I have come to the top of the fields sometimes of an evening and looked
down. Once I saw Hortense in the garden watering her flowers, and now and
then I have waited for your lamp to shine out from the counting-house, and I
have seen your outline between it and the window. I knew it was you.”
“I wonder I never met you. I occasionally walk to the top of the Hollow’s
fields after sunset.”
“I know,” said Caroline. “I almost spoke to you one night, you passed so
near me.”
“Did I? And I did not see you! Was I alone?”
“I saw you twice, and neither time were you alone.”
“Who was my companion?”
“The first time you were with Mr. Yorke; and the second time, somebody
with dark curls, and a sparkling necklace. But I only just got a glimpse of you
both; I did not wait to hear you converse.”
“It appears you walk invisible. Henceforth, when sitting in the countinghouse at dead of night, I shall imagine that Caroline may be leaning over my
shoulder reading with me from the same book, or sitting at my side.”
“You need fear no such infliction. I do not come near you; I only stand
afar off, watching what may become of you.”
“When I walk out along the hedgerows in the evening, I shall fancy the
flutter of every little bird over its nest is a movement made by you; treeshadows will take your shape; in the white sprays of hawthorn I shall imagine
glimpses of you. Lina, you will haunt me.”
“I will never be where you would not wish me to be, nor see nor hear
what you would wish unseen and unheard.”
“I shall see you in my very mill in broad daylight. Indeed, I have seen you
there once. A week ago, amongst the mill-girls, moving to and fro, I seemed to
see a figure resembling yours. It was some effect of light; when I walked up to
the group, I found only buxom lasses in pinafores.”
“I shall not follow you into your mill, Robert, unless you call me there.”
“Nor is that the only time on which imagination has played me a trick.
One night, when I came home late from market, I walked into the cottage
parlour and thought I saw you. There was no candle; moonbeams poured
through the panes. There you were, Lina, at the window, dressed in white. For
half a second your face seemed turned towards me; for half a second my idea
was to go and take your hand, to welcome you. Two steps forward broke the
spell. The drapery of the dress changed; the face dissolved. When I reached the
spot, there was nothing but the sweep of a white muslin curtain, and a plant in a
flower-pot. It was a mere illusion.”
“I wonder you have time for such illusions, occupied as your mind must
be.”
“So do I. But I find I have two natures – one for the world and business,
and one for home and leisure. Gérard Moore is a hard dog, but your cousin
Robert is sometimes a dreamer.”
“Your two natures agree with you. I think you are looking in good spirits
and health. You have quite lost that harassed air of a few months ago.”
“Certainly I am disentangled of some difficulties. I have got clear of some
shoals, and have more sea-room.”
“And, with a fair wind, you hope to make a prosperous voyage?”
“I hope it – yes – but hope is deceptive. The mariner must always expect
a tempest.”
“But you are a skilful pilot, Robert; you will weather the storm.”
“My kinswoman always thinks the best of me, but I will take her words
for a good omen, as if she is one of those birds that signifies good luck to the
sailor.”
“I can do nothing for you. I have no power. It is of no use saying I have
the will to serve you. Yet I have that will. I wish you fortune and true
happiness.”
“When did you ever wish me anything else? Oh! we have reached the
churchyard. We are to part here, I suppose. It is so fine a night, I have no
particular wish to return yet to the Hollow. Tell Fanny to go in. Say we are
coming. A few minutes will make no difference.”
The church clock struck ten.
“My uncle will be coming out: he always surveys the church and
churchyard at this hour.”
“And if he does? I should find pleasure in eluding him. We could be
under the east window when he is at the porch; as he came round to the north
side we could wheel off to the south; we might even hide behind the
monuments.”
“Robert, what good spirits you have! Go! go!” added Caroline hastily. “I
hear the front door–”
“I want to stay.”
“You know my uncle will be terribly angry. He forbade me to see you.
Go, Robert; I hear him cough.”
“It is strange how much I wish to stay!”
“You remember what he did to Fanny’s–” began Caroline, and stopped
abruptly short of saying “sweetheart.” She did not wish to suggest the idea.
Moore was less scrupulous. “Fanny’s sweetheart?” he said. “He gave him
a shower under the pump, did he not? He’d do as much for me, I dare say, with
pleasure. But he would make a distinction between a cousin and a lover, would
he not?”
“Oh, he would not think of you in that way, of course not; his quarrel with
you is political. Yet I should not like the breach to be widened, and he is so
testy. For your own sake and mine, Robert, go!”
She gave him a beseeching look. Moore covered her clasped hands an
instant with his, said “Good-night!” and went.
Caroline was in a moment at the kitchen door behind Fanny. The shadow
of the shovel-hat at that very instant fell on a moonlit tomb. The rector
emerged, erect as a cane, from his garden, and proceeded his slow march
through the cemetery. Moore was almost caught. He had to “dodge” after all,
around the church, and kneel for full ten minutes behind a monument, his hat
off, his dark eye shining, and his lips parted with inward laughter at his
position; for the rector meantime stood coolly star-gazing within three feet of
him.
Mr. Helstone, however, had no suspicion on his mind. He was not aware
that his niece had been out that day, and imagined her to be reading in her
chamber – where, indeed, she was by this time, though not reading, but
standing at her window with fast-throbbing heart, peeping anxiously from
behind the blind. At last she heard Mr. Helstone come in; she saw Robert vault
the churchyard wall; she then went down to prayers.
When she returned to her chamber, it was to meet the memory of Robert.
Long she sat at her window, long gazed down on the old garden and church, on
the tombs laid out grey and calm in moonlight. She was with Moore in spirit;
she was at his side; she heard his voice; she gave her hand into his hand; it
rested warm in his fingers. When the church clock struck, a little mouse
familiar to her chamber – an intruder for which she would never permit Fanny
to lay a trap – came rattling amongst the trinkets on the dressing-table, to nibble
a bit of biscuit laid ready for it. Then Caroline looked up, recalled to the real
world, and said half aloud, as if to some unseen accuser:
“I am not cherishing love dreams; I am only thinking because I cannot
sleep. Of course, I know he will marry Shirley.”
She resumed the dream, nestling to the vision’s side – listening to,
conversing with it. It paled at last. As dawn approached, the setting stars and
breaking day dimmed the creation of fancy; the wakened song of birds hushed
her whispers. The tale became a vague murmur. The shape turned cold and
ghostly grey. She was left solitary at last. She crept to her couch, chill and
dejected.
↑

Chapter 14

SHIRLEY SEEKS TO BE SAVED BY WORKS


“Of course, I know he will marry Shirley,” were her first words when she
rose in the morning. “And he ought to marry her. She can help him.”
But the cruel next thought was, “Oh! I shall be wholly forgotten when
they are married! And what shall I do when Robert is quite taken from me?
Where shall I turn? My Robert! I wish I could call him mine. But I am poverty;
Shirley is wealth and power, and beauty too, and love. I cannot deny it. She
loves him. Let them be married, then. But afterwards I shall be nothing to him.
As for being his sister, and all that stuff, I despise it. I will be all or nothing to a
man like Robert. Once that pair is united, I will certainly leave them. As little
could I fill the place of their mutual friend as that of their deadly foe. Robert is
a first-rate man: I love him. I would be his wife if I could; as I cannot, I must go
where I shall never see him. – Sunder me then, Providence. Part us speedily.”
Late in the afternoon, the apparition of one of the people haunting her
thoughts passed the parlour window. Miss Keeldar sauntered slowly by with her
usual mixture of wistfulness and carelessness.
“What do you mean by not coming to see me this afternoon, as you
promised?” she asked Caroline as she entered.
“I was not in the humour,” replied Miss Helstone truthfully.
Shirley had already fixed on her a penetrating eye.
“No,” she said; “I see you are not in the humour for loving me. You are in
one of your sunless, inclement moods, when a fellow-creature’s presence is not
welcome to you. You have such moods. Are you aware of it?”
“Do you mean to stay long, Shirley?”
“Yes. I am come for tea, and must have it before I go. I shall take the
liberty of removing my bonnet without being asked.”
And this she did.
“A pretty expression you have on your face,” she went on, still gazing
keenly and rather pityingly at Caroline. “Wonderfully self-supported you look,
you solitude-seeking, wounded deer. Are you afraid Shirley will bother you if
she discovers that you are hurt?”
“I never do fear Shirley.”
“But sometimes you dislike her; often you avoid her. Shirley can feel
when she is shunned. If you had not walked home in the company you did last
night, you would have been a different girl today. What time did you reach the
rectory?”
“By ten.”
“Humph! You took three-quarters of an hour to walk a mile. Was it you,
or Moore, who lingered so?”
“Shirley, you talk nonsense.”
“He talked nonsense – that I doubt not. I feel disposed to call him out – I
have felt desperately irritated all day.”
“You don’t ask me why,” she went on, after a pause, “you little silent,
over-modest thing; and you don’t deserve that I should pour out my secrets into
your lap. Upon my word, I could have duelled with Moore yesterday. I have
pistols, and can use them.”
“Stuff, Shirley! Which would you have shot – me or Robert?”
“Neither, perhaps. More likely a bat or a tree. He is a puppy, your cousin
– a quiet, serious, ambitious puppy. I see him standing before me, talking his
half-stern, half-gentle talk, bearing me down with his set purpose; and then – I
have no patience with him!”
Miss Keeldar started off on a rapid walk through the room.
“You are mistaken,” urged Caroline anxiously. “Robert is no puppy or
flirt; I can vouch for that.”
“You vouch for it! Do you think I’ll take your word on the subject? To
advance Moore’s fortune you would cut off your right hand.”
“But not tell lies. And I assure you that he was just civil to me last night –
that was all.”
“I never asked what he was. I can guess. I saw him from the window take
your hand.”
“That is nothing. I am his cousin, you know.”
“I feel indignant, and that is the long and short of the matter,” responded
Miss Keeldar. “All my comfort is broken up by his manœuvres. He keeps
intruding between you and me. Without him we should be good friends; but that
six feet of puppyhood perpetually eclipses our friendship. He makes me seem to
you a mere bore and a nuisance.”
“No, Shirley, no.”
“He does. You did not want my society this afternoon, and I feel it hard.
You are naturally somewhat reserved, but I am a sociable person. I have such
regard for you that I could have you with me always, and not for a second do I
ever wish to be rid of you. You cannot say as much about me.”
“Shirley, I like you. I am every day growing fonder of you. You know I
am too English to get up a vehement friendship all at once; but you are so
different to everyday young ladies. I esteem you, I value you; you are never a
burden to me. Do you believe me?”
“Partly,” replied Miss Keeldar, smiling rather incredulously; “but quiet as
you look, you have hidden depths. Then you are certainly not happy, and
unhappy people are often preoccupied, and not in the mood for companionship.
Moreover, there is a sort of unhappiness which not only depresses, but
corrodes; and that, I fear, is your portion. Will pity do you any good, Lina? If it
will, take some from Shirley; it is genuine.”
“Shirley, I never had a sister; but it flashes on me how sisters feel towards
each other – affection which no shocks can uproot, which little quarrels only
trample for an instant; affection that no passion can outrival, with which even
love itself cannot do more than compete. Love hurts us so, Shirley. It is so
tormenting, so racking, and it burns away our strength with its flame. Affection
brings no pain and fire, only sustenance and balm. I am supported and soothed
when you are near, Shirley. Do you believe me now?”
“We really are friends, then, Lina?”
“We really are,” returned the other, drawing Shirley towards her, and
making her sit down, “chance what may.”
“Come, then; we will talk of something else.” But at this moment the
rector came in, and the “something else” was not again alluded to till the
moment of Shirley’s departure. She delayed a few minutes in the passage to
say:
“Caroline, I wish to tell you that I have a great weight on my mind; my
conscience is uneasy. Not my private conscience, you must understand, but my
lord-of-the-manor conscience. I have got into the clutch of an eagle with iron
talons. I have fallen under a stern influence, which I cannot resist. Something
will be done soon, I fear, which it does not please me to think of. To ease my
mind, I mean to enter on good works. Don’t be surprised, therefore, if you see
me all at once turn outrageously charitable. I have no idea how to begin, but
you must give me some advice. We will talk more on the subject tomorrow; and
just ask that excellent Miss Ainley to step up to Fieldhead. I have some notion
of putting myself under her tuition.”
On the morrow Caroline found Shirley sitting gravely at her desk, with an
account-book, a bundle of banknotes, and a well-filled purse before her. She
was looking mighty serious, but a little puzzled. She said she had been “casting
an eye” over the weekly expenditure in housekeeping at the hall, trying to find
out where she could retrench; that she had also just seen Mrs. Gill, the cook,
and had sent that person away with a notion that her mistress was crazed.
“I have lectured her on the duty of being careful,” said she, “in a way
quite new to her. I surprised myself; for I never thought about the subject of
economy till lately. But it is all theory; for when I came to the practical part, I
could not take off a single pound of butter, lard, bread, cold meat, or other
kitchen item whatever. And I could not ask the meaning of unaccountable
pounds of candles. We do not wash for the parish, yet I viewed in silence bills
for enough soap and bleaching-powder to run a laundry. Carnivorous I am not,
nor is Mrs. Pryor, yet I only opened my eyes a little wider when I saw the vast
butchers’ bills. Caroline, you may laugh at me; I am a coward. I blushed and
hung my head before Mrs. Gill, when she ought to have been faltering
confessions to me. I found it impossible even to hint, much less to prove, that
she was a cheat. I have no true courage.”
“Shirley, my uncle says there are not ten thousand men in England as
genuinely fearless as you.”
“I am fearless, physically; I am never nervous about danger. I was not
afraid when Mr. Wynne’s great bull bellowed and made a run at me, as I was
crossing the lea; but I was afraid of seeing Mrs. Gill brought to shame. You
have ten times my strength of mind on certain subjects, Caroline. You, whom
nothing can induce to pass a bull, however quiet he looks, would have firmly
shown my housekeeper she had done wrong; then you would have gently and
wisely admonished her; and at last, I dare say, you would have sweetly forgiven
her. Of this I am incapable. However, I find we live within our means. I have
money in hand, and I really must do some good with it. The Briarfield poor
must be helped. What ought I to do, think you, Lina? Had I not better distribute
the cash at once?”
“No, indeed, Shirley; I have often noticed that your only notion of charity
is to give shillings and half-crowns in a careless, free-handed sort of way. You
suggested Miss Ainley; to Miss Ainley I will apply. And, meantime, promise to
not begin throwing away your money!”
“It is not an immense sum, but I feel responsible for its disposal; and
really this responsibility weighs heavily on my mind. They say that there are
some families starving in Briarfield. I must and will help them. We should help
each other through seasons of want and woe as well as we can.”
“You do help others, Shirley. You give a great deal as it is.”
“Not enough. I must give more. Let me listen to Mercy as long as she is
near me. After all, if my property is attacked, I shall defend it like a tigress. If
the poor rise in the form of the mob, I shall turn against them; I must resist
them, and I will.”
“You talk like Robert.”
“I feel like Robert, only more fierily. Let them meddle with Robert, or
Robert’s mill, and I shall hate them. If once they violently wrong me or mine, I
shall quite forget pity for their wretchedness.”
“Shirley, how your eyes flash!”
“Because my soul burns. Would you let Robert be borne down by a
mob?”
“If I had your power to aid Robert, I would use it as you mean to use it. If
I could be such a friend to him as you can be, I would stand by him, as you
mean to do, till death.”
“And now, Lina, your eyes glow. However, it is not yet come to fighting.
I want to prevent mischief. I cannot forget that these embittered feelings of the
poor have their origin in suffering. To allay this suffering, and thereby lessen
their hate, I will give; and I must give wisely. We must introduce some clear,
calm, practical sense into our councils. So go and fetch Miss Ainley.”
Caroline put on her bonnet and departed. It may, perhaps, appear strange
that neither she nor Shirley thought of consulting Mrs. Pryor; but they were
wise in abstaining. To have consulted her would only have caused her painful
embarrassment. She was better read and a deeper thinker than Miss Ainley, but
of administrative energy she had none. She would give her own modest mite to
charity; but as to forming plans on a large scale, that was out of the question.
It was a bright day for Miss Ainley when she was summoned to
Fieldhead; when she was seated with all honour and deference at a table with
paper, pen and – best of all – cash before her, and requested to draw up a plan
for bringing relief to the destitute poor of Briarfield. She, who knew them all,
had studied their wants, who had again and again felt how they might best be
helped, was fully competent for the task, and a meek exultation gladdened her
kind heart as she answered the eager questions put by the two girls.
Shirley placed at her disposal £300, at which Miss Ainley’s eyes filled
with joyful tears. She quickly drew up a simple, sensible plan for its
expenditure; and she doubted not that the lady of Fieldhead’s example would be
followed by others. She should try to get additional subscriptions, and to form a
fund; but first she must consult the clergy. Yes, Mr. Helstone, Dr. Boultby and
Mr. Hall must be consulted (for not only must Briarfield be relieved, but
Whinbury and Nunnely). She would not take a single step unauthorized by
them.
The clergy were sacred beings in Miss Ainley’s eyes; no matter how
insignificant the individual, his station made him holy. The very curates – who,
in their trivial arrogance, were hardly worthy to carry her umbrella – were
regarded by her as infant saints. If their little vices and enormous absurdities
were pointed out to her, she could not see them; the white surplice covered a
multitude of sins.
Shirley, knowing of this harmless infatuation, stipulated that the curates
were to have no voice in the disposal of the money; their meddling fingers were
not to be inserted into the pie. The rectors, of course, might be trusted. They
had experience and sagacity, and Mr. Hall, at least, had sympathy for his
fellow-men; but the youth under them must be kept down in subordination and
silence.
It was with some horror that Miss Ainley heard this language. Caroline,
however, putting in a mild word or two in praise of Mr Sweeting, calmed her
again. Sweeting was, indeed, Miss Ainley’s own favourite. She had at times
offered him sponge-cake and glasses of cowslip wine, when he came to see her
in her little cottage, with truly motherly regard. The same offerings she had
once presented to Malone; but he showed such open scorn that she had never
repeated it. To Donne she always served the treat, and was happy to see his
approbation proved by his eating two pieces of cake, and putting a third in his
pocket.
Miss Keeldar proposed to collect the clergy together that evening at
Fieldhead. Miss Ainley was to meet them, and the plan was to be discussed.
Shirley managed to get the senior priesthood together accordingly, and
before the old maid’s arrival, she had talked all the gentlemen into the most
charming mood imaginable. She herself had taken in hand Dr. Boultby and Mr.
Helstone. The first was a stubborn old Welshman, opinionated and obstinate,
yet a man who did a great deal of good, though not without making some noise
about it. The latter we know. She had rather a friendly feeling for both,
especially for old Helstone; and it cost her no trouble to be quite delightful to
them. She took them round the garden, and gathered them flowers, like a kind
daughter. Mr. Hall she left to Caroline – or rather, to Caroline Mr. Hall
consigned himself.
He generally sought Caroline in every gathering where they both
happened to be. He was not a lady’s man, though all ladies liked him; he was
something of a book-worm. His frankness, integrity and piety won him friends
at every level. It was only with young, fashionable ladies he felt a little shy.
Being himself a plain man – plain in appearance, manners and speech – he
seemed to fear their dash, elegance, and airs.
But Miss Helstone had neither dash nor airs, and her elegance was of a
very quiet order. Mr. Hall was a fluent, cheerful talker, and Caroline liked him
to sit next to her in a party, and thus keep her safe from Peter Malone, Joseph
Donne, or John Sykes; and Mr. Hall availed himself of this privilege whenever
he could. Such preference shown by a single gentleman to a single lady would
normally have set the gossips talking; but as Cyril Hall was forty-five, slightly
bald, and slightly grey, nobody ever thought he was likely to marry Miss
Helstone. Nor did he think so himself. He was wedded already to his books and
his parish. His kind sister Margaret, spectacled and learned like himself, made
him happy in his single state; he considered it too late to change. Besides, he
had known Caroline as a little girl; he had bought her toys, and felt that her
friendship for him held a daughterly respect.
When Miss Ainley arrived, she was welcomed kindly by everyone. Mrs.
Pryor and Margaret Hall made room for her on the sofa; they formed a trio
which the gay and thoughtless would have scorned as quite worthless and
unattractive – yet which had its own quiet value, as many a suffering and
friendless human knew.
Shirley opened the business and showed the plan.
“I know the hand which drew that up,” said Mr. Hall, glancing at Miss
Ainley, and smiling. Boultby heard and deliberated with protruded under lip.
His consent he considered too weighty to be given in a hurry. Helstone glanced
sharply round with an alert, suspicious expression, as if he felt that something
in petticoats was somehow trying underhand to acquire too much influence, and
make itself important.
Shirley caught and comprehended the expression. “This scheme is
nothing,” said she carelessly. “It is only an outline – a mere suggestion. You,
gentlemen, are requested to draw up your own rules.”
And she fetched her writing-case, smiling queerly to herself. She
produced paper and pen, drew an arm-chair to the table, and begged Helstone to
sit there. For a minute he was a little stiff, wrinkling his forehead strangely. At
last he muttered, “Well, you are neither my wife nor my daughter, so I’ll be led
for once; but mind – I know I am led. Your little female manœuvres don’t blind
me.”
“Oh!” said Shirley, putting the pen into his hand, “you must regard me as
Captain Keeldar today. This is quite a gentleman’s affair – yours and mine
entirely. The ladies there are only our aides-de-camp.”
He smiled a little grimly, and began to write. He asked questions, and
consulted his brethren, disdainfully lifting his glance over the curly heads of the
two girls and the demure caps of the elder ladies. In the discussion all three
gentlemen, to their credit, showed they knew the poor of their parishes, and
their separate wants. Each rector knew where clothing was needed, where food
would be most acceptable, where money could be safely bestowed. Wherever
their memories fell short, Miss Ainley or Miss Hall could help them out; but
both ladies took care not to speak unless spoken to.
Shirley stood behind the rectors, leaning over their shoulders now and
then to glance at the rules drawn up and the list of cases, listening, and at
intervals smiling her queer smile – a smile not ill-natured, but significant. Men
rarely like people who read their inward nature too clearly. It is good for
women, especially, to have mild, dim eyes, that never penetrate below the
surface of things. Thousands, knowing this, keep their eyelids drooped; but the
most downcast glance can, on occasion, take its survey of life.
When all was settled to Miss Keeldar’s liking, and the clergy had entered
so fully into the spirit of her plans as to promise £50 each, as the first
subscriptions to the fund, she ordered supper to be served. She had previously
directed Mrs. Gill to exercise her utmost skill. Mr. Hall was an abstemious man,
indifferent to luxury; but Boultby and Helstone both liked good cookery. The
supper put them into excellent humour. A glass of fine wine was tried, and
Captain Keeldar was complimented on his taste. He had succeeded in gratifying
his priestly guests; and was radiant with glee.
↑

Chapter 15

MR. DONNE’S EXODUS


The next day Shirley told Caroline how delighted she felt that the little
party had gone off so well.
“I rather like to entertain a circle of gentlemen,” said she. “It is amusing
to observe how they enjoy their meal. They retain something of the naïveté of
children about food, and one likes to please them – that is, when they show the
decent restraint of our admirable rectors. Moore has not that child’s simplicity.
Did you ever find out his accessible point, Caroline? you have seen more of
him than I.”
“It is not food, at any rate,” returned Caroline, smiling. She always felt a
shy pleasure in discussing her cousin’s character. Left to herself, she would
never have touched on the subject; but when invited, the temptation of talking
about him was irresistible. “But,” she added, “I really don’t know what it is, for
whenever I watched Robert, my scrutiny was baffled by finding he was
watching me.”
“There it is!” exclaimed Shirley. “He is never off his guard. He won’t
give you an advantage. Even when he does not look at you, he seems to be busy
tracing your words to their source, contemplating your motives. Oh! I know that
sort of character. It piques me singularly. How does it affect you?”
This question was a specimen of one of Shirley’s sharp, sudden turns.
Caroline used to be flustered by them at first, but she had now got used to
parrying them.
“Pique you? In what way?” she said.
“Here comes a diversion!” exclaimed Shirley, breaking off and running to
the window. “I never told you of a superb conquest I have made lately, without
any effort or intention on my part. By all that’s delicious! there are two of them.
Do they only hunt in couples? You may have one, Lina; take your choice.
Listen to Tartar!”
Her black-muzzled dog here gave tongue in the hall, where its deep bark
echoed formidably. A growl as menacing as muttered thunder followed.
“Listen!” cried Shirley, laughing. “They will be frightened. They don’t
know old Tartar as I do. His uproars are all sound and fury, signifying nothing!”
Some bustle was heard. “Down, sir, down!” exclaimed a high-toned,
imperious voice, and then came a crack of a cane. Immediately there was a yell
– a scutter – a run – a positive tumult.
“O Malone, Malone!”
“Down! down!” cried the high voice.
“He really is worrying them!” exclaimed Shirley. “They have struck him.
He is not used to being hit.”
Out she ran. A gentleman was fleeing up the oak staircase, making for
refuge upstairs; another was backing to the stairfoot, wildly flourishing a knotty
stick, crying, “Down! down!” while the dog bayed and howled at him, and a
group of servants came bundling from the kitchen. The dog made a spring; the
second gentleman turned tail and rushed after his comrade. The first was
already safe in a bedroom; he held the door closed against his fellow – nothing
so merciless as terror.
“Gentlemen,” said Miss Keeldar’s silvery but vibrating tones, “Calm
yourselves! Come down! Look at Tartar; he won’t harm a cat.”
She was caressing Tartar. He lay crouched at her feet, his fore paws
stretched out, snorting, his bulldog eyes holding a dull fire. His was an honest,
phlegmatic, stubborn canine character. He loved his mistress and John – the
man who fed him – but was indifferent to the rest of the world. He was quiet
enough, unless struck or threatened, and that put a demon into him.
“Mr. Malone, how do you do?” continued Shirley, smiling. “That is Mrs.
Pryor’s apartment. Request your friend Mr. Donne to come out. I shall have the
greatest pleasure in receiving him in a lower room.”
“Ha! ha!” cried Malone, leaning over the balustrade. “Really, that animal
alarmed Donne. He is a little timid. I thought it better to follow, in order to
reassure him.”
“Well, come down, if you please. John” (turning to her manservant), “go
upstairs and liberate Mr. Donne. Take care, Mr. Malone; the stairs are
slippery.”
The caution came a little late for Malone. He had slipped already in his
stately descent, and was only saved from falling by a clutch at the banisters,
which made the whole structure creak.
Tartar growled once more. Malone, however, was no coward. The dog
had taken him by surprise, but he passed him now in suppressed fury rather
than fear. If a look could have strangled Tartar, he would have breathed no
more. Forgetting politeness, Malone pushed into the parlour before Miss
Keeldar. He glanced at Miss Helstone; he could scarcely bring himself to bow
to her. He glared at both the ladies as if he would have liked to clutch one in
each hand and throttle them.
However, Shirley took pity and ceased to laugh; and Caroline was too
true a lady to smile. Tartar was dismissed; Peter Augustus was soothed by
Shirley’s tones. He had the sense to feel that he had better be civil, and
presently grew quite himself again. He had come, indeed, for the express
purpose of making himself fascinating.
Perhaps to allow an easy exit, he took his seat on a chair close to the door.
No longer sullen or furious, he grew constrained and embarrassed. He talked to
the ladies by fits and starts, on the most commonplace topics. He sighed deeply,
significantly, after every sentence; he sighed in each pause; he sighed before he
spoke.
At last, aiming to add ease to his other charms, he drew forth an ample
silk pocket-handkerchief. This was to be the graceful toy with which his
unoccupied hands were to trifle. He went to work with energy. He folded the
red-and-yellow square cornerwise; he whipped it open; again he folded it more
narrowly; he made of it a handsome band. To what would he apply it? Would
he wrap it about his throat – his head?
Neither. Peter Augustus had an original genius. He sat on the chair with
his athletic Irish legs crossed, and these legs he circled with the bandana and
bound firmly together. It was evident he felt this device to be worth an encore;
he repeated it more than once.
The second performance sent Shirley to the window, to laugh silently and
unseen; it turned Caroline’s head aside, that her long curls might screen her
smile. Miss Helstone, indeed, was amused by Peter’s abrupt diversion of his
homage from herself to the heiress. The £5,000 he supposed her likely one day
to inherit had no weight against Miss Keeldar’s estate and hall. He took no
pains to conceal his tactics. He pretended to no gradual change of views; he
wheeled about at once, to pursue the greater fortune of the two. On what
grounds he expected to succeed in his chase, only he knew.
It appeared to be some time before Mr. Donne could be persuaded to
descend the stairs. At length, however, he appeared, seeming not at all
ashamed. Donne, indeed, was of that immovably complacent, densely selfsatisfied nature which feels no shame. He had never blushed in his life; no
humiliation could abash him; he had no modesty; he was arrogant, conceited
and inane; and this gentleman had a notion of wooing Miss Keeldar! He knew
no more, however, how to set about it than if he had been an image carved in
wood. His notion was, after visiting her a few times, to write a letter proposing
marriage. She would accept him for love of his position; they would be married,
and he should be master of Fieldhead; he should live very comfortably, have
servants at his command, eat and drink of the best, and be a great man.
You would not have suspected his intentions when he addressed his
intended bride in an injured tone: “A very dangerous dog that, Miss Keeldar. I
wonder you should keep such an animal.”
“Do you, Mr. Donne? I am very fond of him.”
“You cannot be serious. A lady fond of that ugly brute – a mere carter’s
dog! Pray hang him.”
“Hang him!”
“And purchase instead some pug or poodle. Ladies generally like lapdogs.”
“Perhaps I am an exception.”
“Oh, you can’t be, you know. All ladies are alike in those matters.”
“Tartar frightened you terribly, Mr. Donne. I hope you won’t take any
harm.”
“That I shall, no doubt. He gave me a turn I shall not soon forget. When I
saw him about to spring, I thought I should have fainted.”
“Perhaps you did faint in the bedroom; you were a long time there.”
“No; I was holding the door fast. Your man persuaded me to come out at
last by saying the dog was chained up in his kennel. But what is that? I declare
he told a falsehood! The dog is there!”
And indeed Tartar walked past the garden door. He still seemed in bad
humour: he was growling again, and wheezing.
“There are other visitors coming,” observed Shirley, with the provoking
coolness which the owners of formidable-looking dogs tend to show while their
animals are all bristle and bay. Tartar sprang towards the gate, bellowing. His
mistress quietly opened the glass door, and stepped out to him. His bellow was
already silenced, and he was lifting up his huge, blunt head to the new callers to
be patted.
“What! Tartar!” said a cheery, rather boyish voice, “Good-morning, old
boy!”
And little Mr. Sweeting, who was fearless of man, woman or brute, came
through the gate, caressing the dog. His vicar, Mr. Hall, followed. He had no
fear of Tartar either. Tartar snuffed both the gentlemen, and then, as if
concluding that they were harmless, he withdrew to the sunny front of the hall.
Shirley advanced to greet Messrs. Hall and Sweeting cordially. They were
come to tell her of successes they had achieved that morning in asking for
subscriptions to the fund. Mr. Hall’s eyes beamed, his plain face positively
handsome with goodness; and when Caroline ran out to meet him, and put both
her hands into his, he gazed on her with gentle affection.
Instead of re-entering the house, they strayed through the garden, the
ladies walking one on each side of Mr. Hall. It was a breezy, sunny day; the air
freshened the girls’ cheeks and gracefully dishevelled their ringlets. Mr. Hall
spoke oftenest to his brilliant companion, and looked most frequently at the
quiet one. Miss Keeldar gathered handfuls of flowers and gave some to
Caroline, telling her to choose a nosegay for Mr. Hall; and with her lap filled
with delicate blossoms, Caroline sat down on the steps of the summer-house.
The vicar stood near her, leaning on his cane.
Shirley now called out the neglected pair in the oak parlour. She led
Donne past his dread enemy Tartar, who, with his nose on his paws, lay snoring
under the noon sun. Donne was not grateful, but he was glad of the safeguard.
Miss Keeldar, wishing to be impartial, offered the curates flowers. They
accepted them awkwardly; Malone seemed specially at a loss, with a bouquet
filling one hand, and his shillelagh in the other. Donne’s fatuous “Thank you!”
implied that he considered this offering a homage to his merits, and an attempt
by the heiress to ingratiate herself into his priceless affections. Sweeting alone
received the posy like the sensible little man he was, putting it gallantly into his
buttonhole.
As a reward, Miss Keeldar gave him an errand which made his eyes
sparkle with glee. Away he flew to the kitchen. Ere long he reappeared,
carrying a round table, which he placed under the cedar; then he collected six
garden-chairs from various nooks, and placed them in a circle. The parlourmaid came out with a tray, and Sweeting aided her in setting out plates, knives,
and forks, and a neat luncheon of cold chicken, ham, and tarts.
David Sweeting and Shirley were on the best terms in the world; and his
devotion to the heiress was quite disinterested, for it did not affect his faithful
allegiance to the magnificent Dora Sykes.
The repast turned out a very merry one. Donne and Malone contributed
little to its vivacity, being busy with fork and wine-glass; but with four such
natures as Mr. Hall, David Sweeting, Shirley and Caroline assembled on a
green lawn, under a sunny sky, amidst a wilderness of flowers, there could not
be dullness.
Mr. Hall reminded the ladies that Whitsuntide was approaching, when the
grand united Sunday-school tea-drinking and procession of the three parishes of
Briarfield, Whinbury, and Nunnely were to take place. Caroline, he knew,
would be at her post as teacher, and he hoped Miss Keeldar would make her
first public appearance amongst them at that time.
Shirley was not the person to miss an occasion of this sort. She liked
festive gatherings, a throng of glad faces, and told Mr. Hall they might count on
her. She did not know what she would have to do, but they might order her as
they pleased.
“And,” said Caroline, “you will promise to sit at my table, Mr. Hall?”
“I shall not fail, ” said he. “I have sat at her right hand at these monster
tea-drinkings for the last six years,” he continued, turning to Miss Keeldar.
“They made her a Sunday-school teacher when she was a little girl of twelve.
The first time she had to make tea in public, there was some piteous trembling
and flushing. I observed the speechless panic, the cups shaking in the little
hand, and the overflowing teapot. I came to her aid, managed the urn, and in
fact made the tea for her like any old woman.”
“I was very grateful to you,” interposed Caroline.
“You told me so with an earnest sincerity that repaid me well, for it was
not like the manner of most little ladies of twelve. She kept close to me, Miss
Keeldar, the rest of the evening, walking with me over the grounds where the
children were playing; she followed me into the vestry when all were
summoned into church; she would, I believe, have mounted with me to the
pulpit, had I not taken the precaution of conducting her to her pew.”
“And he has been my friend ever since,” said Caroline.
“And always sat at her table, and handed the cups. The next thing I do for
her will be to marry her one day to some curate or mill-owner. – But mind,
Caroline, I shall inquire about the bridegroom’s character; and if he is not a
gentleman likely to make you happy, I will not officiate. So take care.”
“The warning is useless. I am not going to be married. I shall live single,
like your sister Margaret, Mr. Hall.”
“Very well. You might do worse. Margaret is not unhappy. She has her
books for a pleasure, and her brother for a care, and is content. If ever you want
a home, if the day should come when Briarfield rectory is yours no longer,
come to Nunnely vicarage. We will make you tenderly welcome.”
“There are your flowers. Now,” said Caroline, “you don’t care for a
bouquet, but you must give it to Margaret; only, to be sentimental for a
moment, keep that little wild forget-me-not, and to be still more sentimental –
let me take two or three of the blue blossoms and put them in my souvenir
book.”
And she took out a small book with a silver clasp, wherein she inserted
the flowers, writing round them in pencil, “To be kept for the sake of the Rev.
Cyril Hall, my friend. May —, 18—.”
The Rev. Cyril Hall, on his part, placed a sprig in safety between the
leaves of a pocket Testament. He only wrote on the margin, “Caroline.”
“Now,” said he, smiling, “I trust we are romantic enough. Miss Keeldar, I
hope you are laughing at this; but the fact is, I am so used to comply with the
requests of this young friend, I don’t know how to refuse her. When requested
to be sentimental, I obey.”
“Margaret told me he is naturally sentimental,” remarked Caroline, “and I
know what pleases him.”
“That you should be good and happy? Yes; that is one of my greatest
pleasures. May God long preserve to you the blessings of peace and innocence!
I mean comparative innocence; for in His sight, I am well aware, none are pure.
All have faults and frailty, needing the strength of His Spirit. Let us all cherish
humility, when we look into our own hearts, and see there temptations which
we blush to recognize. It is not youth, nor good looks, nor any outer charm
which makes beauty or goodness in God’s eyes. In the sight of her Maker, Mary
Ann Ainley is fairer and better than either of you young things, wrapt up in
yourselves and in earthly hopes. She, with meekness and reverence, treads close
in her Redeemer’s steps.”
Here the harsh voice of Donne broke in. “Ahem!” he began, clearing his
throat importantly. “Ahem! Miss Keeldar, your attention an instant, if you
please.”
“Well,” said Shirley nonchalantly, “what is it? I am all ears.”
“I hope part of you is hand also,” returned Donne, “and part purse. It is to
the hand and purse I appeal. I came here this morning to beg of you a
subscription to a school. I and Dr. Boultby intend to erect one in the hamlet of
Ecclefigg. The Baptists have a chapel there, and we want to dispute the
ground.”
“But I have nothing to do with Ecclefigg. I possess no property there.”
“What does that signify? You’re a churchwoman, ain’t you?”
“Admirable creature!” muttered Shirley, under her breath. “Fine style!”
Then aloud, “I am a churchwoman, certainly.”
“Then you can’t refuse to contribute. The population of Ecclefigg are a
parcel of brutes; we want to civilize them.”
“Who is to be the missionary?”
“Myself, probably.”
“You won’t fail through lack of sympathy with your flock.”
“I expect success; but we must have money. There is the paper. Pray give
a handsome sum.”
When asked for money, Shirley rarely held back. She put down her name
for £5. After the £300 she had lately given, and the many smaller sums she was
giving constantly, it was as much as she could at present afford.
Donne looked at it, declared the amount “shabby,” and loudly demanded
more. Miss Keeldar flushed up with indignation and astonishment.
“At present I shall give no more,” said she.
“Not give more! Why, with your property, I expected you to head the list
with a cool hundred. In the south,” went on Donne, “a lady with a thousand a
year would be ashamed to give five pounds for a public object.”
Shirley, rarely haughty, looked so now. Her slight frame tensed; her face
quickened with scorn.
“Strange remarks,” said she. “Reproach in return for bounty is
misplaced.”
“Bounty! Do you call five pounds bounty?”
“I do. If I had not given it to Dr. Boultby’s intended school, the building
of which I approve, and in no way to his ill-mannered curate – but for this, I
should instantly reclaim it.”
Donne was thick-skinned. “Wretched place, this Yorkshire,” he went on.
“The people – what a set! How coarse and uncultivated! They would be scouted
in the south.”
Shirley leaned forwards on the table, her fingers interlaced and
compressing each other hard.
“The rich,” pursued the unconscious Donne, “are a parcel of misers. You
scarcely ever see a family where a proper carriage or butler is kept; and as to
the poor – clattering in clogs; the men in their shirt-sleeves, the women in mobcaps and bed-gowns. They positively deserve that one should turn a mad cow
amongst them to rout them. He-he! what fun it would be!”
“There! you have reached the climax,” said Shirley quietly, turning her
glowing glance towards him. “You cannot go beyond it, and,” she added with
emphasis, “you shall not, in my house.”
Up she rose, walked to her garden gates, and flung them wide open.
“Walk through quickly,” she said austerely, “and set foot on this
pavement no more.”
Donne was astounded. He had thought he was showing himself off to
high advantage, as a lofty-souled person of the first “ton”; he imagined he was
producing a crushing impression. Had he not expressed disdain of everything in
Yorkshire? What more conclusive proof could be given that he was better than
anything there? And yet here was he about to be turned out like a dog out of a
garden!
“Madam! turn out a clergyman!”
“Off! Were you an archbishop you have proved yourself no gentleman,
and you must go. Quick!”
There was no trifling with her. Besides, Tartar was again rising; he
perceived symptoms of a commotion. There was nothing for it but to go, and
Donne made his exit, the heiress sweeping him a deep curtsy as she closed the
gates on him.
“How dare the pompous priest abuse his flock! How dare the cockney
revile Yorkshire!” was her sole observation, as she returned to the table.
Before long the little party broke up; Miss Keeldar’s ruffled and darkened
brow, curled lip, and incensed eye gave no invitation to further social
enjoyment.
↑

Chapter 16

WHITSUNTIDE


The fund prospered. By dint of Miss Keeldar’s example, the three rectors’
exertions, and the efficient though quiet aid of Mary Ann Ainley and Margaret
Hall, a handsome sum was raised, which greatly alleviated the distress of the
unemployed poor. The neighbourhood seemed to grow calmer. For a fortnight
past no cloth had been destroyed; no outrage on mill or mansion had been
committed in the three parishes. Shirley believed that the evil she wished to
avert was almost escaped, that the storm was passing over. With the approach
of summer, trade would improve – it always did; and this weary war could not
last for ever. With peace, what an impulse would be given to commerce!
Such was the usual tenor of her observations to her tenant, Gérard Moore,
when they met; and Moore would listen very quietly – too quietly to satisfy her.
She would impatiently demand his opinion. Smiling with that expression which
gave a remarkable sweetness to his mouth, while his brow remained grave, he
would answer that he too trusted that the war would end; on that ground his
hopes were fixed.
“For you are aware,” he would continue, “that I now work Hollow’s Mill
entirely on speculation. I sell nothing; there is no market for my goods. I
manufacture for the future, and am ready to take advantage of the first opening
that shall occur. Three months ago this was impossible to me; I had no money.
You well know who came to my rescue, from whom I received the loan which
saved me. I am aware that gain is doubtful; but I am quite cheerful. So long as I
can be active, it is impossible for me to be depressed. As you say, peace will
give an impulse to commerce; but as to the permanent good effect of your
charitable fund, I doubt. Relief never yet made the working-classes grateful; it
is not in human nature that it should. They ought not to be in a position to need
that humiliating relief; and this they feel. They hate us mill-owners worse than
ever. They hear from the disaffected in Nottingham and Manchester and
elsewhere. They receive orders from their chiefs. The danger is not gone – it is
only delayed. The long-threatening storm is sure to break at last.”
“Well, Mr. Moore” (so these conferences always ended), “take care of
yourself.”
“I do. I wish to live. The future opens like Eden before me; and still,
when I look deep into the shades of my paradise, I see a vision glide across
remote vistas.”
“Do you? Pray, what vision?”
“I see–”
The maid came bustling in with the tea-things.
In the last week of May, the weather cleared. A fresh wind swept off the
deep-piled rain-clouds, bearing them, mass on mass, to the eastern horizon,
leaving the vault behind all pure blue space, ready for the reign of the summer
sun. That sun rose broad on Whitsuntide.
Whit-Tuesday was the great day of the gathering of the schools. In
preparation, the two large schoolrooms of Briarfield were cleaned,
whitewashed, and decorated with flowers and evergreens – some from the
rectory garden, and two cartloads from Fieldhead.
In these schoolrooms twenty tables, each calculated to seat twenty guests,
were laid out, surrounded with benches, and covered with white cloths. Above
them were suspended some twenty cages containing canaries, according to a
fancy of the district. These tables were not spread for the twelve hundred
scholars of the three parishes, but only for the patrons and teachers. The
children’s feast was to be spread in the open air. At one o’clock the troops were
to come in; at two they were to be marshalled; till four they were to parade
through the parish; then came the feast, and afterwards the meeting with music
and speeches in the church.
Briarfield was chosen for the rendezvous, not because it was the largest or
oldest parish, but simply because Mr. Helstone willed it, and Mr. Helstone’s
will was stronger than that of Boultby or Hall. They let him lead and rule.
This occasion had always been a trying day to Caroline, because it
dragged her into public, compelling her to face the wealthy, respectable society
of the neighbourhood. Obliged to be conspicuous; obliged to walk at the head
of the first class; obliged to make tea at the first table for a mixed multitude of
ladies and gentlemen, and to do all this without the presence of mother, aunt, or
other chaperon – she being a nervous person, who mortally feared publicity – it
will be comprehended that she trembled at the approach of Whitsuntide.
But this year Shirley was to be with her, and that utterly changed the
aspect of the trial. It was a trial no longer – it was almost an enjoyment. Miss
Keeldar was better than a host of ordinary friends. Self-possessed, always
spirited and easy; conscious of her social importance, yet never presuming upon
it – it gave Caroline courage to look at her. The only fear was lest the heiress
should not be punctual. Caroline knew her uncle would not wait a second for
anyone. The moment the church clock tolled two, the march would begin.
Whit-Tuesday saw Caroline rise almost with the sun. She, Fanny, and
Eliza were busy the whole morning arranging the rectory parlours, and setting
out refreshments – wine, fruit, cakes – on the dining-room sideboard. Then she
had to dress in her freshest white muslin, as befitted the solemn occasion. Her
new sash – a birthday present from Margaret Hall, which she had reason to
believe Cyril himself had bought – was tied by Fanny, who took pleasure in
arraying her fair young mistress for the occasion. Caroline’s simple bonnet had
been trimmed to match her sash.
When ready she formed a picture, not dazzling, but delicately pleasing.
Her expression, like her dress, was modest, gentle, and, though pensive,
harmonious. After all, she was an imperfect, faulty human being, fair enough of
form, but, as Cyril Hall said, neither so good nor so great as the withered Miss
Ainley, now putting on her best black gown and drab shawl and bonnet in her
own narrow cottage.
Away Caroline went, across quiet fields and through hidden lanes, to
Fieldhead. Underfoot, all was clean and dry under the glowing sun. She walked
on daisy and turf to Fieldhead, and went to Miss Keeldar’s dressing-room.
It was well she had come, or Shirley would have been late. Instead of
making ready, she lay stretched on a couch, absorbed in reading. Mrs. Pryor
stood near, vainly urging her to rise and dress.
Caroline wasted no words. She immediately took the book from Shirley,
and with her own hands commenced to disrobe and rerobe her. Shirley, indolent
with the heat, and gay with her youth and nature, wanted to talk, laugh, and
linger; but Caroline persevered in dressing her as fast as fingers could manage.
At length, as she united a final row of hooks and eyes, she chided her, saying
she was very naughty to be so unpunctual, that she looked the picture of
carelessness; and so Shirley did, but a very lovely picture of that tiresome
quality.
She presented quite a contrast to Caroline. There was style in every fold
of her dress and every line of her figure. The rich silk suited her better than a
simpler costume; the embroidered scarf became her. She wore it negligently but
gracefully. There was a frank light in her eyes, a rallying smile about her lips,
as Caroline took her hand and hurried her out of doors; and thus they sped
through the fields, laughing as they went, and looking very much like a snowwhite dove and gem-tinted bird of paradise joined in flight.
Thanks to Miss Helstone, they arrived in good time. They heard the bell
tolling a summons for all to assemble. The trampling of many steps and
murmuring of many voices were audible. Soon they saw the Whinbury school
approaching, numbering five hundred souls. Boultby and Donne headed it – the
former walking under the canopy of a shovel-hat, with the squarest and vastest
of black coats, and the stoutest of gold-headed canes. Donne looked every inch
a curate, from his turned-up nose and complacent, lifted chin to his clerical
black gaiters, his somewhat short trousers, and his square-toed shoes.
Walk on, Mr. Donne! You have undergone scrutiny. You think you look
well. Whether the white and purple figures watching you from yonder hill think
so is another question.
These figures come running down when the regiment has marched by.
The churchyard is full of children and teachers, all in their best holiday attire;
and, bad as are the times, it is wonderful to see how respectably they have
managed to clothe themselves. The lady of the manor – Shirley, gazing with
pleasure on this happy-looking crowd – has really done them good. Her timely
bounty has supplied many a child with a new frock or bonnet. She knows it, and
is glad that her money has benefited those around her.
Caroline, too, is pleased, for she also has done good in her small way –
robbed herself of more than one dress or ribbon she could ill spare, to aid in
fitting out the scholars of her class; and as she could not give money, she has
followed Miss Ainley’s example in giving her time to sew for the children.
Not only is the churchyard full, but the rectory garden is thronged.
Groups of ladies and gentlemen are walking amongst the lilacs and laburnums.
The house also is occupied: at the wide-open parlour windows stand the patrons
and teachers. In the parson’s croft, behind the rectory, are the musicians of the
three parish bands, with their instruments. Fanny and Eliza, in their smartest
caps and gowns, move amongst them, serving out quarts of ale, specially
brewed by the rector’s orders. He could not endure “shabby doings”. Miss
Keeldar was like him in this respect, and they mutually approved each other’s
arrangements.
Caroline and Shirley were soon in the midst of the company. Caroline
coped very easily for her. Instead of sitting down in a retired corner, or stealing
away to her own room, she moved through the three parlours, conversed and
smiled, even spoke once or twice before she was spoken to, and, in short,
seemed a new creature. It was Shirley’s presence which thus transformed her.
Shirley had no fear of humanity, no tendency to shrink from it, and since she
thought well of all people until they might prove otherwise, she was a general
favourite.
Donne happened to come into the drawing-room while Shirley, sitting on
the sofa, formed the centre of a wide circle. She had already forgotten her
exasperation against him, and she bowed and smiled good-humouredly. The
man’s disposition was then seen. He knew neither how to decline her greeting
with dignity, as one whose just pride has been wounded, nor how to meet it
with frankness, as one who is glad to forget and forgive. So he merely passed
by sheepishly with a scowl.
“He was not worth a scene!” said Shirley to Caroline. “What a fool I was!
To take revenge on poor Donne’s silly spite about Yorkshire is like crushing a
gnat for attacking the hide of a rhinoceros. Had I been a gentleman, I believe I
should have forcibly helped him off the premises. But he must come near me no
more. He irritates me. He is not even amusing. Malone is better sport.”
The words were scarcely out of her mouth when Peter Augustus Malone
came up, gloved and scented, with his hair oiled, and bearing in one hand a
huge bunch of cabbage-roses. These he presented to the heiress. Who, after this,
could dare to say that Peter was not a lady’s man? He had given flowers; he had
offered a sentimental tribute at the shrine of Love. He must have thought this
himself, for he seemed amazed at what he had done. Backing off without a
word, he was going away with a husky chuckle of self-satisfaction; then he
bethought himself to stop and look back. There were the six red cabbages on
the purple satin lap, a white hand holding them; and over them, ringlets, half
hiding a laughing face.
Only half hiding! Peter saw the laugh; it was unmistakable. He was made
a joke of; his chivalry was the subject of a jest for a petticoat – for two
petticoats: Miss Helstone too was smiling. Peter grew black as a thunder-cloud.
When Shirley looked up, a fell eye was fastened on her. Malone, at least, had
energy enough in hate.
“Peter is worth a scene, and shall have it, if he likes, one day,” she
whispered to her friend.
And now the three rectors appeared at the dining-room door. They had
been busy in the church, and were coming to take some refreshment before the
march began. The large easy-chair had been left vacant for Dr. Boultby. He was
put into it, and Caroline hastened to hand him a glass of wine and a plate of
macaroons. Boultby’s churchwardens were already beside him, as were Mrs.
Sykes and the other ladies of his congregation, expressing their hopes that he
was not fatigued. Mrs. Boultby was bending over him, tenderly wiping some
perspiration, real or imaginary, from his brow. Boultby, in short, was in his
glory. Of Caroline he took no notice, save to accept what she offered. He did
not see her – he never did see her; he hardly knew that such a person existed.
He saw the macaroons, however.
Mr. Hall stood near an open window, talking like a brother to Miss
Ainley. To him Caroline turned with pleasure. “What should she bring him?”
She provided herself with a little plate, so that she might offer him variety.
Margaret Hall joined them; so did Miss Keeldar. The four ladies stood round
their favourite pastor. A throng, too, of twenty or more enclosed old Helstone.
The curates, herding together, made a constellation of three lesser planets.
Various young ladies watched them afar off, but ventured not nigh.
Mr. Helstone produced his watch. “Ten minutes to two,” he announced.
“Time to fall into line. Come.” He seized his shovel-hat and marched away. All
rose and followed en masse.
The twelve hundred children were drawn up in three bodies of four
hundred souls each; in the rear of each regiment was a band; between every
twenty there was a pair of teachers. To the front of the armies Mr. Helstone
summoned–
“Grace Boultby and Mary Sykes lead out Whinbury.
“Margaret Hall and Mary Ann Ainley conduct Nunnely.
“Caroline Helstone and Shirley Keeldar head Briarfield.”
Then again he gave command:
“Mr. Donne to Whinbury; Mr. Sweeting to Nunnely; Mr. Malone to
Briarfield.”
And these gentlemen stepped up. The rectors advanced to the very front;
Helstone lifted his shovel-hat. Out clashed the bells in the tower, loud swelled
the bands, deep rolled the drums, and away they marched.
The broad white road unrolled before the long procession; the twelve
hundred children and one hundred and forty adults trod on, with gay faces and
glad hearts. It was a joyous scene, a day of happiness for rich and poor. Let
England’s priests have their due. They are a faulty set in some respects, being
only flesh and blood like us all; but the land would be badly off without them.
Britain would miss her church, if that church fell. God save it! God also reform
it!
↑

Chapter 17
THE SCHOOL FEAST


The bands played martial tunes, and in some – Miss Keeldar, for instance
– these sounds awoke, if not a martial, yet a longing spirit. Old Helstone,
turning, looked at her; and they both laughed.
“There is no battle in prospect,” he said; “No foe is threatening our
liberty. We are only taking a walk. Keep your hand on the reins, captain, and
slack the fire of that spirit.”
“Take your own advice, doctor,” was Shirley’s response. To Caroline she
murmured, “I’ll borrow of imagination what reality will not give me. We are
not soldiers – or if we are, we are soldiers of the Cross, bound on a pilgrimage
to Palestine. But no; that is too visionary. I need a sterner dream. We are
Lowlanders of Scotland, following a Covenanting captain up into the hills to
pray. We know that battle may follow; and we are ready and willing to redden
the peat-moss with our blood. That music stirs my soul; it makes my heart beat
with a new, thrilling vigour. I almost long for danger – for a faith, a land, or at
least a lover to defend.”
“Look, Shirley!” interrupted Caroline. “What is that red speck above
Stilbro’ Brow? You have keener sight than I.”
Miss Keeldar looked. “They are soldiers – cavalry soldiers,” she said.
“They ride fast. There are six of them. They will pass us. No; they have turned
off to the right to avoid our procession.”
“Perhaps they are only exercising their horses.”
Mr. Helstone here spoke. “We shall pass through Royd Lane, to reach
Nunnely Common by a short cut.”
And into Royd Lane they accordingly filed. It was so narrow that only
two could walk abreast. They had reached the middle of it, when excitement
became obvious in the clerical commanders. The curates nudged each other;
Mr. Hall turned to the ladies and smiled.
“What is the matter?” they asked.
He pointed to the end of the lane before them. Another procession was
entering there, headed also by men in black, and followed also, as they could
now hear, by music.
“Is it our double?” asked Shirley.
“If you wanted a battle, you are likely to get one – at least of looks,”
whispered Caroline, laughing.
“They shall not pass us!” cried the curates; “we’ll not give way!”
“Give way!” retorted Helstone sternly; “who talks of giving way? You,
boys, mind what you are about. The ladies, I know, will be firm. Every
churchwoman here will stand her ground against these folks, for the honour of
the Establishment.”
“Who is it?” asked Shirley.
“The Dissenting and Methodist schools, the Baptists, Independents, and
Wesleyans, joined in unholy alliance, and turning purposely into this lane with
the intention of obstructing our march and driving us back.”
“Bad manners!” said Shirley. “Of course, they must have a lesson.”
“A lesson in politeness,” suggested Mr. Hall; “not an example of
rudeness.”
Old Helstone marched on ahead of his company, quickening his step. He
had nearly reached the other group, when its leader – a large, greasy man, with
black hair combed flat – called a halt. He drew forth a hymn book, gave out a
verse, and his group struck up the most dolorous of songs.
Helstone signed to his bands. They clashed out with all the power of
brass. He desired them to play “Rule, Britannia!” and ordered the children to
join in, which they did enthusiastically. As far as noise went, the enemy was
conquered.
“Now, follow me!” exclaimed Helstone; “not running, but at a firm, smart
pace. Keep together.”
And he strode on with such a determined gait, and was so well obeyed by
his scholars and teachers, who marched with cool, solid impetus – even the
curates – that the Dissenters were pressed back, and were at last forced to turn
tail and leave the exit from Royd Lane free. Boultby suffered in the onslaught,
but Helstone and Malone held him up, and brought him through the business,
whole in limb, though breathless.
The fat Dissenter who had given out the hymn was left sitting in the ditch.
He was a spirit merchant by trade, and, it was said, drank more water in that
one afternoon than he had swallowed for a twelvemonth before. Mr. Hall had
taken care of Caroline, and Caroline of him. Miss Keeldar and Mr. Helstone
shook hands heartily when they had got the whole party through the lane. The
curates began to exult, but Mr. Helstone curbed them, saying that they had
better hold their tongues; and that the business was none of their managing.
About half-past three the procession turned back, and at four once more
regained the starting-place. Long lines of benches were arranged in the fields
round the school. There the children were seated, and huge baskets of food
were brought out. A brief grace was pronounced by Mr. Hall. Large currant
buns and hot, sweet tea were then handed out liberally; each child being
allowed to have about twice as much as it could possibly eat, thus leaving some
to be carried home. Afterwards the benches were removed, and they were left to
play.
A bell summoned the teachers and patrons to the schoolroom. Miss
Keeldar, Miss Helstone, and other ladies were already there, checking the
arrangement of the tables. Most of the female servants of the neighbourhood
were busy cutting bread and butter and bringing hot water from the rector’s
kitchen. The profusion of flowers decorating the white walls, the show of silver
teapots and bright porcelain on the tables, the blithe faces and gay dresses,
formed altogether a refreshing and lively spectacle. Everybody talked merrily,
and the canary birds sang shrill in their high-hung cages.
Caroline, as the rector’s niece, took her place at one of the three first
tables; Mrs. Boultby and Margaret Hall officiated at the others. Here the élite of
the company were to be entertained. Miss Helstone removed her bonnet and
scarf; her long curls fell on her neck, almost like a veil; and her muslin dress
was as modest as a nun’s robe.
The room was filling. Mr. Hall took his post beside Caroline. He looked a
little grave about what had taken place in Royd Lane, and she tried to smile him
out of his seriousness.
Miss Keeldar sat very still, gazing round her vigilantly. She seemed afraid
lest some intruder should take a seat she apparently wished to reserve next to
her own, for she spread her satin dress over a portion of the bench, or laid her
gloves or handkerchief upon it. When Caroline asked her who she expected,
Shirley whispered softly:
“I expect Mr. Moore. I saw him last night, and I made him promise to
come with his sister, and to sit at our table. He won’t fail me, I feel certain; but
I fear he will come too late, and be separated from us. Here is a fresh batch
arriving; every place will be taken. Provoking!”
Mr. Wynne the magistrate and his family now entered in high state. They
were Briarfield gentry. Of course their place was at the first table; the
magistrate’s son, Mr. Sam Wynne, sat in the very vacancy Shirley had kept for
Moore, planting himself solidly on her gown, gloves, and handkerchief. She
was averse to Mr. Sam, especially because he showed serious symptoms of
aiming at her hand. His father, too, had publicly declared that the Fieldhead
estate and the Wynne estate were delightfully contagious – a malapropism
which rumour had not failed to repeat to Shirley.
Caroline’s ears still rung with that thrilling whisper, “I expect Mr.
Moore,” her heart yet beat with it, when a note from the organ pealed out. The
clergymen rose, so did everyone else, and grace was sung; then tea began. She
was kept too busy to have leisure for looking round, but when the last cup was
filled, she glanced over the room. There were some ladies and gentlemen
standing about. She recognized her spinster friend, Miss Mann, who looked
tired; a lady in a yellow bonnet brought her a chair.
Caroline knew well that yellow hat; she knew the black hair, and the
kindly though rather opinionated face under it; she knew, in short, Hortense
Moore, and she wanted to jump up and run to her and kiss her, for her own sake
and her brother’s. She half rose, indeed, with a smothered exclamation; but a
hand replaced her in her seat, and a voice behind her murmured, “Wait till after
tea, Lina, and then I’ll bring her to you.”
There was Robert himself close behind, smiling at her eagerness, looking
better than she had ever seen him look – looking, indeed, to her partial eyes, so
very handsome that she dared not take a second glance; for his image struck on
her vision with painful brightness.
He moved on, and spoke to Miss Keeldar. Shirley, irritated by Sam
Wynne’s attentions, and by the fact of that gentleman being still seated on her
gloves and handkerchief – and probably, also, by Moore’s lateness – was by no
means in good humour. She shrugged her shoulders, and said a bitter word or
two about his “insupportable tardiness.”
Moore neither apologized nor retorted. He stood near her quietly, as if
waiting to see whether she would recover her temper; which she did in three
minutes, and offered him her hand. Moore took it with a smile.
“You may sit where you can, Mr. Moore,” said Shirley, also smiling.
“There is not an inch of room for you here; but I see plenty of space at Mrs.
Boultby’s table, between Miss Armitage and Miss Birtwhistle. Go!”
Moore, however, preferred lingering where he was. He now and then took
a turn down the long room, pausing to exchange greetings with other
gentlemen; but he came back to the magnet, Shirley, bringing with him
observations it was necessary to whisper in her ear.
Meantime poor Sam Wynne looked far from comfortable. His fair
neighbour would not sit still for two seconds. She was hot; she fanned herself;
she complained of lack of air and space. She remarked that, in her opinion,
when people had finished their tea they ought to leave the tables, and
announced distinctly that she expected to faint. Mr. Sam offered to accompany
her into the open air; just the way to give her her death of cold, she alleged. In
short, his place became untenable, and he judged it best to quit.
Moore was at the other end of the room. A large corn-factor, Timothy
Ramsden, Esq., was nearer, and advanced to fill the vacant seat. Shirley’s
expedients did not fail her. A sweep of her scarf upset her teacup over the bench
and her own satin dress. A waiter had to be called. Shirley, usually indifferent
to accidents affecting dress, made a commotion befitting the most delicate and
nervous of her sex. Mr. Ramsden, a large, puffy gentleman, opened his mouth,
and withdrew, beating a heavy retreat.
Moore at last returned. Calmly surveying the bustle, and somewhat
quizzically scanning Shirley’s enigmatic face, he remarked that in truth this was
the hottest end of the room, which would agree with none but cool
temperaments like his own; and putting aside the waiters, the napkins, and the
satin robe, he sat next to Shirley.
She subsided. The wilfulness and roguery left her face; but no gracious
glance was cast on Moore. On the contrary, he was accused of giving her a
world of trouble, and roundly charged with depriving her of the company of
Mr. Ramsden and Mr. Samuel Wynne.
“I wouldn’t have offended either gentleman for the world,” she said.
“Owing to you, how ill they have been used! I shall not be happy till I have
made it up. I never am happy till I am friends with my neighbours.”
“You know the surest path to the heart of each, I doubt not,” said Moore
quietly. He looked very content to have at last secured his place; but he offered
no apology for the trouble he had given. His composure made him look
handsomer. Now and then, from the way in which he addressed Miss Keeldar,
you would have fancied his station towered above hers as much as his stature
did. Stern lights sometimes gleamed in his eyes.
Their conversation had become animated, though it was in a low voice;
she was urging him with questions which he evidently refused to answer. At her
soft yet eager enquiry, Moore smiled, but his lips continued sealed. Then she
was piqued, and turned away; but he recalled her attention. He seemed to be
making promises which soothed her.
It appeared that the heat of the room did not suit Miss Helstone. She grew
paler and paler during the process of tea-making. The moment she could, she
left the table, and hastened to follow her cousin Hortense and Miss Mann, who
had already sought the open air. Robert Moore rose when she did – perhaps he
meant to speak to her; but there was still a word to exchange with Miss Keeldar,
and while it was being uttered Caroline had vanished.
Hortense received her former pupil with more dignity than warmth. She
had been seriously offended by Mr. Helstone’s ban, and considered Caroline to
blame in obeying her uncle too literally.
“You are a very great stranger,” she said austerely. The pupil did not
remonstrate, sure that Hortense’s natural good-nature would soon prevail. It
did: when Hortense had examined her face, and observed the change in it, her
manner softened. Kissing her on both cheeks, she asked anxiously after her
health. Caroline answered gaily; but was spared a long cross-examination when
Miss Mann asked to be taken home. The poor invalid was already fatigued. Her
weariness made her almost too cross to speak to Caroline; she gave her a cool
nod, and departed with Hortense.
Caroline looked round for Shirley. She saw the rainbow scarf and purple
dress in the centre of a throng of ladies, all ones whom she herself avoided
whenever possible. She felt no courage at all to join this company. She could
not stand alone, however; so she approached a group of her own scholars, great
girls, or rather young women, who were standing watching the younger
children playing blind-man’s buff.
Miss Helstone knew these girls liked her, yet she was shy even with them.
She drew near them rather to find protection in their company than to patronize
them with her presence. By some instinct they knew her weakness, and with
natural politeness they respected it. Her knowledge commanded their esteem
when she taught them; her gentleness made them like her, and so they kindly
overlooked her timidity when off duty. They did not take advantage of it, but
were civil and friendly, receiving her hurried efforts to converse with a good
feeling and good breeding, which soon set her at her ease.
On Mr. Sam Wynne hurrying over to insist on the elder girls joining in
the game, Caroline was again left alone. She was meditating a quiet retreat to
the house, when Shirley came to her side.
“Let us go to the top of the fields,” she said. “I know you don’t like
crowds, Caroline.”
“But it will be depriving you of a pleasure, Shirley, to take you away
from all these fine people, who court your society, and to whom you can,
without effort, make yourself so pleasant.”
“Not quite without effort; I am already tired of the exertion. It is insipid
work, talking and laughing with the good gentlefolks of Briarfield. I have been
looking for your white dress for the last ten minutes. You resemble none of the
rest, Lina. There are some prettier faces than yours here; Harriet Sykes, for
instance; but you look agreeable, you look reflective, you look what I call
interesting.”
“Hush, Shirley! you flatter me.”
“I don’t wonder that your scholars like you.”
“Nonsense, Shirley! Talk of something else.”
“We will talk of Moore, then, and we will watch him. I see him even
now.”
“Where?”
“There is Moore,” said Shirley, pointing right across the wide field where
a thousand children were playing, and a thousand adult spectators walking
about. “There – can you miss the tall stature and straight figure? He looks like
Saul in a war-council; and a war-council it is, if I am not mistaken.”
“Why so, Shirley?” asked Caroline, whose eye had at last found him.
“Robert is shaking hands with my uncle. They are then reconciled.”
“Not without good reason, depend on it – making common cause against
some foe. And why, think you, are Messrs. Wynne and Sykes, and Armitage
and Ramsden, gathered in such a close circle round them? And why is Malone
beckoned to join them? Where he is summoned, be sure a strong arm is
needed.” Shirley grew restless; her eyes flashed.
“They won’t trust me,” she said. “That is always the way. There is some
mystery afloat; some event is expected; some preparation is to be made, I am
certain. I saw it in Mr. Moore’s manner this evening. He was excited, yet hard.”
“Hard to you, Shirley?”
“Yes. He often is hard to me. I am made to feel that the basis of his
character is not of eiderdown.”
“Yet he seemed to talk to you softly.”
“Did he not? Very gentle tones and quiet manner. Yet the man is
peremptory and secret: his secrecy vexes me. He scarcely has a right to be
secret with me, as he commenced by giving me his confidence. It ought not to
be withdrawn; but I suppose I am not considered iron-souled enough to be
trusted in a crisis.”
“He fears, probably, to make you uneasy.”
“I am not soon crushed. He ought to know that. But the man is proud. He
has his faults, say what you will, Lina. Observe how engaged that group appear.
There will be some unusual movements before long. But my eyes and ears are
open. Mr. Moore, you shall be watched.”
“Robert is going; I believe he noticed us. They are shaking hands.”
They saw Robert quit the group, pass through a gate, and disappear.
“And he has not bid us good-bye,” murmured Caroline. At once she tried
to smile to hide her disappointment.
“Oh, that is soon remedied!” exclaimed Shirley: “we’ll make him bid us
good-bye. I know a short cut. We will intercept him.”
“But, Shirley, I would rather not go.”
Miss Keeldar seized her arm and hurried her down the fields. It was vain
to argue. Nothing was so wilful as Shirley when she took a whim into her head.
Caroline found herself ushered into a narrow shady spot, embowered above
with hawthorns, and enamelled underfoot with daisies. She heard the wicketgate opening, and knew Robert was approaching. The long sprays of the
hawthorns screened them. They saw him before he observed them.
At a glance Caroline perceived that his social gaiety was gone; he wore
his dark, quiet, business face. As Shirley had said, there was a certain hardness
in his air. So much the worse timed was the present freak of Shirley’s.
“I told you not to come,” said Caroline, somewhat bitterly, to her friend.
To intrude on Robert thus, when he evidently would rather not be delayed,
keenly annoyed her. It did not annoy Miss Keeldar in the least. She stepped
forward and faced her tenant, barring his way.
“You omitted to bid us good-bye,” she said.
“Where did you come from? Are you fairies? I left two like you standing
at the top of a bank, four fields off, only a minute ago.”
“You left us there and find us here. We have been watching you, and shall
watch you still. You must be questioned one day, but not now. At present all
you have to do is to say good-night, and then pass.”
“Must I say good-night to you, Miss Keeldar?”
“Yes, and to Caroline likewise.”
He took her hand, held it in one of his, and covered it with the other. He
looked down at her gravely, kindly, yet commandingly. The heiress could not
make this man her subject. In his gaze there was no servility; but there were
interest and affection; and there was gratitude.
“Your debtor bids you good-night! May you rest safely and serenely till
morning.”
“And you, Mr. Moore – what are you going to do? What were you saying
to Mr. Helstone, with whom I saw you shake hands? Why did all those
gentlemen gather round you? Be frank.”
“Who can resist you? I will be frank. Tomorrow, if there is anything to
relate, you shall hear it. Right now I could only tell half a tale. And I have not a
moment to spare.”
“You are going home?”
“Yes. Farewell to both of you.”
He would have taken Caroline’s hand and clasped it as he had Shirley’s,
but somehow her hand was not ready for him. She had withdrawn, and gave
him only a slight bend of the head and a gentle, serious smile. Again he said
“Farewell,” and left them both.
“There!” said Shirley. “We have not lost ground in his esteem, I think,
Cary.”
“I hope not,” was the brief reply.
“Why did you not give Moore your hand? He is your cousin; you like
him. Are you ashamed to let him perceive your affection?”
“He perceives all of it that interests him. No need to make a display of
feeling.”
“You are laconic. Is love, in your eyes, a crime, Caroline?”
“Love a crime! No, Shirley; love is a divine virtue. But why drag that
word into the conversation? It is singularly irrelevant.”
“Good!”
The two girls paced the green lane in silence. Caroline first resumed.
“Forwardness is a crime; but love! No-one need blush to love. When I
hear anyone couple shame with love, I know their minds are coarse and
debased. Many who think themselves refined ladies and gentlemen cannot
mention ‘love’ without betraying their own innate degradation. It is connected
only with low ideas for them.”
“You describe three-fourths of the world, Caroline.”
“They are cold – they are stupid, Shirley! They never loved – they never
were loved!”
“Thou art right, Lina.”
The sudden joyous clash of bells here stopped the dialogue by
summoning all to the church.
↑

Chapter 18
WHICH THE GENTEEL READER IS RECOMMENDED TO
SKIP, LOW PERSONS BEING HERE INTRODUCED


The evening was still and warm; it promised to become sultry. Round the
descending sun the clouds glowed purple; summer tints suffused the horizon,
and cast rosy reflections on house and tree. The two girls came down from the
fields slowly. By the time they reached the churchyard the bells were hushed;
the multitudes were gathered into the church.
“How pleasant and calm it is!” said Caroline.
“And how hot it will be in the church!” responded Shirley. “And what a
dreary long speech Dr. Boultby will make! And how the curates will hammer
over their prepared orations! For my part, I would rather not enter.”
“But my uncle will be angry if we are absent.”
“I can bear his wrath; he will not devour me. I shall be sorry to miss his
pungent speech. I shall be sorry also to deprive you of Mr. Hall’s friendly
homily; but here I must stay. Nature is now at her evening prayers; she is
kneeling before those red hills. I see her prostrate on the great steps of her altar,
praying for a fair night for mariners at sea, for travellers in deserts, for lambs on
moors, and unfledged birds in woods. Caroline, she is like what Eve was when
she and Adam stood alone on earth.”
“That is not Milton’s Eve, Shirley.”
“Milton’s Eve! No. Milton was great; but was he good? He saw heaven;
he looked down on hell. He saw Satan, and Sin his daughter, and Death their
horrible offspring. He saw the tarnished armies of devils. Milton tried to see the
first woman; but, Cary, he saw her not.”
“You are bold to say so, Shirley.”
“I would remind him that the first men of the earth were Titans, and that
Eve was their mother; from her sprang Saturn, Hyperion, Oceanus; she bore
Prometheus—”
“Pagan!”
“I say, there were giants on the earth in those days – giants that strove to
scale heaven, with the strength which could bear a thousand years of bondage,
the vitality and uncorrupted excellence which, after millennia of struggles,
could conceive and bring forth a Messiah. The first woman was heaven-born.
Vast was the heart whence came the blood of nations, and grand the head where
rested the crown of creation.”
“She coveted an apple, and was cheated by a snake; but you have got such
a hash of Scripture and mythology into your head that there is no making any
sense of you.”
“On those hills I see a woman-Titan,” announced Shirley. “Her robe of
blue air spreads to the outskirts of the heath; a veil white as an avalanche
sweeps from her head to her feet, and arabesques of lightning flame on its
borders. Her steady eyes are clear, as deep as lakes; they are lifted and full of
worship, they tremble with the softness of love and prayer. Her forehead has the
expanse of a cloud, and is paler than the moon. She reclines her bosom on the
ridge of Stilbro’ Moor; her mighty hands are joined beneath it. So kneeling,
face to face she speaks with God. That Eve is Jehovah’s daughter, as Adam was
His son.”
“She is very vague and visionary. Come, Shirley, we ought to go into
church.”
“Caroline, I will not; I will stay out here with my mother Eve. I love her –
undying, mighty being! Heaven may have faded from her brow when she fell in
paradise, but all that is glorious on earth shines there still. She is showing me
her heart. Hush, Caroline! You will see her and feel as I do, if we are both
silent.”
“I will humour your whim; but you will begin talking again within ten
minutes.”
Miss Keeldar leaned against a headstone; she fixed her eyes on the deepburning west, and sank into a pleasurable trance. Caroline paced to and fro
beneath the rectory wall, dreaming too in her way.
Shirley had mentioned the word “mother.” That word suggested to
Caroline’s imagination not the mighty and mystical parent of Shirley’s visions,
but a gentle human form – her own mother, unknown, unloved, but longed for.
“Oh, that the day would come when she would remember her child! Oh
that I might know her, and love her!”
The longing of her childhood filled her soul again. The desire which
many a night had kept her awake in her crib, relit suddenly, and glowed in her
heart: that her mother might come some happy day, and look upon her with
loving eyes, and say to her tenderly, “Caroline, my child, I have a home for
you. All the love you have needed, and not tasted, from infancy, I have saved
for you carefully. Come; it shall cherish you now.”
A noise on the road roused Caroline and Shirley from their visions. They
heard the tramp of horses, and saw a glitter through the trees, glimpses of
martial scarlet. Silent and orderly, six soldiers rode by.
“The same we saw this afternoon,” whispered Shirley. “They wish to be
as little noticed as possible, and are moving while the people are at church.”
Scarcely were the soldiers out of sight, when a different disturbance broke
the night-hush – a child’s impatient scream. A man came out of the church,
carrying in his arms a robust little boy of some two years old – roaring with all
the power of his lungs; he had probably just awoken. Two small girls followed.
The fresh air soon quieted the child. The man sat down, dandling him tenderly
on his knee; the little girls sat on either side.
“Good-evening, William,” said Shirley. He took off his hat, and grinned
in pleasure. He was a rough-headed, hard-featured personage, not old, but very
weather-beaten. His attire was decent and clean; that of his children singularly
neat. It was our old friend Farren.
“You are not going into the church?” he inquired, a little bashfully.
Before gentlemen, William was often dogged; with proud or insolent ladies, he
was quite unmanageable, sometimes very resentful; but he responded to goodhumour and civility. His stubborn nature was repelled by inflexibility in other
natures; so he had never liked his former master, Moore. Unaware that Moore
had recommended him as gardener to Mr. Yorke, he continued to harbour a
grudge against him.
Latterly he had often worked at Fieldhead. Miss Keeldar’s frank manners
charmed him. Caroline he had known from her childhood; unconsciously she
was his ideal of a lady. Her gentle manner and grace moved his heart. Both the
ladies liked William; they delighted to lend him books and give him plants, and
they preferred his conversation over that of many coarse, pretentious people
much higher in station.
“Who was speaking, William, when you came out?” asked Shirley.
“A gentleman ye set much store on, Miss Shirley – Mr. Donne. You look
raight down scornful when Mr. Donne is by.”
“Do you like him, William?”
“Me? I’m stalled o’ t’ curates, and so is t’ wife. They’ve no manners.
They talk to poor folk as if they thought they were beneath them. They’re allus
magnifying their office. I fair hate pride.”
“But you are proud in your own way yourself,” interposed Caroline. “You
are house-proud: you like to have everything handsome about you. Sometimes
you look as if you were almost too proud to take your wages. When you were
out of work, you were too proud to get anything on credit. When I wanted to
give you something, what a difficulty I had in making you take it!”
“True, Miss Caroline. I’d rather give than take, especially from sich as ye.
Ye’re a little, slender lass, and I’m a great strong man, more than twice your
age. It is not my part to take fro’ ye. And that day ye came to our house, and
offered me five shillings, which I doubt ye could spare – that day I war a rebel.
I war ashamed to be i’ such a condition that a young cratur the age o’ my own
eldest lass should think it needful to offer me her bit o’ brass.”
“I suppose you were angry with me, William?”
“In a way. But I forgave ye varry soon. Ye meant well. Ay, I am proud,
and so are ye; but your pride and mine is clean pride – such as Mr. Malone and
Mr. Donne knows nought about. Theirs is mucky pride. They can hardly speak
a civil word to them they think beneath them.”
“Now, William,” said Shirley. “be humble enough to tell me truly how
you are getting on. Are you well off?”
“Miss Shirley, I am varry well off. Since I got into t’ gardening line, wi’
Mr. Yorke’s help, and since Mr. Hall helped my wife to set up a bit of a shop,
I’ve nought to complain of. My family has plenty to eat. But t’ neighbours is
poor yet. I see a great deal of distress.”
“And consequently, there is still discontent, I suppose?” inquired Miss
Keeldar.
“Ye say right. Starving folk cannot be settled folk.”
“But what can be done? What more can I do?”
“Do? Not much, poor young lass! Ye’ve given your brass; ye’ve done
well. If ye could transport your tenant, Mr. Moore, to Botany Bay, ye’d do
better. Folks hate him.”
“William, for shame!” exclaimed Caroline warmly. “If folks do hate him,
it is to their disgrace, not his. Mr. Moore himself hates nobody. He only wants
to maintain his rights. You are wrong to talk so.”
“I talk as I think. He has a cold, unfeeling heart.”
“But,” interposed Shirley, “supposing Moore was driven from the
country, and his mill razed to the ground, would people have more work?”
“They’d have less. I know that, and they know that; and there is many an
honest lad driven desperate by the certainty that whichever way he turns he
cannot better himself; and there is dishonest men aplenty to guide them to the
devil, scoundrels that reckons to be the ‘people’s friends,’ and that knows
nought about the people, and is as insincere as Lucifer. Human natur’ is nought
but selfishness. It is but just an exception here and there, sich as ye two young
uns and me, that, though in a different sphere, can understand t’ one t’ other,
and be friends. Them that reckons to be friends to a lower class from political
motives is never to be trusted; they always try to make their inferiors tools. For
my own part, I will not be patronized. I’ve had overtures made to me lately that
I saw were treacherous, and I flung ’em back i’ the faces o’ them that offered
’em.”
“You won’t tell us what overtures?”
“I will not. It would do no good. Them they concerned can look after
theirseln.”
“Ay, we’se look after werseln,” said another voice. Joe Scott had
sauntered forth from the church.
“I’ll warrant ye, Joe,” observed William, smiling.
“And I’ll warrant my maister,” was the answer. “Young ladies,”
continued Joe, assuming a lordly air, “ye’d better go into th’ house.”
“I wonder what for?” inquired Shirley, who was often at war with the
overlooker; for Joe, holding supercilious theories about women in general,
resented greatly, in his secret soul, the fact of his master and his master’s mill
being under petticoat government.
“Because politics is not fit for women to be consarned in.”
“But I study politics, Joe. Do you know I see a newspaper every day, and
two of a Sunday?”
“To read the marriages, probably, miss, and the murders, and sich like.”
“I read the leading articles, Joe, and the foreign news, and I look over the
market prices. In short, I read just what gentlemen read.”
Joe looked as disdainful as if this talk was the chattering of a magpie.
“Joe,” continued Miss Keeldar, “I cannot work out whether you are a
Whig or a Tory. Pray, which are you?”
“It is rather difficult to explain where you won’t be understood,” was
Joe’s haughty response; “but as to being a Tory, I’d as soon be an old woman. It
is the Tories that carries on the war and ruins trade; and if I be of any party –
though political parties is all nonsense – I’m of that which is most favourable to
peace, and, by consequence, to business.”
“So am I, Joe,” replied Shirley, who rather enjoyed talking to him on
subjects with which he thought women had no right to meddle. “I have rather a
leaning to the agricultural interest, too; if some of my income comes from
Hollow’s Mill, more comes from the landed estate around it. It would not do to
take any measures injurious to the farmers, Joe, I think?”
“The dews at this hour is unwholesome for females,” observed Joe.
“I am impervious to cold. I should not mind taking my turn to watch the
mill one of these summer nights, armed with your musket, Joe.”
At this speech, Joe poked out his chin some inches farther than usual.
“But I cannot get out of my head,” she proceeded, “an idea that we
manufacturers and people of business are sometimes a little selfish and shortsighted in our views, and too regardless of human suffering. Don’t you agree,
Joe?”
“I cannot argue where I cannot be comprehended,” was again the answer.
“Man of mystery! Your master will argue with me sometimes, Joe. He is
not so stiff as you are.”
“Maybe not. We’ve all our own ways.”
“Joe, do you seriously think all the wisdom in the world is lodged in male
skulls?”
“I think that women are a kittle and a froward generation; and I’ve a great
respect for the doctrines of St. Paul’s first Epistle to Timothy. ‘Let the woman
learn in silence, with all subjection. I suffer not a woman to teach, nor to usurp
authority over the man, but to be in silence. For Adam was first formed, then
Eve.’”
“What has that to do with it?” interjected Shirley. “That smacks of rights
of primogeniture. I’ll bring it up with Mr. Yorke.”
“And,” continued Joe Scott, “Adam was not deceived, but the woman
being deceived was in the transgression.”
“More shame to Adam to sin with his eyes open!” cried Miss Keeldar.
“To confess the honest truth, Joe, I never was easy in my mind concerning that
chapter. It puzzles me.”
“It is very plain, miss.”
Caroline now joined in the dialogue for the first time. “You allow the
right of private judgment, I suppose, Joe?”
“My certy, that I do! I allow it for every line of the holy Book.”
“Women may exercise it as well as men?”
“Nay. Women is to take their husbands’ opinion. It’s wholesomest for
them.”
“Oh! oh!” exclaimed both Shirley and Caroline. “Consider yourself
groaned down, and cried shame over, for such a stupid observation,” said Miss
Keeldar. “You might as well say men are to take the opinions of their priests
without examination. Such a religion would be mere blind, besotted
superstition.”
“And what is your reading, Miss Helstone, o’ these words o’ St. Paul’s?”
“I account for them in this way,” said Caroline. “He wrote that chapter for
a particular congregation of Christians, under peculiar circumstances; and
besides, I dare say, if I could read the original Greek, I should find that many of
the words have been wrongly translated, perhaps misunderstood altogether. It
would be possible, I doubt not, to give the passage quite a contrary turn.”
“That won’t wash, miss.”
“I dare say it will. Joe, you are a thoroughly dogmatical person. I like
William better than you.”
“Joe is well enough in his own house,” said Shirley. “I have seen him as
quiet as a lamb at home. There is not a kinder husband in Briarfield. He does
not dogmatize to his wife.”
“My wife is a hard-working, plain woman; time and trouble has ta’en all
the conceit out of her. But that is not the case with you, young misses. And then
you reckon to have so much knowledge; and it’s only superficial. One day Miss
Caroline came into our counting-house when I war behind t’ great desk, and she
didn’t see me, and she brought a slate wi’ a sum on it to t’ maister. Uur Harry
would have settled it i’ two minutes. She couldn’t do it. Mr. Moore had to show
her how. And when he did show her, she couldn’t understand him.”
“Nonsense, Joe!”
“Nay, it’s no nonsense. And Miss Shirley there reckons to hearken to t’
maister when he’s talking ower trade, so attentive like, as if she followed him
word for word; and all t’ while she’s peeping out o’ t’ window to see t’ mare;
and then looking at a bit of a splash on her riding-skirt; and then glancing round
at wer counting-house cobwebs, and thinking what mucky folk we are, and
what a grand ride she’ll have ower Nunnely Common. She hears no more o’
Mr. Moore’s talk nor if he spake Hebrew.”
“Joe, you are a real slanderer. I would answer you, only the people are
coming out of church. We must leave you. Man of prejudice, good-bye.
William, good-bye. Children, come up to Fieldhead tomorrow, and you shall
choose what you like best out of Mrs. Gill’s store-room.”
↑

Chapter 19

A SUMMER NIGHT


It was now dusk; the stars were kindling.
“There will be just light enough to show me the way home,” said Miss
Keeldar.
“You must not go alone, Shirley; Fanny shall accompany you.”
“That she shall not. Of what need I be afraid in my own parish? I would
walk from Fieldhead to the church any fine midsummer night, for the mere
pleasure of seeing the stars and the chance of meeting a fairy.”
“But just wait till the crowd is cleared away.”
“Agreed. I don’t wish to go through the ceremony of bidding them all
good-bye, so we will step into the garden and take shelter.”
The rectors, their curates, and their churchwardens now issued from the
church porch. There was a great shaking of hands, congratulation on speeches,
recommendation to be careful of the night air, etc. By degrees the throng
dispersed; the carriages drove off. Miss Keeldar was just emerging from her
flowery refuge when Mr. Helstone entered the garden.
“Oh, I want you!” he said to Shirley. “I was afraid you were already gone.
– Caroline, come here.”
Caroline came, expecting a lecture on not having been in church. Other
subjects, however, occupied the rector’s mind.
“I shall not sleep at home tonight,” he continued. “I have just met with an
old friend, and promised to accompany him. I shall return probably about noon
tomorrow. Thomas, the clerk, is engaged, and cannot sleep in the house as usual
when I am absent for a night. Now—”
“Now,” interrupted Shirley, “you want me, as the first gentleman in
Briarfield, to supply your place, be master of the rectory and guardian of your
niece and maids while you are away?”
“Exactly, captain. I thought the post would suit you. Will you be
Caroline’s guest for one night, instead of going back to Fieldhead?”
“Mrs. Pryor expects me home.”
“I will send her word. Come, make up your mind to stay. You and
Caroline will enjoy each other’s society.”
“I promise, then, to stay with Caroline,” replied Shirley. “We will not be
separated tonight.”
“If there should chance to be any disturbance in the night, captain; if you
should hear the picking of a lock, a stealthy tread of steps about the house (and
I need not fear to tell you, who bear a mettlesome heart, that such incidents are
very possible at present), what would you do?”
“Don’t know; faint, perhaps – fall down, and have to be picked up again.
But, doctor, you must give me arms. What weapons are there in your
stronghold?”
“You could not wield a sword?”
“No; I could manage the carving-knife better.”
“You will find a good one in the dining-room sideboard – light and
sharp.”
“It will suit Caroline. But you must give me a brace of pistols. I know you
have pistols.”
“You will find a pair hanging over the mantelpiece of my study.”
“Loaded?”
“Yes, but not on the cock. Cock them before you go to bed. It is paying
you a great compliment, captain, to lend you these.”
“I will take care. You need delay no longer, Mr. Helstone. – He is
gracious to me to lend me his pistols,” she remarked, as the rector departed.
“But come, Lina, let us go in and have supper.”
Entering the house, they went to the darkened dining-room. Through the
open windows stole the evening air, bearing the perfume of flowers, and a soft,
vague murmur.
Caroline said, “I hear the beck in the Hollow.” She rang the bell, and
asked for a candle, and bread and milk for supper. They ate their meal in
silence. Caroline rose once, half opened a drawer, and took from it something
that glittered clear and keen in her hand.
“You assigned this to me, then, Shirley, did you? It is dangerous-looking.
I never yet felt the impulse to wound a fellow-creature.”
“I should hate to do it,” replied Shirley, “but I think I could, if goaded
sufficiently.” And Miss Keeldar quietly sipped her glass of milk, looking
somewhat thoughtful and a little pale; though, indeed, when did she not look
pale?
The milk sipped and the bread eaten, Fanny was again summoned. She
and Eliza were recommended to go to bed, which they were quite willing to do,
being weary of the day’s exertions. Caroline took a candle and went quietly all
over the house, seeing that every window was fast and every door barred.
“It is now near eleven o’clock,” she said on her return, “yet I would rather
sit up a little longer, if you do not object, Shirley. I have brought the pistols
from my uncle’s study.”
She placed them on the table before her friend.
“Why would you rather sit up longer?” asked Miss Keeldar, taking up the
firearms, examining them, and laying them down.
“Because I have a strange, excited feeling in my heart.”
“So have I.”
“Is this restlessness caused by something electrical in the air, I wonder?”
“No; the sky is clear. It is a fine night.”
“But very still.”
“I am glad of that,” said Shirley, “because I want to listen towards the
Hollow.”
They both sat near the window, and leaned their arms on the sill by the
open lattice. They saw each other’s young faces by the starlight and that dim
June twilight which does not wholly fade from the west till dawn begins to
break in the east.
“Mr. Helstone thinks we have no idea where he is gone,” murmured Miss
Keeldar, “nor on what errand. But I guess; do not you?”
“I guess something.”
“All those gentlemen – your cousin Moore included – think that we are
now asleep in our beds.”
“Caring nothing about them,” added Caroline.
Both kept silent for full half an hour. The night was silent too; only the
church clock measured its course by quarters. They wrapped their scarves
closer round them in the chill air, and again watched.
Towards midnight the bark of the house-dog disturbed their vigil.
Caroline rose, and made her way noiselessly through the dark passages to the
kitchen to appease him with a piece of bread.
On returning to the dining-room she found it dark, Miss Keeldar having
extinguished the candle. The outline of her shape was visible near the open
window, leaning out. Miss Helstone stole to her side. The dog recommenced
barking furiously. Suddenly he stopped, and seemed to listen. The occupants of
the dining-room listened too. There was a muffled sound on the road below the
churchyard – a measured, beating tramp of marching feet.
It drew near. It was not the tread of two, nor of a dozen men; it was the
tread of hundreds. They could see nothing; the high shrubs of the garden
formed a leafy screen between them and the road. The troop marched forwards,
and seemed actually passing the rectory when a voice broke the hush of the
night.
“Halt!”
The march stopped. Then came a low conference, of which no word was
distinguishable from the dining-room.
“We must hear this,” said Shirley.
She took her pistols from the table, silently passed out through the fulllength French window of the dining-room, stole down the walk to the garden
wall, and stood listening under the lilacs. Where Shirley went, Caroline would
go. She glanced at the knife, but left it behind her, and presently stood at her
friend’s side. Crouching behind the wall, they heard these words:
“It looks a rambling old building. Who lives in it besides the damned
parson?”
“Only three women – his niece and two servants.”
“Do you know where they sleep?”
“The lasses behind; the niece in a front room.”
“And Helstone?”
“Yonder is his chamber. I see no light.”
“Where would you get in?”
“I’d try t’ long window; it opens to the dining-room. I could grope my
way upstairs, and I know his chamber.”
“How would you manage about the women folk?”
“Let ’em alone except they shrieked, and then I’d soon quieten ’em. If the
old chap waked, he’d be dangerous.”
“Has he arms?”
“Firearms, and allus loaded.”
“Then you’re a fool to bring us here. A shot would give the alarm. Moore
would be on us before we could turn round. We should miss our main object.”
“You can go on. I’d engage Helstone alone.”
A pause. One of the party dropped some weapon, which rang on the stone
causeway. At this sound the rectory dog barked again, furiously.
“That spoils all!” said the voice. “He’ll awake. You did not say there was
a dog. Damn you! Forward!”
Forward they went – tramp, tramp – until they were gone.
Shirley stood up and looked over the wall, along the road.
“Not a soul remains,” she said. “Thank God!”
Caroline repeated, “Thank God,” not in so steady a tone. She was
trembling. Her heart was beating fast; her face was cold, her forehead damp.
“But what will happen elsewhere?” she asked. “They have passed us so that
they may make sure of others.”
“The others will defend themselves,” returned Shirley. “They are
prepared for them. My finger was on the trigger; but I could not have protected
us against three hundred men. Therefore I again earnestly thank God for insult
and peril escaped.”
After a second pause she continued: “What is it my duty and wisdom to
do next? Not to stay here inactive, but to walk over to the Hollow. Will you go
with me?”
“Where those men are gone?”
“They have taken the highway; we should not meet them. The road over
the fields is as safe and solitary as a path through the air. Will you go?”
“Yes,” was the answer, given mechanically, not because Caroline wished
to go, but because she felt she could not abandon Shirley.
“Then we must fasten up these windows, and leave all secure behind us.
Do you know why we are going, Cary?”
“Yes – no – because you wish it.”
“Is that all? What a docile wife you would make! The moon’s face is not
whiter than yours at this moment; and so, terror-struck and devoted, you would
follow me into the thick of danger! Cary, we are going for Moore’s sake – to try
to warn him of what is coming.”
“To be sure! I am a fool, Shirley. I will gladly go with you!” Caroline
rapidly closed shutter and window. “I can run as fast as you can, Shirley. Let us
go straight across the fields.”
“But you cannot climb walls?”
“Tonight I can.”
They started; they ran. Many a wall checked but did not baffle them.
Shirley was surefooted and agile. Caroline fell once or twice, and bruised
herself; but she rose again directly, saying she was not hurt. A quickset hedge
surrounded the last field; they lost time in seeking a gap, and worked their way
through. The long hair, the tender skin, the silks and the muslins suffered; but
what was chiefly regretted was the loss of speed.
On the other side they met the beck, flowing deep, a narrow plank the
only bridge across it. Shirley had trodden the plank fearlessly many a time;
Caroline had never yet dared.
“I will carry you across,” said Miss Keeldar. “You are light, and I am not
weak.”
“If I fall in, you may fish me out,” was the answer. Caroline, without
pausing, walked across the trembling plank as if it were firm ground. Shirley,
who followed, did not cross it more resolutely. In their present mood, all
Stilbro’ Moor alight with bonfires would not have stopped them, nor would the
river Aire thundering in flood.
Yet one sound made them pause. A shot split the air from the north. One
second elapsed; another shot burst further off in the south. Within three
minutes, similar signals boomed in the east and west.
“Those are signals,” observed Shirley. “The attack must be near. We
should have had wings. Our feet have not been swift enough.”
They now emerged from the copse; the mill lay just below them, with the
road beyond. And the first glance told Shirley she was right. They were already
too late to give warning.
The road, which should have been white, was dark with a moving mass.
The rioters were assembled in front of the closed yard gates, and a single figure
stood within, apparently addressing them. The mill itself was perfectly black
and still.
“Surely that is not Moore meeting them alone?” whispered Shirley.
“It is. We must go to him. I will go to him.”
“That you will not.”
“Why did I come, then? I came only for him. I shall join him.”
“Fortunately you cannot. There is no entrance to the yard.”
“There is a small entrance at the back. I will try it.”
“Not with my leave.” Miss Keeldar clasped her round the waist with both
arms and held her. “Not one step shall you stir. Moore would be both shocked
and embarrassed if he saw either you or me. Men never want women near them
in time of real danger.”
“I would help him,” was the reply.
“How? by inspiring him with heroism? Pooh! it is not a tilt at a
tournament, but a struggle about money and food, and life.”
“It is natural that I should be at his side.”
“As queen of his heart? His mill is his lady-love, Cary! It is not for love
or beauty, but for ledger and broadcloth that he is going to fight. Don’t be
sentimental; Robert is not so.”
“I could help him.”
“Off you go then – seek Moore. You’ll not find him.”
She loosened her hold. Caroline sped away; but then she paused, gazing.
The figure had retreated from the gate, and was running back to the mill.
She slowly returned. “It is not Robert,” she said.
“I saw that when I let you go. It is a soldier, posted as sentinel. He is safe
in the mill now. My mind grows easier. Robert is prepared. Our warning would
have been superfluous; and now I am thankful we came too late to give it. It has
saved us the trouble of a scene. How fine to have entered the counting-house,
and to have found oneself in the presence of Malone swaggering, your uncle
sneering, Mr. Sykes sipping a cordial, and Moore himself in his cold man-ofbusiness vein! I am glad we missed it.”
“I wonder if there are many in the mill, Shirley!”
“Plenty to defend it. The soldiers we have twice seen today were going
there, no doubt. The crowd is trying to force the gates, using hatchets and
crowbars. Are you afraid?”
“No; but my heart throbs fast. I have difficulty in standing. Do you feel
unmoved?”
“Hardly that; but I am glad I came. We are here on the spot, and none
know it.”
“Shirley, the gates are down! Now they are pouring through. They will
break down the mill doors as they have broken the gate. What can Robert do
against so many? Would to God I were nearer him – could speak to him! I long
to serve him – surely I could be of some use.”
“How steadily they march in!” cried Shirley. “There is discipline in their
ranks. I will not say there is courage, but there is desperation enough to urge
them forwards.”
“Forwards against Robert; and they hate him.”
A crash stopped their whispers. A volley of stones had saluted the broad
front of the mill, with all its windows; and now every pane lay in shattered
fragments. A yell followed – a rioters’ yell.
Caroline rose; Shirley put her arm round her: they stood together like two
straight trees. When the yell ceased, the night was yet full of the murmuring of
a crowd. The mill remained mute as a mausoleum.
“He cannot be alone!” whispered Caroline.
“He is neither alone nor alarmed,” responded Shirley.
Shots were fired by the rioters. And now the mill awoke; fire flashed from
its empty window-frames; a volley of musketry pealed through the Hollow.
“Moore speaks at last!” said Shirley.
“He has been forbearing. No-one can accuse him of rashness,” said
Caroline. “They attacked first.”
What was going on now? It seemed difficult, in the darkness, to
distinguish; but a tumult was obvious – fierce attacks, desperate repulses. The
mill-yard was full of battle movement. There were frequent shots; there was
struggling, rushing, trampling, and shouting. They heard the rebel leader cry,
“To the back, lads!” They heard a voice retort, “Come round; we will meet
you.”
“To the counting-house!”
“Welcome! we shall have you there!” was the response. And accordingly
the fiercest blaze that had yet glowed, the loudest rattle that had yet been heard,
burst from the counting-house when the mass of rioters rushed up to it.
The voice that had spoken was Moore’s, warm with the conflict; they
could tell that the fighting animal was roused in every one of those men there
struggling.
The girls felt their faces glow and their pulses throb; but knew they would do
no good by rushing down into the mêlée.
They could not take their eyes from the dim, terrible scene – from the
mass of cloud, of smoke, the musket-lightning. They wondered both how it
would end, and whether they could yet be useful; for Shirley would have given
a farm of her best land for a chance of rendering good service.
The chance never came. Moore had expected this attack, and was
prepared for it. He had fortified and garrisoned his mill, which in itself was a
strong building. He was a cool, brave man; he stood to the defence with
unflinching firmness. Those who were with him caught his spirit.
The rioters had never been so met before. At other mills they had attacked
they had found no resistance. When their leaders saw the steady fire kept up
from the mill, witnessed the composure and determination of its owner, heard
themselves coolly invited on to death, and beheld their men falling wounded,
they hastily mustered their forces and drew them away. They dispersed wide
over the fields, leaving silence and ruin behind. The attack had not lasted an
hour.
Day was by this time approaching; the east was beginning to gleam. The
girls very cautiously approached the now battered mill. When soldiers suddenly
appeared at the great door opening into the yard, they quickly stepped aside into
a shed, where they could see without being seen.
It was no cheering spectacle. The mill yawned ruinous with broken
windows; the yard was thickly strewn with stones; and close under the mill,
with the glittering fragments of glass, lay muskets and other weapons. More
than one deep crimson stain was visible on the gravel, a human body lay quiet
on its face near the gates, and five or six wounded men writhed and moaned in
the bloody dust.
Miss Keeldar’s face changed.
“This is what I wished to prevent,” she said, in a low voice.
“But you could not prevent it; you did your best,” said Caroline. “Don’t
grieve, Shirley.”
“I am sorry for those poor fellows,” was the answer. “Are any within the
mill hurt, I wonder? Is that your uncle?”
“It is, and there is Mr. Malone; and, O Shirley, there is Robert!”
“Well, there is nothing wonderful in that. We knew he, at least, was
here.”
“He is coming towards us, Shirley!”
“Towards the pump, rather, to wash his hands and his forehead, which has
got a scratch, I perceive.”
“He bleeds, Shirley. Don’t hold me. I must go.”
“Not a step.”
“But I must go to him, to ask how he is, and see what I can do.”
“To tease and annoy him; to make a spectacle of yourself before those
soldiers, Mr. Malone, and your uncle. Would he like it? Would you like to
remember it a week hence?”
“Am I always to be curbed and kept down?” demanded Caroline
passionately.
“For his sake, yes; and still more for your own. I tell you, if you showed
yourself now you would repent it an hour hence, and so would Robert.”
“I only wish to go to him because he is my cousin – you understand?”
“I quite understand. But now, look: he has bathed his forehead, and the
blood has ceased trickling. It is a mere graze. He is going to look after the
wounded men.”
Mr. Moore and Mr. Helstone went round the yard, examining each
prostrate form. They gave directions to have the wounded taken up and carried
into the mill. Horses were saddled, and Moore and Mr. Helstone rode away full
gallop, in different directions, to seek surgical aid.
Caroline was not yet pacified.
“Shirley, Shirley, I should have liked to speak one word to him before he
went,” she murmured, while tears gathered glittering in her eyes.
“Why do you cry, Lina?” asked Miss Keeldar a little sternly. “You ought
to be glad. Robert has escaped any serious harm; he is victorious; he has been
brave in combat; he is now considerate in triumph. Are these causes for
weeping?”
“You do not know what I have in my heart,” pleaded the other. “I
understand that you exult in Robert’s greatness and goodness; so do I, in one
sense, but in another I feel so miserable. I am too far removed from him. I used
to be nearer. Let me alone, Shirley. Do let me cry a few minutes.”
Miss Keeldar, feeling her tremble in every limb, went out of the shed, and
left her to weep in peace. It was the best plan. In a few minutes Caroline
rejoined her, much calmer. She said, with her natural, gentle manner, “Come,
Shirley, we will go home now. I promise not to try to see Robert again till he
asks for me. I never will try to push myself on him. I thank you for restraining
me just now.”
“Now, dear Lina,” returned Shirley, “let us walk very quietly back to the
rectory. We will steal in as we stole out. None shall know where we have been.
Tomorrow we will see Robert, and be of good cheer; but I will say no more, lest
I should begin to cry too. I seem hard towards you, but I am not so.”
↑

Chapter 20

TOMORROW


The two girls met nobody on their way back to the rectory. They let
themselves in noiselessly, and stole upstairs by the early dawn light. Shirley
sought her bed; and though the room was strange, and though the recent scene
had been unparalleled for excitement and terror by any she had yet witnessed,
yet scarce was her head laid on the pillow before deep sleep closed her eyes.
Shirley had perfect health. Though warm-hearted and sympathetic, she
was not nervous; powerful emotions could sway without exhausting her spirit.
The tempest troubled her while it lasted, but it left her freshness quite
unblighted. Caroline now watched her serenely sleeping.
For herself, she could not sleep. The commonplace excitement of the
school-gathering would alone have sufficed to make her restless; the effect of
the terrible drama she had seen was not likely to quit her for days. It was vain
even to lie down; she sat up by Shirley’s side, watching the sun mount the
heavens.
Life wastes fast in such vigils as Caroline had lately too often kept –
vigils during which the mind, with no hope or joyous memories to feed on, tries
to live on the meagre diet of wishes; and feeling itself ready to perish with
craving, turns to philosophy, to resolution, to resignation; calls on all these for
aid, calls vainly – is unheard, and unhelped.
Caroline was a Christian; therefore in trouble she prayed often, begging
for patience, strength, relief. However, it seemed that her prayers were unheard
and unaccepted. She believed, sometimes, that God had turned His face from
her.
Most people have had a period in their lives when they have felt thus
forsaken – when, having long hoped against hope, their hearts have truly
sickened within them. This is a terrible hour, but it is often that darkest point
which precedes the rise of day – that turn of the year when the icy January wind
carries both the dirge of departing winter and the prophecy of coming spring.
The perishing birds, however, cannot understand this as they shiver; and nor
can the suffering soul recognize the dawn of its deliverance.
The household was astir at last; the servants were up; the shutters were
opened below. Caroline, as she rose, felt that revival of spirits which the return
of day gives to all but the wholly despairing or actually dying. She dressed
carefully, so that none of the forlornness she felt should be visible externally.
She looked as fresh as Shirley when both were dressed; only Miss Keeldar’s
eyes were lively, and Miss Helstone’s languid.
“Today I shall have much to say to Moore,” were Shirley’s first words;
and you could see that life was full of interest and expectation for her. “He will
have to undergo cross-examination,” she added. “I dare say he thinks he has
outwitted me. This is the way men deal with women – concealing danger from
them – thinking, I suppose, to spare them pain. Men, I believe, fancy women’s
minds something like those of children. Now, that is a mistake.”
This was said as she stood at the mirror, training her hair into curls by
twining it round her fingers. As Caroline fastened her dress, she continued:
“If men could see us as we really are, they would be amazed; but the
cleverest men are often under an illusion about women. They misapprehend
them, both for good and evil. Their good woman is a queer thing, half doll, half
angel; their bad woman almost always a fiend. Then to hear them fall into
ecstasies with each other’s creations – worshipping the heroine of such a poem
or novel – thinking it fine, divine! Fine and divine it may be, but often quite
artificial – false as the rose in my bonnet.”
“Shirley, you chatter so, I can’t fasten you. Be still. And, after all,
authors’ heroines are almost as good as authoresses’ heroes.”
“Not at all. Women read men more truly than men read women. I’ll prove
that in a magazine article some day when I’ve time; only it will never be
published. It will be ‘declined with thanks’.”
“To be sure. You don’t know enough. You are not learned, Shirley.”
“I can’t contradict you, Cary; I’m as ignorant as a stone. There’s one
comfort, however: you are not much better.”
They descended to breakfast.
“I wonder how Mrs. Pryor and Hortense Moore have passed the night,”
said Caroline, as she made the coffee. “Selfish being that I am, I never thought
of either of them till just now. They will have heard all the tumult; and Hortense
is timid.”
“Take my word for it, Lina, Moore will have contrived to get his sister
out of the way. He will have quartered her with Miss Mann for the night. As to
Mrs. Pryor, I confess I am uneasy about her; but in another half-hour we will be
with her.”
By this time the news of what had happened at the Hollow was spread all
over the neighbourhood. Fanny, who had been to Fieldhead to fetch the milk,
returned in panting haste with news that there had been a battle in the night at
Mr. Moore’s mill, and that some said twenty men were killed. Eliza had been
informed by the butcher’s boy that the mill was burnt to the ground. Both
women rushed into the parlour to announce these terrible facts to the ladies,
saying that they were sure master must have been in it all; and Joe Scott’s wife
and family were in the greatest distress, wondering what had become of their
head.
A knock at the kitchen door announced the Fieldhead errand-boy, with a
note from Mrs. Pryor. It was hurriedly written, and urged Miss Keeldar to
return directly, as the neighbourhood was all in confusion, and orders would
have to be given by the mistress of the hall. In a postscript it was entreated that
Miss Helstone might not be left alone at the rectory, but had better accompany
Miss Keeldar.
“I agree,” said Shirley, as she tied on her bonnet, and ran to fetch
Caroline’s.
“But what will Fanny and Eliza do? And if my uncle returns?”
“Your uncle will not return yet; he will be galloping backwards and
forwards from Briarfield to Stilbro’ all day, rousing the magistrates in the courthouse and the officers at the barracks; and Fanny and Eliza can have Joe Scott’s
and the clerk’s wives in to keep them company. There is no real danger now.
Weeks will elapse before the rioters can again rally; and I expect Moore and
Mr. Helstone will take advantage of last night’s outbreak to quell them
altogether. They will frighten the authorities of Stilbro’ into energetic measures.
I only hope they will not be too severe.”
“Robert will not be cruel. We saw that last night,” said Caroline.
“But he will be hard,” retorted Shirley; “and so will your uncle.”
As they hurried along the meadow path to Fieldhead, they saw the distant
highway already alive with horsemen and pedestrians, heading towards the
Hollow. On reaching the hall, they found the backyard gates open, and the court
and kitchen crowded with excited milk-fetchers – waiting to receive their
supplies from the dairy, as was the custom – whom Mrs. Gill, the housekeeper,
was vainly trying to persuade to take their milk-cans and depart.
Seeing the state of matters, Shirley stepped in amongst the gossiping
groups. She bade them good-morning with a frank, tranquil ease, and asked if
they had all got their milk measured out; and understanding that they had, she
observed that she “wondered what they were waiting for, then.”
“We’re just talking a bit over this battle at your mill, mistress,” replied a
man.
“Talking a bit!” said Shirley. “It is a queer thing all the world is so fond
of talking over events. What good does your talking do? You working people
should be models of industry, but you are just as gossip-loving as the idle. Fine,
rich people that have nothing to do may be excused for trifling their time away;
but not you.”
“Should we never have a holiday because we work hard?” asked a man,
smiling.
“Never,” was the prompt answer; “unless you make a better use of it than
to talk scandal at your neighbours’ expense. Come, friends,” she added,
changing at once from bluntness to courtesy, “oblige me by taking your cans
and going home. I expect several persons to call today, and it will be
inconvenient to have the avenues to the house crowded.”
The yard was clear in five minutes. “Thank you, and good-bye, friends,”
said Shirley, as she closed the gates.
Entering by the back way, the young ladies passed through the kitchen to
the hall. Mrs. Pryor came running down the staircase to meet them. She was
unnerved and pale, and looked alarmed. She felt, more than anything,
dissatisfied with herself because she was not more equal to the demands of the
occasion.
“You are aware,” she began with a trembling voice, and yet anxious to
avoid exaggeration, “that rioters have attacked Mr. Moore’s mill. We heard the
firing and confusion very plainly here; we none of us slept. It was a sad night.
The house has been in great bustle all the morning. The servants have applied to
me for directions, which I really did not feel warranted in giving. Mr. Moore
has, I believe, sent up for refreshments for the soldiers and aid for the wounded.
I could not undertake the responsibility of giving orders. I fear delay may have
been harmful; but this is not my house. You were absent, my dear Miss
Keeldar. What could I do?”
“Were no refreshments sent?” asked Shirley, while her countenance
suddenly turned dark and warm.
“I think not, my dear.”
“And nothing for the wounded – no linen, no wine, no bedding?”
“I think not. I cannot tell what Mrs. Gill did; but it seemed impossible to
me to venture to dispose of your property by sending supplies to soldiers.
Provisions for a company of soldiers sounds formidable. How many there are I
did not ask; I intended to do what was right, yet I did not see the case quite
clearly, I admit.”
“These soldiers have risked their lives in defence of my property: they
have a right to my gratitude. The wounded are our fellow-creatures: we should
aid them. – Mrs. Gill!”
She called in a clear, penetrating voice. Mrs. Gill, who was deep in breadmaking in the kitchen, came at once, not daring even to rub the dough from her
hands or shake the flour from her apron. Her mistress had never called a servant
in that voice save once before, when Tartar had been fighting with two large
carriers’ dogs, encouraged by their masters. Then Miss Keeldar had summoned
John as if the Day of Judgment were at hand. Without waiting for him, she had
walked out into the lane, put her hands round the thick neck of the largest cur,
and used all her strength to pull it from Tartar’s torn and bleeding head. She had
not said a word to anybody during the rest of the day, but sat till evening
tending Tartar. She wept furtively over him sometimes, and murmured the
softest words of pity and endearment, which the old, scarred, canine warrior
acknowledged by licking her hand. As to John, his lady turned a cold shoulder
on him for a week afterwards.
Mrs. Gill, remembering this little episode, came promptly. That at such a
time Fieldhead should have been inhospitable stung Shirley’s haughty spirit to
the quick.
“How long is it since that message came from the mill?” she demanded.
“Not an hour yet, ma’am,” answered the housekeeper soothingly.
“Not an hour! You might as well have said not a day. They will have
applied elsewhere by this time. Send a man instantly down to tell them that
everything this house contains is at Mr. Moore’s, Mr. Helstone’s, and the
soldiers’ service. Do that first.”
While the order was being executed, Shirley moved away and stood at the
hall-window, silent, unapproachable. When Mrs. Gill came back, she turned,
with a flushed cheek and a spark of displeasure firing her glance.
“Let the contents of the larder and the wine-cellar be brought up, put into
the hay-carts, and driven down to the Hollow. If we have not much bread or
meat in the house, go to the butcher and baker, and desire them to send what
they have. But I will see for myself.”
“She will get over it in an hour,” whispered Caroline to Mrs. Pryor. “Go
upstairs, dear madam,” she added affectionately, “and try to be as calm as you
can. The truth is, Shirley will blame herself more than you before the day is
over.”
With a few more gentle assurances, Miss Helstone managed to soothe the
agitated lady. Having taken her to her apartment, Caroline left her to see if she
could be useful.
She found that she could be very useful; for Fieldhead had not many
servants, and just now their mistress found plenty of occupation for all the
hands at her command, and for her own also. The good-natured help which
Caroline gave the housekeeper and maids – all somewhat scared by their lady’s
mood – did a world of good; and it appeased Shirley herself. She ran over to
Caroline, who was carrying a heavy basket up the cellar stairs.
“It will strain your arm,” she cried; took it from her, and bore it out into
the yard. The cloud of temper was dispelled; the flash in her eye was melted.
She resumed her usual cheerful and cordial manner to those about her.
Shirley was still superintending the loading of the cart, when a gentleman
entered the yard.
“I hope I see Miss Keeldar well this morning?” he said, examining her
flushed face.
She gave him a look, and then again bent to her employment without
reply, hiding a smile. The gentleman repeated his greeting.
“Well enough,” was the answer; “and so is Mr. Moore too, I dare say.”
For the gentleman was he. “To speak truth, I am not anxious about him; some
slight mischance would be only deserved. His conduct has been – let us say
strange. May I ask what brings him here?”
“Mr. Helstone and I have just received your message that everything at
Fieldhead was at our service. We judged that you would be giving yourself too
much trouble; and I see we were correct. We are not a regiment, remember –
only about half a dozen soldiers and as many civilians.”
Miss Keeldar blushed, while she laughed at her own over-eager
generosity. Moore laughed too, though quietly; and ordered baskets to be
removed from the cart, and vessels returned to the cellar.
“The rector must hear of this,” he said; “he will make a good story of it.
What an excellent army contractor Miss Keeldar would have been!”
“You ought to be thankful,” said Shirley, “and not mock me. How could I
gauge your appetites or number your band? For aught I knew, there might have
been fifty of you. You told me nothing; and an application to provision soldiers
naturally suggests large numbers.”
“It appears so,” remarked Moore, levelling another of his keen, quiet
glances at the discomfited Shirley. – “Now,” he continued to the carter, “Your
load is somewhat lighter. Take it to the Hollow.”
As the vehicle rumbled out of the yard, Shirley demanded what had
become of the wounded.
“There was not a single man hurt on our side,” was the answer.
“You were hurt yourself, on the head,” interposed a quick, low voice –
that of Caroline, in the doorway, who had till now escaped Moore’s notice.
“Are you much hurt?”
“As you might scratch your finger with a needle in sewing.”
“Lift your hair and let us see.”
He took his hat off, disclosing a narrow slip of plaster. Caroline nodded
slightly to show that she was satisfied, and disappeared inside.
“How did she know I was hurt?” asked Moore.
“By rumour, no doubt. But it is too good of her to trouble herself about
you. For my part, it was your victims I was thinking of. What damage have
your opponents sustained?”
“One of the rioters, or victims as you call them, was killed, and six were
hurt. Medical aid was fetched immediately; and as soon as we can get a couple
of covered wagons and some clean straw, they will be removed to Stilbro’.”
“Straw! You must have beds and bedding. I will send my wagon directly;
and Mr. Yorke, I am sure, will send his.”
“He has volunteered already. And Mrs. Yorke – who, like you, seems to
regard the rioters as martyrs, and me and Mr. Helstone as murderers – is at this
moment, I believe, fitting it up with feather-beds, pillows and blankets. The
victims lack no attentions, I promise you. Mr. Hall, your favourite parson, has
been with them since six o’clock, waiting on them like any nurse; and
Caroline’s good friend, Miss Ainley, sent in a vast stock of lint and linen.”
“That will do. Where is your sister?”
“Well cared for. She is with Miss Mann. This morning the two set out for
the resort of Wormwood Wells, and will stay there some weeks.”
“Mighty clever you gentlemen think you are! Why are you not also
omniscient? How is it that events occur, under your very noses, of which you
have no suspicion? Ah, friend, you may search my countenance, but you cannot
read it. You think me a dangerous specimen of my sex. Don’t you?”
“A peculiar one, at least.”
“But Caroline – is she peculiar?”
“In her way, yes.”
“Her way! What is her way? She is neither eccentric nor difficult of
control. She is not what they call a spirited woman.”
“I have seen her flash out,” said Moore.
“So have I, but not with manly fire. It was a short, vivid, trembling glow,
that shot up, shone, vanished–”
“And left her scared at her own daring. You describe others besides
Caroline.”
“The point I wish to make is, that Miss Helstone, though gentle and
tractable, is still perfectly capable of defying even Mr. Moore’s penetration.”
“What have you and she been doing?” asked Moore suddenly.
“Have you had any breakfast? Mrs. Gill will give you something to eat.
Step into the oak parlour, and ring the bell.”
“No, I must go back. Good-morning. The first leisure I have, I will see
you again.”
↑

Chapter 21

MRS. PRYOR


While Shirley was talking with Moore, Caroline rejoined Mrs. Pryor
upstairs. She found that lady deeply depressed. Miss Helstone tried to comfort
her, knowing that although Mrs. Pryor looked unmoved by her quiet, tender
attentions, she valued them.
“I am deficient in self-confidence and decision,” said Mrs. Pryor. “I
always have been deficient in those qualities. Yet I think Miss Keeldar should
have known that I always try to do right. The unusual nature of the demand on
my judgment puzzled me, especially following the alarms of the night. I trust
no serious harm will result from my lapse of firmness.”
A gentle knock was heard at the door. “Caroline, come here,” said a low
voice.
Miss Helstone went out. There stood Shirley in the gallery, looking
contrite as any repentant child.
“How is Mrs. Pryor?” she asked.
“Rather out of spirits,” said Caroline.
“I have behaved very shamefully, very ungenerously to her,” said Shirley.
“How insolent in me to turn on her for what, after all, was only
conscientiousness on her part. But I regret my error most sincerely. Tell her so,
and ask if she will forgive me.”
Caroline did so with pleasure. Mrs. Pryor came to the door, and said
falteringly, “Come in, my dear.”
Shirley came in, and threw her arms round her governess. While she
kissed her heartily she said, “You must forgive me, Mrs. Pryor.”
“I have nothing to forgive,” was the reply. “We will pass it over, if you
please. The incident proves plainly how unequal I am to certain crises.”
And that was the painful feeling which would remain on Mrs. Pryor’s
mind. No effort of Shirley’s or Caroline’s could efface it. She could forgive her
offending pupil, not her innocent self.
Miss Keeldar was presently summoned downstairs again. The rector had
called, in high spirits. During his brief visit he quite forgot to ask after his
niece; the riot, the mill, the magistrates, the heiress, absorbed all his thoughts.
He alluded to the part he himself and his curate had taken in the defence of the
Hollow.
“Wrath will fall on our heads for our share in this business,” he said; “but
I defy every accuser. I was there to support the law, to play my part as a man.
Your tenant Moore has won my approval. A cooler, more determined
commander I could not wish to see. The man has shown sound judgment and
good sense – first, in being thoroughly prepared; and then in knowing how to
use without abusing his victory. Some of the magistrates are frightened, and,
like all cowards, show a tendency to be cruel. Moore restrains them with
admirable prudence. He has hitherto been very unpopular in the neighbourhood;
but, mark my words, the tide of opinion will now turn in his favour.”
Mr. Helstone was about to add some half-jesting warning to Miss Keeldar
about her rumoured partiality for her tenant, when a ring at the door checked
him. As the second caller was the rector’s old enemy, Mr. Yorke, Mr. Helstone
seized his hat, and with a brief adieu took an abrupt leave.
Mr. Yorke was in no mild mood. Moore, the magistrates, the soldiers, the
mob leaders, all came in for a share of invective; but he reserved his strongest
terms – and real racy Yorkshire adjectives they were – for the fighting parsons,
the rector and curate.
“The church,” he said, “is in a bonny pickle, when parsons take to
swaggering among soldiers, blazing away wi’ bullet and gunpowder.”
“What would Moore have done if nobody had helped him?” asked
Shirley. “He has plenty of courage, but even his gallantry alone could scarce
avail against two hundred.”
“He had the soldiers, those poor slaves who hire out their own blood and
spill other folks’ for money.”
“You abuse soldiers almost as much as you abuse clergymen. Your way
of talking amounts to this: Mr. Moore should have abandoned his mill and his
life to the rage of misguided madmen, and Mr. Helstone and every other
gentleman should have looked on, and seen the building razed and its owner
slaughtered, and never stirred a finger.”
“If Moore had behaved to his men from the beginning as a master ought
to behave, they wouldn’t have their present feelings towards him.”
“Easy for you to talk,” exclaimed Miss Keeldar warmly, “you, whose
family have lived at Briarmains for six generations, who knows all the people’s
ways and prejudices – easy, indeed, for you to avoid offending them. But Mr.
Moore came a stranger into the district, poor and friendless, with nothing but
his own energies and talent to back him. A monstrous crime indeed that he
could not become popular all at once; could not be jocular and free with
strangers! Unpardonable that he did not introduce improvements as gradually as
a rich capitalist might have done! For these errors is he to be the victim of mob
outrage? Is he to be denied the privilege of defending himself? Are brave men
to be reviled because they stand by him, and support the cause of one against
two hundred?”
“Come now, be cool,” said Mr. Yorke, smiling at Shirley’s earnestness.
“Cool! Must I listen coolly to dangerous nonsense? No. I like you very
well, Mr. Yorke, but I thoroughly dislike some of your principles. All that cant
about soldiers and parsons is most offensive in my ears. All irrational crying up
of one class, and howling down of another class, is really sickening to me; all
arraying of ranks against ranks, all party hatreds, I reject. You think you are a
philanthropist; you think you are an advocate of liberty; but I will tell you this –
Mr. Hall is a better friend both of man and freedom than Hiram Yorke.”
From a man Mr. Yorke would not have borne this language patiently, nor
would he have endured it from some women; but he thought Shirley both
honest and pretty, and her plain-spoken ire amused him. Besides, he took a
secret pleasure in hearing her defend her tenant, for he had Robert Moore’s
interest at heart. If he wished to revenge himself for her severity, he knew how:
a word, he believed, would tame and silence her, would cover her with the rosy
shadow of shame, and make her drop her gaze.
“What more hast thou to say?” he inquired.
“Say, Mr. Yorke? I have a great deal to say, if I could get it out in lucid
order, which I never can do. I believe your views, and those of most extreme
politicians, are purely opposition views, meant only to be talked about, and
never intended to be acted on. You abuse Moore for defending his mill. Had
you been in Moore’s place you could not have acted otherwise than he acted.
You abuse Mr. Helstone for everything he does. Mr. Helstone has his faults; he
sometimes does wrong, but oftener right. If you were vicar of Briarfield, you
would find it no easy task to sustain all the schemes for the benefit of the
parish. I wonder people cannot judge more fairly of each other and themselves.
When I hear Messrs. Malone and Donne chatter about the authority of the
church and the deference due to them as clergymen; when I hear their spite
against Dissenters; when I behold their insolent manner to the poor – I think the
Establishment is indeed in a poor way, and needs reforming. I remember your
strictures on all who differ from you, your sweeping condemnation of classes
and individuals, without the slightest allowance made for circumstance; and
then, Mr. Yorke, I doubt whether men exist who are reasonable and just enough
to be entrusted with the task of reform. I don’t believe you are of the number.”
“You have an ill opinion of me, Miss Shirley. You never told me so much
of your mind before.”
“I never had an opening. But I have sat in the back-parlour at Briarmains
for evenings together, listening to your talk, half admiring what you said, and
half rebelling against it. I think you a fine old Yorkshireman, sir. I am proud to
have been born in the same county as yourself. Truthful, upright, independent
you are; but also you are harsh, rude, narrow, and merciless.”
“Not to the poor, lass; only to the proud and high-minded.”
“And what right have you, sir, to make such distinctions? A prouder, a
higher-minded man than yourself does not exist. But you are all alike. Helstone
also is proud and prejudiced. Moore, though juster than either you or the rector,
is still haughty and stern. It is well there are such men as Mr. Hall – men of
large hearts, who can love their whole race, who can forgive others for being
richer or more powerful than they are. Such men may have less force of
character than you, but they are better friends to mankind.”
“And when is it to be?” said Mr. Yorke, now rising.
“When is what to be?”
“The wedding.”
“Whose wedding?”
“Only that of Robert Gérard Moore, Esq., of Hollow’s Cottage, with Miss
Keeldar, heiress of Fieldhead Hall.”
Shirley gazed at the questioner with rising colour. But the light in her eye
was not faltering; it shone steadily.
“That is your revenge,” she said slowly; then added, “Would it be a bad
match, unworthy of my family?”
“My lass, Moore is a gentleman; his blood is pure and ancient as mine or
thine.”
“And we two set store by ancient blood? We have family pride?”
Yorke bowed. Yes, he had family pride.
“Moore is a gentleman,” echoed Shirley, lifting her head with glad grace.
She checked herself. Words seemed crowding to her tongue. She would not
give them utterance; but her look spoke much. Yorke could not read it. It was
not a plain story, however, no simple gush of feeling, no ordinary love-
confession – that was obvious. It was something deeper, more intricate than he
guessed at. He felt his revenge had not struck home. He felt that Shirley
triumphed, and he was baffled.
“And if Moore is a gentleman, you can be only a lady–”
“So there would be no inequality in our union.”
“None.”
“Thank you for your approval. Will you give me away when I relinquish
the name of Keeldar for that of Moore?”
Mr. Yorke, instead of replying, gazed at her much puzzled. He could not
tell whether she spoke in earnest or jest.
“I don’t understand thee,” he said, turning away.
She laughed. “Take courage, sir; you are not the only one.”
“Moore may settle his own matters; I’ll not meddle with them further.”
A new thought crossed her. Her countenance changed. With a sudden
austere darkening of the eye she demanded, “Have you been asked to interfere?
Are you questioning me as another’s proxy?”
“The Lord save us! Whoever weds thee must look about him! Keep all
your questions for Robert; I’ll answer no more. Good-day, lassie!”
While Shirley was engaged with her callers, Caroline had persuaded Mrs.
Pryor to put on her shawl, and take a walk with her up towards the end of the
Hollow.
Here the opposing sides of the glen, clothed with brushwood and stunted
oaks, formed a wooded ravine, at the bottom of which ran the mill-stream,
struggling with many stones and tree-roots, foaming, gurgling, battling as it
went. Half a mile from the mill, you found deep solitude. The wood flowers
were fresh underfoot: wild roses bloomed abundantly. The sweet azure of bluebells and pearl-white blossoms spangled the grass.
Mrs. Pryor liked a quiet walk. She shunned high-roads, and sought lonely
lanes. In solitude she was nervous; but she feared nothing with Caroline. When
once she got away from human habitations, and entered the still demesne of
nature with her young friend, a change seemed to come over her. When with
Caroline, her heart, you would have said, shook off a burden, her brow put
aside a veil. With her she was cheerful, even tender; to her she would reveal
glimpses of her experience and learning, give her opportunities for guessing
what life she had lived, and where her feelings were vulnerable.
Today, for instance, as they walked along, Mrs. Pryor talked about the
various birds singing in the trees, and described their species and habits.
English natural history seemed familiar to her. She recognised all the wild
flowers, even tiny plants peeping out of chinks in old walls – plants such as
Caroline had scarcely noticed before. At the head of the ravine, they sat down
together on a ledge of mossy rock. Mrs. Pryor looked round, and spoke of the
neighbourhood as she had once seen it long ago. She described its changes,
comparing it to other parts of England with a sense of the picturesque, and an
appreciation of the beautiful and commonplace, that gave her discourse a charm
as pleasant as it was unpretending.
The sincere pleasure with which Caroline listened animated the elder
lady. With her chill, diffident manner, and incommunicative habits, she had
seldom known what it was to stir affection in another. It seemed that her heart
was moved with a fond impulse towards Caroline, who looked up to her as an
instructor, and clung to her as a friend. With more marked interest than usual,
she said, as she put aside from Caroline’s forehead a straying curl, “I do hope
this sweet breeze will do you good, my dear Caroline. I wish I could see more
colour in these cheeks; but perhaps you were never florid?”
“I had red cheeks once,” returned Miss Helstone, smiling. “A year – two
years ago – when I used to look in the glass, I saw a rounder, rosier face. But
when we are young,” added the girl of eighteen, “our minds are careless and our
lives easy.”
“Do you,” continued Mrs. Pryor, mastering her timidity with an effort,
“do you fret over cares for the future? Believe me, you had better not. Let the
morrow take care of itself.”
“True, dear madam. It is not over the future I pine. The evil of the day is
sometimes oppressive, and I long to escape it.”
“The evil of the day – that is – your uncle perhaps is not – he does not
appreciate—”
Mrs. Pryor could not complete her broken sentences; she could not ask
whether Mr. Helstone was too harsh with his niece. But Caroline
comprehended.
“Oh, my uncle and I get on very well,” she replied. “We never quarrel –
he never scolds me. Sometimes I wish somebody in the world loved me, but I
cannot say that I particularly wish him to have more affection for me. As a
child, I should perhaps have felt the lack of attention, only the servants were
very kind to me; but when people are long indifferent to us, we grow indifferent
to their indifference. My uncle does not care for women and girls, apart from
ladies that he meets in company. I have no wish that he should alter. It would
merely annoy and frighten me were he to be affectionate towards me now. But
you know, Mrs. Pryor, it is scarcely living to measure time as I do at the
rectory. The hours pass, and I get through them somehow, but I do not live. I
endure existence, but I rarely enjoy it. Since Miss Keeldar and you came I have
been – I was going to say happier, but that would be untrue.” She paused.
“How untrue? You are fond of Miss Keeldar, are you not, my dear?”
“Very fond of Shirley. I both like and admire her. But I am painfully
circumstanced. For a reason I cannot explain I want to go away from this
place.”
“You told me before, you wished to be a governess; but, my dear, if you
remember, I did not encourage the idea. I have been a governess myself for
much of my life. I am most fortunate that Miss Keeldar’s talents and her sweet
disposition have made my position easy; but when I was young, before I
married, my trials were severe. I should not like you to endure similar trials. I
worked for a family of good birth, whose members believed that they were
unusually good Christians; that all their hearts were reborn, and their spirits
perfectly disciplined. I was early given to understand that ‘as I was not their
equal,’ so I could not expect to have their sympathy. The gentlemen, I found,
regarded me as a ‘tabooed woman,’ who annoyed them by crossing their path.
The ladies made it plain that they thought me ‘a bore,’ and the servants, I was
told, ‘detested me;’ why, I could never clearly comprehend. My pupils, I was
informed, ‘however much they might love me, could not be my friends.’ It was
made clear that I must never cross the invisible but rigid line which separated
me from my employers.’ My life was solitary, joyless, toilsome. The sense of
friendlessness and homelessness it caused began to affect my health. I sickened.
The lady of the house told me coolly I was the victim of wounded vanity. She
hinted that if I did not make an effort to quell my ‘ungodly discontent,’ and to
cultivate the humility befitting my station, I would very likely ‘go to pieces’,
and die an inmate of a lunatic asylum.
“I said nothing to Mrs. Hardman – it would have been useless; but her
eldest daughter, visiting my bedside, allowed that there were hardships in the
position of a governess. However, these things, she said, were as they must be.
‘Governesses,’ she observed, ‘must ever be kept in isolation, to maintain that
distance which decorum requires.’
“I remember I sighed. Miss Hardman said severely, ‘I fear, Miss Grey,
you have inherited the sin of pride, and are ungrateful too. Mamma pays you a
handsome salary, and if you had sense you would thankfully put up with much
that is fatiguing and irksome, since it is made well worth your while.’
“Miss Hardman, my love, was a very strong-minded young lady, of most
distinguished talents. The aristocracy are decidedly a very superior class, you
know; as a high Tory I acknowledge that. She was most dignified as she
addressed me thus; still, I fear she was a little selfish, my dear.
“I remember,” continued Mrs. Pryor, after a pause, “another of Miss H.’s
observations, which she would utter with quite a grand air. She would say: ‘We
need the imprudences, mistakes, and crimes of a certain number of fathers to
sow the seed from which we reap the harvest of governesses. The daughters of
trades-people, however well educated, must necessarily be underbred, and unfit
to be guardians of our children. We shall ever prefer to place about our
offspring those who have been born and bred with somewhat of the same
refinement as ourselves.’”
“Miss Hardman must have thought herself something better than her
fellow-creatures, ma’am,” said Caroline, “since she held that their calamities,
and even crimes, were necessary to minister to her convenience. Her religion
must have been that of the Pharisee who thanked God that he was not as other
men are.”
“My dear, we will not discuss the point. I should be the last person to
wish to make you dissatisfied with your lot in life. Submission to authorities,
scrupulous deference to our betters are, in my opinion, indispensable to the
well-being of every community. All I mean to say, my dear, is that you had
better not attempt to be a governess, as the duties would be too severe for you.
Not one word of disrespect would I breathe towards the Hardmans; only I feel
that, were you to live with such a family, you would contend a while
courageously, then you would pine and grow too weak for your work; you
would come home – if you still had a home – broken down. Consumption or
decline would close the chapter. Such is the history of many a life. I would not
have it yours. My dear, we will now walk about a little, if you please.”
They both rose, and paced a green terrace bordering the chasm.
“My dear,” again began Mrs. Pryor, with a timid, embarrassed abruptness,
“the young often – frequently – anticipate – look forward to – to marriage as the
goal of their hopes.”
And she stopped. Caroline came promptly to her relief with selfpossession and courage.
“They do, and naturally,” she replied with calmness. “They look forward
to marriage with someone they love as the brightest destiny that can await them.
Are they wrong?”
“Oh, my dear!” exclaimed Mrs. Pryor, clasping her hands; and again she
paused. Caroline turned a searching eye on her agitated face. “My dear,” she
murmured, “life is an illusion.”
“But not love!” exclaimed Caroline. “Love is the most real, the most
lasting, the sweetest and yet the bitterest thing we know.”
“My dear, it is very bitter. It is said to be strong – strong as death! As to
the sweetness, nothing is so fleeting; but its sting remains for ever. It tortures
through time into its deepest night.”
“Yes, it tortures through time,” agreed Caroline, “except when it is
mutual love.”
“Mutual love! My dear, romantic novels are pernicious. You do not read
them, I hope?”
“Sometimes – whenever I can get them, indeed. But romance-writers
might know nothing of love, judging by the way in which they treat of it.”
“Nothing whatever, my dear,” assented Mrs. Pryor eagerly, “nor of
marriage; and the false pictures they give of those subjects cannot be too
strongly condemned. They are not like reality. They show you only the green,
tempting surface of the marsh, and give not one truthful hint of the slough
underneath.”
“But it is not always slough,” objected Caroline. “There are happy
marriages. Where affection is shared and sincere, and minds are harmonious,
marriage must be happy.”
“It is never wholly happy. Two people can never literally be as one. There
is, perhaps, a possibility of contentment under some rare circumstances; but it is
as well not to risk it, my dear. Let the single be satisfied with their freedom.”
“You echo my uncle’s words!” exclaimed Caroline, in dismay. “You
speak like Mrs. Yorke in her gloomy moments, like Miss Mann at her most
sour. This is terrible!”
“No, it is only true. O child, you have only lived the pleasant morning of
life; the hot, weary noon, the sad evening, the sunless night, are yet to come for
you. Mr. Helstone, you say, talks as I talk; and I wonder how his wife would
have talked had she been living!”
“And, alas! my own mother and father—” exclaimed Caroline.
“I have heard that they were separated.”
“They must have been very miserable.”
“You see all facts go to prove what I say.”
“In this case there ought to be no such thing as marriage.”
“There ought, my dear, if only to prove that in this life there is neither rest
nor recompense.”
“But your own marriage, Mrs. Pryor?”
Mrs. Pryor shrank and shuddered as if she had pressed a naked nerve.
“My marriage was unhappy,” said she, summoning courage at last; “but yet—”
She hesitated.
“But yet,” suggested Caroline, “not entirely wretched?”
“Not in its results, at least. No,” she added, in a softer tone; “God mingles
the balm of mercy with the most corrosive woe. I confess I am of a peculiar
disposition – in some points eccentric. I ought never to have married. I was
quite aware of it; and if I had not been so miserable as a governess, I never
should have married; and then – and then, my dear, the gentleman I married
was, perhaps, an exceptional character. I hope, at least, that few have had such
an experience as mine was, or have felt my sufferings. But, my dear, I do not
wish to dishearten; I only wish to warn you that the single should not be too
anxious to change their state, as they may change for the worse.”
“Thank you, my dear madam. I quite understand your kind intentions, but
I have no thoughts of marriage, and for that reason I want to support myself by
some other means.”
“My dear, listen to me. I have revolved this subject in my thoughts ever
since you first mentioned your wish to obtain a situation. You know I reside
with Miss Keeldar as her companion. Should she marry (and I believe that she
will before long), I shall cease to be necessary to her in that capacity. I possess
a small independency, arising partly from my own savings, and partly from a
legacy left me some years since. When I leave Fieldhead I shall take a house of
my own. I could not endure to live in solitude, but I have no relations whom I
care to invite to close intimacy. As you must have observed, my habits and
tastes have their peculiarities. But with you, my dear, I am happier than I have
ever been with any living thing. I should esteem it a great privilege – a comfort,
a blessing – if you would come to me then. Will you, Caroline? I hope you can
love me?”
“Indeed, I do love you,” was the reply. “I should like to live with you. But
you are too kind.”
“All I have,” went on Mrs. Pryor, “I would leave to you. You should be
provided for. But never again say I am too kind. You pierce my heart, child!”
“But, my dear madam – this generosity – I have no claim—”
“Hush! you must not talk about it. There are some things we cannot bear
to hear. Oh! it is late to begin, but I may yet live a few years. I can never wipe
out the past, but perhaps a brief space in the future may yet be mine.”
Mrs. Pryor seemed deeply agitated. Large tears trembled in her eyes.
Caroline kissed her gently, saying, “I love you dearly. Don’t cry.”
But the lady’s whole frame seemed shaken. She sat down, bent her head
and wept, until at last the agony subsided.
“Poor lonely lamb!” she murmured, returning Caroline’s kiss. “But come;
we must go home.”
At first Mrs. Pryor walked very fast. By degrees, however, she grew calm
and fell into her normal pace; and by the time they reached Fieldhead she had
re-entered into herself, and was, as usual, still and shy.
↑

Chapter 22
TWO LIVES


Only half of Moore’s activity and resolution had been seen in his defence
of the mill; he showed the other half (and a terrible half it was) in the relentless
way in which he pursued the leaders of the riot. The mob, the mere followers,
he let alone, perhaps thinking that men misled and goaded by hunger are not fit
objects of vengeance. At all events, though he had recognised many of the mob,
he daily let them pass on the street without threat.
The leaders he did not know. They were strangers from the large towns.
Most were not mill-workers; they were chiefly bankrupts, men in debt and often
in drink, who had nothing to lose, and much to gain. These persons Moore
hunted, and the occupation suited him. He liked it better than making cloth.
His horse must have hated these times, for it was ridden both hard and
often. He almost lived on the road, welcoming the fresh air after the steam of
dye-houses. The magistrates of the district dreaded him. They were slow, timid
men, who faltered in resolve and recoiled through fear – the fear of
assassination. This, indeed, was the dread which had hampered every
manufacturer in the district.
Moore knew his danger, and scorned those who would endanger him. The
knowledge that he hunted assassins was a spur to him. As for fear, many a night
he rode over the moors feeling far more elated and refreshed than when safety
and stagnation cocooned him in the counting-house.
Four leaders had to be accounted for. Two, within a fortnight, were
caught near Stilbro’; the remaining two were thought to be near Birmingham.
Meantime Moore did not neglect his battered mill. Only the windows
needed repairing; his grim metal darlings – the machines – had escaped
damage.
Whether during this busy life he nurtured any gentler thoughts, it was not
easy to discover. He seldom went near Fieldhead. If he called at the rectory, it
was only to confer with the rector in his study. He maintained his rigid course
very steadily. Meanwhile there was no lull in the tempest of war; her long
hurricane still swept the Continent. Ruin was mining under Moore’s feet, and
whether he rode or walked, he was aware of a hollow echo, and felt the ground
shake to his tread.
While the summer thus passed with Moore, how did it lapse with Shirley
and Caroline? Let us first visit the heiress. How does she look? Like a love-lorn
maiden, pale and pining?
By no means. Shirley is all right. If her wistful look is not gone, neither is
her careless smile. She keeps her dark old manor-house bright with her cheery
presence. The gallery has learned lively echoes from her voice; the dim
entrance-hall has grown pleasantly accustomed to the frequent rustle of a silk
dress, as its wearer sweeps from room to room, carrying flowers and opening
windows.
She takes up her sewing occasionally; but never sits steadily at it for
above five minutes at a time. Her needle is scarce threaded when a sudden
thought calls her upstairs. Perhaps she goes to seek some old ivory-backed
needle-book; perhaps to arrange her hair, or tidy a drawer; perhaps only to take
a peep from a window at the view of Briarfield church and rectory.
She has scarcely returned, and again taken up her sewing, when Tartar’s
scrape and strangled wheeze are heard at the porch door, and she runs to open it
for him. It is a hot day; he comes in panting; she must take him to the kitchen
for water. Through the open kitchen door the court is visible, sunny and gay,
with turkeys, peahens and their chicks, pearl-flecked Guinea-fowls, and blue
and cinnamon plumed pigeons. Irresistible spectacle! Shirley runs to the pantry
for a roll, and stands on the doorstep scattering crumbs. John is in the stables,
and he must be talked to, and her mare looked at.
Then the cows come in to be milked; Shirley must stay and take a review
of them all. There are perhaps some little calves, some little new lambs – maybe
twins, whose mothers have rejected them. Miss Keeldar must feed them with
her own hand. Meantime John asks about the farming of certain “crofts” and
“ings”, and his mistress has to fetch her straw garden-hat and accompany him
over stile and along hedgerow, to decide the matter on the spot, with the said
“crofts” and “ings” under her eye. She comes home to a late tea.
After tea Shirley reads. She is as tenacious of her book as she is lax of her
needle. Her seat is a footstool, or perhaps the carpet at Mrs. Pryor’s feet. The
tawny bulk of Tartar is stretched beside her. One hand of his mistress reposes
on his head, and if she takes it away he groans. Shirley’s mind is on her book.
She neither stirs nor speaks – unless to return a brief respectful answer to Mrs.
Pryor, who addresses her now and then.
“My dear, that great dog is crushing the border of your dress.”
“Oh, it is only muslin. I can put a clean one on tomorrow.”
“My dear, I wish you could acquire the habit of sitting at a table when
you read.”
“I will try, ma’am, some time; but it is so comfortable here.”
“My dear, you are tiring your eyes by the firelight.”
“Not at all, ma’am; my eyes are never tired.”
At last, however, she closes the volume, rises, and walks through the
room. Her book has refilled and rewarmed her heart; it has set her brain astir.
The still parlour, the clean hearth, the window opening on the twilight sky,
suffice to make earth an Eden, life a poem, for Shirley. A deep, inborn delight
glows in her young veins – the pure gift of God to His creature, the free dower
of Nature to her child. Her eye seeks, and her soul possesses, the vision of life
as she wishes it. The swift glory spreads, sweeping and kindling, and multiplies
its splendours. Shirley says nothing while the trance is upon her; but if Mrs.
Pryor speaks to her now, she goes out quietly, and continues her walk upstairs
in the dim gallery.
If Shirley were not an indolent, reckless, ignorant being, she would take a
pen at such moments. She would seize and fix the apparition, tell the vision
revealed. She would write out, in her queer but legible hand, the story that has
been narrated, the song that has been sung to her, and thus possess what she
was enabled to create. But indolent she is, reckless, and most ignorant; for she
does not know her dreams are rare. She does not know the full value of that
spring whose bright fresh bubbling in her heart keeps it green.
Shirley takes life easily. Her nature is in her eye. So long as she is calm, a
lazy softness, humour, and tenderness fill that grey sphere; anger her, and it
quickens with fire.
By the end of July, Miss Keeldar would probably have started with
Caroline on that northern tour they had planned; but just then an invasion befell
Fieldhead. A genteel foraging party besieged Shirley in her castle, and
compelled her to surrender.
An uncle, an aunt, and two cousins from the south – a Mr., Mrs., and two
Misses Sympson, of Sympson Grove – arrived in state. The laws of hospitality
obliged her to give in, which she did with a willingness which surprised
Caroline. Miss Helstone asked her how it was she submitted so readily. Shirley
answered that old feelings had their power; she had passed two years of her
youth at Sympson Grove.
“How did she like her relatives?”
She had nothing in common with them, she replied, except little Harry
Sympson, the sole son, who was very unlike his sisters. She had been fond of
him; but he was not coming to Yorkshire yet.
The next Sunday the Fieldhead pew in Briarfield Church held a prim,
trim, fidgety, elderly gentleman; a patient, placid-looking elderly lady in brown
satin; and two model young ladies, in model attire, with model deportment.
Shirley had the air of a black swan in the midst of this party, and looked very
forlorn. Having brought her into respectable society, we will leave her there a
while, and look for Miss Helstone.
Separated from Miss Keeldar by the presence of her fine relatives,
Caroline was limited once more to the grey rectory, the solitary morning walk
on remote paths, the long, lonely afternoon sitting in a quiet parlour, or in the
garden alcove. There the sun shone on ripening red currants trained over the
trellis, and on the fair roses entwined between, and fell chequered on Caroline,
still as a garden statue. She read old books from her uncle’s library – some
venerable Lady’s Magazines, some mad Methodist Magazines, and a few old
English classics. From these faded flowers Caroline had in her childhood
extracted the honey; they were tasteless to her now. By way of change, she
would sew for the poor, according to good Miss Ainley’s direction. Sometimes,
as she saw her tears fall on her work, she would wonder how that excellent
woman managed to be so serene in her solitude.
“I never find Miss Ainley oppressed or lost in grief,” she thought; “yet
her cottage is a dim little place, and she is without a close friend in the world. I
remember she told me once she had tutored her thoughts to tend upwards to
heaven, for there had been little enjoyment in this world for her, and she looks,
I suppose, to the bliss of the world to come. So do nuns, with their close cell,
their iron lamp, and their bed as narrow as a coffin. She says often she has no
fear of death. Poor Miss Ainley would cling closer to life if life had more
charms for her. God surely did not give us life with the sole end of wishing
always to die. I believe we were intended to prize and enjoy life: it was never
meant to be that useless, blank, slow-trailing thing it becomes to many, and is
becoming to me too.
“Nobody,” she went on, “is to blame for this state of things; and I cannot
tell how they are to be altered for the better; but I feel there is something wrong
somewhere. I believe single women should have more to do – more interesting
and profitable occupations than they have now. I do not think these words
displease God, or that they are irreligious. Indeed, God hears many a groan
which man stops his ears against, or frowns on with impotent contempt. I say
impotent, for people hate to be reminded of ills they cannot remedy. It forces on
them an awareness of their own incapacity, or a painful sense of an obligation
to make some unpleasant effort. Old maids should not ask for a place and an
occupation in the world; the demand disturbs the happy and rich.
“Look at the numerous families of girls in this neighbourhood – the
Armitages, the Birtwhistles, the Sykeses. Their brothers are in business or in
professions; they have something to do. Their sisters have no earthly
employment but household work and sewing, no earthly pleasure but visiting,
and no hope, in all their life to come, of anything better. This stagnant state of
things makes them decline in health. They are never well, and their minds and
views shrink to wondrous narrowness. The great wish, the sole aim of every
one of them is to be married, but the majority will never marry; they will die as
they now live. They scheme, they plot, they dress to ensnare husbands. The
gentlemen ridicule them; they don’t want them; they hold them very cheap. I
have heard them say with sneering laughs that the marriage market is
overstocked. Fathers say so likewise, and order their daughters to stay at home.
What do they expect them to do at home? They would answer, sew and cook,
and this only, contentedly, uncomplainingly, all their lives long, as if they had
no faculties for anything else. Could men live so themselves? Would they not
be very weary? And when there came no relief to their weariness, but only
reproaches, would not their weariness ferment in time to frenzy?
“Solomon’s virtuous woman in the Bible is often quoted as a pattern of
what woman ought to be. But she had something more to do than spin. She was
a manufacturer – she made fine linen and sold it; she was an agriculturist – she
bought estates and planted vineyards. That woman was a manager, and I don’t
believe either Mr. Armitage or Mr. Sykes could have got the advantage of her
in a bargain. Yet I like her. ‘Strength and honour were her clothing; the heart of
her husband safely trusted in her. She opened her mouth with wisdom; in her
tongue was the law of kindness; her children rose up and called her blessed; her
husband also praised her.’ King of Israel! your model of a woman is a worthy
model! But are we, in these days, brought up to be like her? Men of Yorkshire!
can your daughters reach this royal standard? Can you give them a field in
which their faculties may be exercised and grow? Men of England! look at your
poor girls, many of them fading around you, because life is a desert to them; or
reduced to strive, by coquetry and artifice, to gain a position by marriage.
“Fathers! Consider the matter well; do not dismiss it with an idle jest or
an unmanly insult. You would wish to be proud of your daughters, and not to
blush for them; then seek for them an interest and an occupation which shall
raise them above the flirt, the mischief-making tale-bearer. Keep your girls’
minds narrow and fettered, and they will be a plague and a care to you.
Cultivate them – give them scope and work; they will be your gayest
companions in health, your tenderest nurses in sickness, your most faithful prop
in age.”
↑

Chapter 23

AN EVENING OUT


One fine summer day that Caroline had spent entirely alone (her uncle
being at Whinbury), and whose long, bright, cloudless hours had been to her as
desolate as if they had been spent in the shadowless wastes of the Sahara, she
was sitting in the alcove, sewing, her brain working restlessly – when Fanny
came to the door and called, “Miss Caroline!”
When she answered, Fanny hastened over, a note in her hand. Miss
Helstone did not ask whence it came, and she did not even look at it; she let it
drop amongst the folds of her work.
“Joe Scott’s son brought it from the Hollow,” said Fanny.
This had an almost magical effect on her young mistress. She lifted her
head. The dropped note was snatched up eagerly, the seal was broken – it was
read in two seconds.
It was an affectionate note from Hortense, informing her young cousin
that she was returned from Wormwood Wells; that she was alone today, as
Robert was gone to Whinbury market; that nothing would give her greater
pleasure than to have Caroline’s company for tea. The good lady added, she
was sure such a change would be most beneficial to Caroline, who must be
sadly at a loss for improving society since the separation from her dear friend,
Hortense Gérard Moore.
Glad was Caroline to lay aside her sewing, to cover her curls with her
straw bonnet, and throw round her shoulders the black silk scarf; glad was she
to escape for a few hours the solitude, the sadness, the nightmare of her life;
glad to run down the fragrant green lane to the Hollow. True, she knew Robert
was not there; but it was delight to go where he had lately been, to enter the
room where he had that morning sat. And then, her thoughts whispered,
“Robert may come home while you are there; you may give him your hand;
perhaps, for a minute, you may sit beside him.”
“Silence!” was her austere response; but she loved the consolation.
Miss Moore advanced from the cottage to meet her, straight and
unbending as usual. No haste or joy was ever permitted to disorder her dignity;
but she smiled, pleased to see the delight of her pupil, to feel her kiss. She led
her tenderly in, half deceived and wholly flattered. Half deceived! Had she
known on whose account most of this joy was felt, Hortense would have been
both shocked and incensed.
“You would expect to find me alone, from what I said in my note,”
observed Miss Moore, as she led Caroline towards the parlour; “but since I
wrote it, company has come in.”
And opening the door she made visible an ample spread of crimson skirts
overflowing the chair at the fireside, and above them a cap more awful than a
crown. The cap’s frill stood a quarter of a yard broad round the face of the
wearer, with a great deal of ribbon. The wearer was Mrs. Yorke.
That great lady was come to take tea with Miss Moore. It was almost as
great and rare a favour as if the queen were to go uninvited to share pot-luck
with one of her subjects. Mrs. Yorke in general scorned visiting and teadrinking.
However, Miss Moore was a favourite with her. She had decided that
Miss Moore was a woman of steady deportment, without the least levity; also
that, being a foreigner, she must feel the want of a friend. She might have added
that her plain appearance, homely dress, and phlegmatic manner were
additional recommendations. Certainly ladies of beauty, elegance and lively
bearing were not often favoured with her approval.
Caroline advanced diffidently to the mighty matron. She knew little of
Mrs. Yorke, and, as a parson’s niece, was doubtful what sort of a reception she
might get. She got a very cool one, and was glad to hide her discomfiture by
turning away to take off her bonnet. Upon sitting down, she was immediately
accosted by a little personage in a blue frock, who started up from the side of
the great dame’s chair, where she had been sitting on a footstool, screened from
view by the wide red gown. Running to Miss Helstone, she threw her arms
round her neck and demanded a kiss.
“My mother is not civil to you,” said this personage, “and Rose there
takes no notice of you; it is their way. If a white angel crowned with stars had
come into the room, mother would nod stiffly, and Rose never lift her head; but
I will be your friend.”
“Jessie, curb that tongue of yours!” said Mrs. Yorke.
“But, mother, you are so frozen!” cried Jessie. “Miss Helstone has never
done you any harm; why can’t you be kind to her? You sit so stiff, and look so
cold, and speak so dry – that’s how you treat every young lady who comes to
our house. And Rose there is such an aut – aut – I have forgotten the word, but
it means a machine in the shape of a human being.”
“I am an automaton? Good! Let me alone, then,” said Rose, from a corner
where she was sitting with a book open on her knee. “Miss Helstone, how do
you do?” she added, before again casting down her eyes to study the pages.
Caroline gazed at her young, absorbed countenance, full of character;
with fine instinct, she felt that Rose Yorke was a unique child. Approaching
quietly, she knelt on the carpet at her side, and looked over her shoulder at her
book. It was a romance of Mrs. Radcliffe’s: ”The Italian.”
Caroline read on with her, making no remark. Presently Rose asked, “Do
you like it?”
“Long ago, when I was a child, I was wonderfully taken with it.”
“Why?”
“It seemed to open with such promise – such foreboding of a strange tale
to be unfolded.”
“And in reading it you feel as if you were really in Italy – under another
sort of sky. It makes me long to travel, Miss Helstone.”
“When you are a woman, perhaps, you may be able to gratify your wish.”
“I mean to do so. I cannot live always in Briarfield. I am resolved that my
life shall be a life. Not a black trance like the toad’s, buried in marble; nor a
long, slow death like yours in Briarfield rectory.”
“Like mine! what can you mean, child?”
“That house always reminds me of a windowed grave. I never see any
movement there. I never hear a sound from it, or see any smoke coming from
the chimneys. What do you do there?”
“I sew, I read, I learn lessons.”
“Are you happy?” asked Rose.
“Should I be happy wandering alone in strange countries?”
“Much happier, even if you did nothing but wander. You would pass
many a hill, wood, and river, each perpetually changing with the weather.
Nothing changes in Briarfield rectory.”
“Is change necessary to happiness?” asked Caroline.
“Yes. I feel monotony and death to be almost the same thing.”
Here Jessie spoke. “Isn’t she mad?”
“But, Rose,” pursued Caroline, “I fear a wanderer’s life, for me at least,
would end like that tale you are reading – in disappointment and vexation of
spirit.”
“Better to try all things and find all empty, than to try nothing and leave
your life a blank.”
“Rose,” observed Mrs. Yorke, “solid satisfaction is only to be realized by
doing one’s duty.”
“Right, mother! And if my Master has given me ten talents, my duty is to
trade with them, and make ten talents more. Not in the dust of household
drawers shall the coin be buried. Not in a broken-spouted teapot, or in a china
closet among tea-things. Not in the linen press among shrouds of sheets. And
least of all, mother” (she got up from the floor) – “least of all will I hide it in a
tureen of cold potatoes in the larder. Mother, the Lord who gave each of us our
talents will some day demand from all an account. The teapot, the old stockingfoot, the tureen will yield up their barren deposit in many a house. Let your
daughters, at least, increase their talents, so that they may pay the Master’s His
own with interest.”
“Rose, did you bring your sampler, as I told you?”
“Yes, mother.”
“Sit down, and do a line.”
Rose sat down promptly, and sewed as ordered. After ten minutes, her
mother asked, “Do you think yourself oppressed now – a victim?”
“No, mother.”
“Yet, as far as I understood your tirade, it was a protest against all
womanly and domestic employment.”
“You misunderstood it, mother. I should be sorry not to learn to sew. You
do right to teach me, and to make me work and mend.”
“Where is the use of ranting about it, then?”
“Am I to do nothing but that? I will do that, and then I will do more.
Now, mother, I have said my say. I am twelve years old, and not till I am
sixteen will I speak again about talents. For four years I bind myself an
industrious apprentice to all you can teach me.”
“You see what my daughters are, Miss Helstone,” observed Mrs. Yorke;
“how precociously wise in their own idea! ‘I would rather this, I prefer that’ –
such is Jessie’s cuckoo song; while Rose utters the bolder cry, ‘I will, and I will
not!’”
“I give a reason, mother; besides, my cry is only heard once a year.”
“I would advise all young ladies,” pursued Mrs. Yorke, “to study the
characters of such children before they marry and have any of their own; to
consider well how they would like the constant burden and task of training
them.”
“But with love it need not be so very difficult,” said Caroline. “Mothers
love their children almost better than they love themselves.”
“Fine talk! very sentimental! The practical part of life is yet to come for
you, young miss.”
“But, Mrs. Yorke, if I take any woman’s baby into my arms, I feel that I
love it, though I am not its mother. I could do almost anything for it willingly, if
it were dependent on me.”
“You feel! Yes, I dare say. You are led a great deal by your feelings, and
you think yourself a very sensitive person, no doubt. Are you aware that, with
all these romantic ideas, you have managed to train your features into a
lackadaisical expression, better suited to a novel-heroine than a woman who is
to make her way in the real world by dint of common sense?”
“No; I am not aware of that, Mrs. Yorke.”
“Look in the mirror behind you. Compare the face you see there with that
of any hard-working milkmaid.”
“My face is pale, but it is not sentimental; and most milkmaids, however
red and robust they may be, are more stupid and less practically fitted to make
their way in the world than I am. I think more, and more correctly, than
milkmaids in general do. Where they would often act weakly, I should act
judiciously.”
“Oh no! you would be influenced by your feelings.”
“Of course I should often be influenced by my feelings. They were given
me to that end. I hope, if ever I have a husband and children, my feelings will
induce me to love them.”
Caroline had a pleasure in saying this to Mrs. Yorke. She did not care
what unjust sarcasm might be hurled at her in reply. She flushed, not with anger
but excitement, when the matron answered coolly, “That was well said – it was
quite fine; but it is lost on an old wife and an old maid. There should have been
a gentleman present. – Is Mr. Robert nowhere hid behind the curtains, do you
think, Miss Moore?”
Hortense, who during much of the conversation had been in the kitchen
superintending the preparations for tea, did not understand. She answered, with
a puzzled air, that Robert was at Whinbury. Mrs. Yorke laughed her short
laugh.
“Straightforward Miss Moore!” said she patronizingly. “It is like you to
understand my question so literally. You comprehend nothing of intrigue. You
are not of the class the world calls sharp-witted.”
At this, Hortense drew herself up and puckered her black eyebrows, but
still looked puzzled.
“I have been noted for sagacity and discernment from childhood,” she
returned.
“You never plotted to win a husband, I’ll be bound,” pursued Mrs. Yorke;
“and you have no experience to aid you in discovering when others plot.”
Caroline felt this language where the speaker intended she should feel it –
in her very heart. She could not even parry the shafts; to answer would have
been to avow that the cap fitted.
Mrs. Yorke, looking at her as she sat with troubled, downcast eyes, and
cheek burning painfully, felt the sufferer was fair game. The woman had a
natural antipathy to a shrinking, sensitive character; nor was a pretty face a
passport to her affections. It was seldom she met with all these obnoxious
qualities combined in one individual; still more seldom she found that
individual at her mercy, under circumstances in which she could crush her well.
Lowering her large head she made a new charge.
“Your cousin Hortense is an excellent sister, Miss Helstone. Such ladies
as come to try their life’s luck here at Hollow’s Cottage may, by a little clever
artifice, cajole the mistress of the house, and have the game all in their own
hands. You are fond of your cousin’s society, I dare say, miss?”
“Of which cousin’s?”
“Oh, of the lady’s, of course.”
“Hortense is, and always has been, most kind to me.”
“Every sister with an eligible single brother is considered most kind by
her spinster friends.”
“Mrs. Yorke,” said Caroline, lifting her eyes slowly, while the glow of
shame left her cheek, and its hue turned pale – “Mrs. Yorke, may I ask what
you mean?”
“To give you a lesson on rectitude.”
“Do I need this lesson?”
“Most young ladies of the present day need it. You are quite a modern
young lady – morbid, delicate, professing to like retirement; which implies, I
suppose, that you find little worthy of your sympathies in the ordinary world.
The ordinary world – everyday honest folks – are much better than any bookish,
romancing chit of a girl who hardly ever puts her nose over her uncle’s garden
wall.”
“Consequently of whom you know nothing. Excuse me – indeed, it does
not matter whether you excuse me or not – you have attacked me without
provocation; I shall defend myself without apology. Of my relations with my
two cousins you are ignorant. In a fit of ill-humour you have attempted to
poison them by insinuations which are far more crafty and false than anything
with which you can justly charge me. That I happen to be pale, and sometimes
to look diffident, is no business of yours; that I am fond of books, and dislike
gossip, is still less your business; that I am a ‘romancing chit of a girl’ is a mere
conjecture on your part. That I am the parson’s niece is not a crime, though you
may be narrow-minded enough to think it so. You dislike me, but for no just
reason; therefore keep the expression of your dislike to yourself. Otherwise I
shall answer even less scrupulously than I have done now.”
She ceased, and sat in white and still excitement. She had spoken clearly,
neither fast nor loud; but her silver accents thrilled the ear.
Mrs. Yorke was not irritated at the reproof. Turning coolly to Miss
Moore, she said, nodding approvingly, “She has spirit, after all. – Always speak
as honestly as you have done just now,” she continued, “and you’ll do.”
“I repel a recommendation so offensive,” was the answer, delivered with
the same clear look. “I reject counsel poisoned by insinuation. I shall speak as I
think proper; not as you dictate. So far from always speaking as I have done just
now, I shall never address anyone in a tone so stern or in language so harsh,
unless in answer to unprovoked insult.”
“Mother, you have found your match,” pronounced little Jessie.
Rose had heard the whole with an unmoved face. She now said, “No;
Miss Helstone is not my mother’s match, for she allows herself to be vexed. My
mother would wear her out in a few weeks. Shirley Keeldar manages better.
Mother, you have never hurt Miss Keeldar’s feelings yet. She wears armour that
you cannot penetrate.”
Mrs. Yorke often complained that her children were mutinous. It was
strange that with all her strictness and “strong-mindedness,” she could gain no
command over them. A look from their father had more influence than a lecture
from her.
Miss Moore, now rallying her dignity, prepared to utter a speech which
was to prove both parties in the wrong, and to make it clear to each that she
should be ashamed of herself, and ought to submit humbly to the superior sense
of her hostess. Fortunately Sarah’s entrance with the tea-tray called her
attention to the duty of making tea. After the meal Rose restored her to goodhumour by bringing her guitar and asking for a song, and afterwards engaging
her in an intelligent discussion about music.
Jessie, meantime, talked to Caroline, first about religion and then politics.
Jessie was accustomed at home to drink in a great deal of what her father said
on these subjects, and afterwards in company to repeat his opinions. She
berated Caroline soundly for being a member of the Established Church, and
for having an uncle who was a clergyman. She informed her that she ought to
work for her living honestly, instead of passing a useless life, and eating the
bread of idleness. Thence Jessie passed to a review of the ministry, and
mentioned Lord Castlereagh and Mr. Perceval as if they were demons. She
denounced the war as wholesale murder, and Lord Wellington as a “hired
butcher.”
It was comic to hear her repeating her sire’s denunciations; as hearty a
little mutineer as ever wore a muslin frock and sash. Her expressive little face
gave a piquancy to every phrase.
Caroline chid her when she abused Lord Wellington; but she listened
delighted to a subsequent tirade against the Prince Regent. Jessie quickly read,
in the sparkle of her hearer’s eye and the laughter hovering round her lips, that
she had hit on a topic that pleased.
But, Jessie, I will write about you no more. This autumn evening, wet and
wild, reminds me too forcibly of another howling, rainy evening some years
ago, when certain people made a pilgrimage to a new grave in a heretic
cemetery. The heavy rain was soaking into the wet earth which covered their
lost darling, and the sad, sighing gale was mourning. Jessie lay cold, coffined,
solitary – only the earth screening her from the storm.
Mrs. Yorke folded up her knitting, cut short the lecture on politics, and
concluded her visit before the path up the fields should have become thoroughly
moist with evening dew.
The lady and her daughters being gone, Caroline felt that she also ought
to go home. If she lingered much later, dusk would draw on, and Fanny would
be put to the trouble of coming to fetch her. Still, she could not quit her seat at
the little parlour window. Her eyes turned west towards the fire-tinged August
sky.
Caroline looked at the wicket-gate, and the hedge fencing in the garden,
longing to see a human figure, of a certain shape and height, pass the hedge and
enter the gate. A human figure she at last saw – nay, two. Frederick Murgatroyd
went by, carrying a pail of water; Joe Scott followed, carrying the keys of the
mill. They were going to lock up for the night, and then go home.
“So must I,” thought Caroline, sighing. “This is heart-breaking folly. In
the first place, even if I should stay till dark there will be no arrival; I feel in my
heart that I am not fated to have the pleasure I long for. In the second place, if
he stepped in at this moment, my presence here would annoy him, and that
would turn my blood to ice. His eye would be clouded with darkness. I had
better go home.”
She took up her bonnet, and was just fastening the ribbon, when Hortense,
directing her attention to a splendid bouquet of flowers in a vase, mentioned
that Miss Keeldar had sent them that morning from Fieldhead. She went on to
comment on the guests that lady was at present entertaining, expressing her
wonder that a person who was so fond of her own way did not find some means
of getting rid of all these relatives.
“But they say she actually will not let Mr. Sympson and his family go,”
she added. “They wanted to return south last week, to be ready to receive their
only son, who is expected home from a tour. She insists that her cousin Henry
shall come and join his friends here in Yorkshire. I dare say she partly does it to
oblige Robert and myself.”
“How to oblige Robert and you?” inquired Caroline.
“Why, my child, you are dull. Don’t you know – you must often have
heard–”
“Please, ma’am,” said Sarah, opening the door, “the preserves that you
told me to boil in treacle – the congfiters, as you call them – is all burnt to the
pan.”
“Les confitures! Elles sont brûlées? Ah, quelle négligence! Fille
insupportable!”
And mademoiselle rushed into the kitchen, whence came a strong odour
of charcoaled sweets.
The mistress and maid had been feuding the whole day on the subject of
preserving sour black cherries. Sarah held that sugar should be used;
mademoiselle maintained that treacle was far better. She had imprudently left
Sarah in charge of the preserving-pan; and the maid’s lack of sympathy for its
contents had induced a degree of carelessness, whose result was dark and
cindery ruin. Hubbub followed; high upbraiding, and sobs more loud than real.
On the sudden opening of the back-door, there fell an abrupt calm in the
kitchen. The tongues were checked. Was it Robert? wondered Caroline. He
often entered by the kitchen.
No; it was only Joe Scott, who, having cleared his throat significantly. as
a lofty rebuke to the squabbling womankind, said, “Now, I thowt I heerd a
crack? As t’ maister’s comed, I considered it desirable to let ye know. A
household o’ women is nivver fit to be comed on wi’out warning. Here he is.
Walk forrard, sir. They war playing up, but I think I’ve quietened ’em.”
Another person was heard to enter. Joe Scott proceeded with his rebukes.
“What d’ye mean by being all i’ darkness? Sarah, canst t’ not light a
candle?”
There followed a confused sort of pause, which Caroline, listening hard,
could not understand. A cry of surprise broke it, followed by the sound of a
kiss, and exclamations.
“Mon Dieu! mon Dieu! Est-ce que je m’y attendais?”
“Et tu te portes toujours bien, bonne sœur?” inquired another voice –
Robert’s, certainly.
Caroline was puzzled. She ran upstairs to leave the coast clear, and
stopped at the head of the banisters, where she could watch without being seen.
It was past sunset now; dusk filled the passage, yet she saw Robert and
Hortense cross it.
“Caroline!” called Hortense, “come and see my brother!”
“Strange,” thought Caroline. “Why this excitement about such an
everyday occurrence as a return from market? Surely the burnt treacle has not
crazed her?”
She descended in a subdued flutter. She was still more fluttered when
Hortense seized her hand at the parlour door, and leading her to Robert, who
stood tall and dark against the window, presented her with a mixture of
agitation and formality, as though they had been utter strangers.
Increasing puzzle! He bowed rather awkwardly, and as he turned from her
with a stranger’s embarrassment, the dim light from the window fell on his
face. The enigma of the dream was at its height. She saw a visage like and
unlike – Robert, and no Robert.
“Is my sight wrong?” said Caroline. “Is it my cousin?”
“Certainly it is your cousin,” asserted Hortense.
Then who was this now coming through the passage – now entering the
room? Caroline, looking round, met a new Robert – the real Robert, as she felt
at once.
“Well,” said he, smiling at her astonished face, “which is which?”
“Ah, this is you!”
He laughed. “I believe it is me. And do you know who he is? You have
heard of him.”
She had gathered her senses now. “It can only be your brother; my cousin
Louis.”
“Now, see us together. – Change places, and again, Louis. Which is the
old love now, Lina?”
“As if it were possible to make a mistake when you speak! But you are
not so much alike. It is only your height, your figure, and complexion that are
so similar.”
“And I am Robert, am I not?” asked the newcomer, making an effort to
overcome what seemed his natural shyness.
Caroline shook her head gently. Her eye beamed softly on the real Robert,
saying much.
She was not permitted to quit her cousins soon. Robert insisted she
remain. Glad, simple, and in light, bright spirits for the time, she was too
pleasant an addition to the cottage circle to be willingly parted with. Louis
seemed naturally rather a grave, retiring man; but the Caroline of this evening,
which was not the Caroline of every day, thawed his reserve. He sat near her
and talked to her.
She already knew he was a tutor; she learned now that he had for some
years been the tutor of Mr. Sympson’s son; that he had been travelling with
him, and had accompanied him here. She inquired if he liked his post, but got a
look in reply which did not invite further question. The look woke Caroline’s
ready sympathy. She thought it a very sad expression to pass over so sensible a
face; for Louis had a sensible face, though not so handsome as Robert’s. She
turned to compare them.
“How could I think them alike?” she asked herself. “It is Hortense Louis
resembles, not Robert.”
This was in part true. He had a shorter nose and less decisive mouth and
chin than the young mill-owner. His air, though deliberate, could scarcely be
called prompt. You felt that he had a slower and probably a more benignant
nature than the elder Moore.
Robert – perhaps aware of Caroline’s glance – came over and took a seat
at her side. She resumed her conversation with Louis, but her thoughts were
elsewhere. Her heart beat on the side from which her face was half averted. She
acknowledged a steady, manly, kindly air in Louis; but she bent before the
secret power of Robert. To be so near him, though he was silent, affected her
like a spell. Had she been obliged to speak to him only, it would have quelled
her, but, at liberty to address another, it excited her. Her discourse flowed
freely; it was gay, playful, eloquent. The sober pleasure expressed by her
listener’s smile drew out all that was brilliant in her nature. She felt that this
evening she appeared to advantage. But a cloud soon crossed her enjoyment.
Hortense, who was now clearing the little table to make room for the
supper-tray, called Robert’s attention to the vase of flowers.
“They came from Fieldhead,” she said, “intended as a gift to you, no
doubt. We know who is the favourite there; not I, I’m sure.”
It was a wonder to hear Hortense jest – a sign that her spirits were high
indeed.
“We are to understand, then, that Robert is the favourite?” observed
Louis.
“The most precious in the world,” replied Hortense; “beside him the rest
of the human race is nothing. Am I not right, my child?” she added, appealing
to Caroline.
Caroline was obliged to reply, “Yes,” and her star withdrew as she spoke.
“Et toi, Robert?” inquired Louis.
“When you have an opportunity, ask her,” was the quiet answer. Caroline
discovered that it was late, and she must go home. Home she would go; not
even Robert could detain her now.
↑

Chapter 24

THE VALLEY OF THE SHADOW OF DEATH


The future sometimes seems to sob a low warning of coming events, like
some remote gathering storm. At other times this future bursts suddenly, as if a
rock had rent, and in it a grave had opened. Before you are aware, you stand
face to face with a shrouded and unthought-of calamity – a new Lazarus.
Caroline Helstone went home from Hollow’s Cottage in good health, as
she imagined. On waking the next morning she felt oppressed with unwonted
languor. She had no appetite. Food was as ashes and sawdust to her.
“Am I ill?” she asked, and looked at herself in the glass. Her eyes were
bright, their pupils dilated; her cheeks seemed rosier than usual. “I look well;
why can I not eat?”
She felt a pulse beat fast in her temples; she felt, too, her brain in strange
activity. Hundreds of busy and broken but brilliant thoughts engaged her mind.
Now followed a hot, parched, restless night. Towards morning a terrible
dream seized her like a tiger; when she woke, she knew she was ill.
How she had caught the fever (fever it was) she could not tell. But her
long languor and habitual sadness had fanned the spark to flame, and left a
well-lit fire behind it.
It seemed, however, a gentle fire. After two hot days and worried nights,
there was no violence in the symptoms, and neither her uncle, nor Fanny, nor
the doctor, nor Miss Keeldar, when she called, had any fear for her. A few days
would restore her, everyone believed.
The few days passed, and the revival had not begun. When she had been
ill a fortnight, Mrs. Pryor, who had visited her daily, was present in her
chamber one morning, watching her narrowly. She took her hand and placed
her finger on her wrist; then, quietly leaving the chamber, she went to Mr.
Helstone’s study. With him she remained closeted a long time – half the
morning. On returning to her sick young friend, she stood awhile at the bedside,
gently rocking herself to and fro, with a movement habitual to her.
At last she said, “I have sent Fanny to Fieldhead to fetch a few things for
me, for a short stay here. I wish to remain with you till you are better, and your
uncle kindly permits it. Is that acceptable to you, Caroline?”
“I am sorry you should have such trouble. I do not feel very ill, but it will
be such comfort to know you are in the house, to see you sometimes in the
room; but don’t confine yourself on my account, dear Mrs. Pryor.”
Mrs. Pryor, bending over the pale little sufferer, was smoothing the hair
under her cap, and gently raising her pillow. Caroline, smiling, lifted her face to
kiss her.
“Are you free from pain? Are you at ease?” asked Mrs. Pryor earnestly.
“I think I am almost happy.”
“You wish to drink? Your lips are parched.” She held a glass to her
mouth. “Have you eaten anything today, Caroline?”
“I cannot eat.”
“But soon your appetite will return; I pray God it may.”
In laying her down again, she encircled her in her arms; and with a
movement which seemed scarcely voluntary, she drew her to her heart, and held
her close an instant.
“I shall hardly wish to get well, so that I may keep you always,” said
Caroline.
Mrs. Pryor did not smile. A tremor ran over her features.
“You are more used to Fanny than to me,” she remarked. “I should think
my attendance must seem strange?”
“No; quite natural, and very soothing. You must be used to waiting on
sick people, ma’am. You move so softly and gently.”
“I am dexterous in nothing, my dear. You will often find me awkward,
but never negligent.”
Negligent, indeed, she was not. Mrs. Pryor made the sick-room her
domain; she performed all its duties; she lived in it day and night. The patient
remonstrated, but only faintly, and not for long. Loneliness and gloom were
now banished from her bedside; protection and solace sat there instead. The
patient was as willing to be cherished as the nurse was bent on cherishing.
With all this care it seemed strange the sick girl did not get well; yet such
was the case. She faded like a flower in drought. Miss Keeldar, on whose
thoughts danger or death seldom intruded, at first had no fears for her friend;
but seeing her change and sink, alarm clutched her heart. She went to Mr.
Helstone and expressed herself with so much energy that he was obliged,
however unwillingly, to admit the idea that his niece was ill with something
more than a migraine; and when Mrs. Pryor came and quietly demanded a
doctor, he said she might send for two if she liked.
One came; he said darkly that the future would solve the mystery, wrote
some prescriptions, gave some directions – all with an air of crushing authority
– pocketed his fee, and went. Probably he knew well enough he could do no
good, but did not like to say so.
Still, no rumour of serious illness travelled through the neighbourhood. At
Hollow’s Cottage it was thought that Caroline had only a severe cold, she
having written a note to Hortense to that effect. Mrs. Yorke, on being told that a
doctor had been summoned, sneered at the hypochondriac fancies of the rich
and idle, who, she said, having nothing but themselves to think about, must
needs send for a doctor if their little finger ached.
The “rich and idle” Caroline, meantime, was falling fast into a condition
of debility which puzzled all except Mrs. Pryor; for she alone reflected how
liable is the undermined structure to sink in sudden ruin.
Sick people often have fancies, and Caroline had one which even her
tender nurse could not at first explain. On a certain day in the week, at a certain
hour, she would entreat to be taken up and dressed, and to sit in her chair near
the window. Here she would stay till noon was past. No matter how exhausted
she appeared, she would not lie down again until the church clock had tolled
midday.
Then, back in bed, she usually buried her face deep in the pillow, and
drew the coverlets close round her, as if to shut out the world. More than once,
as she thus lay, Mrs. Pryor noted that a slight convulsion shook the sick-bed,
and a faint sob broke the silence.
One Tuesday morning, as usual, Caroline had asked to rise, and now she
sat wrapped in her white dressing-gown, leaning forward in the easy-chair,
gazing steadily through the window. Mrs. Pryor was seated behind, knitting and
watching her. A change crossed her pale, mournful brow; she half rose and
looked earnestly out.
Mrs. Pryor glanced over her shoulder. From here the churchyard was
visible, beyond it the road; and there, riding sharply by, appeared a horseman.
Mrs. Pryor recognised Mr. Moore. Just as the rising ground concealed him from
view, the clock struck twelve.
“May I lie down again?” asked Caroline.
Her nurse assisted her to bed. Having laid her down and drawn the curtain
round her, she stood listening near. The little couch trembled, the suppressed
sob stirred the air. A contraction as of anguish altered Mrs. Pryor’s features;
half a groan escaped her lips. She now remembered that Tuesday was
Whinbury market day, when Mr. Moore must pass by just before noon.
Caroline always wore round her neck a slender braid of silk, attached to
which was some trinket. When dressed it was hidden; as she lay in bed she held
it in her hand. That Tuesday afternoon, as she dozed in feverish restlessness,
she had pushed the coverlets a little aside. Mrs. Pryor bent to replace them. The
small, wasted hand clasped as usual her jealously-guarded treasure; but its
fingers were now relaxed in sleep.
Mrs. Pryor gently freed the braid, drawing out a tiny locket. Under its
crystal face appeared a curl of short black hair.
With an agitated movement, the sleeper started and woke. Half rising, as
if in terror, she exclaimed, “Don’t take it from me, Robert! It is my last
comfort; let me keep it. I never tell anyone whose hair it is; I never show it.”
Mrs. Pryor had already disappeared behind the curtain. Caroline looked
around the chamber; she thought it empty. Believing herself alone, she let
words escape her lips unawares.
“Oh, I should see him once more before all is over!” she cried. “God
grant me a little comfort before I die!
“But he will not know I am ill till I am gone, and he will come when they
have laid me out, and I am cold and stiff.
“What can my departed soul feel then? Can it see or know what happens
to the clay? Can the dead revisit those they leave? Can they come in the
elements? Will wind, water, fire, lend me a path to Moore?
“Is it for nothing the wind sings at night – or sobs, as if for sorrow to
come? Does nothing haunt it, nothing inspire it?
“Why, it suggested to me words one night; I would have written them
down, only they appalled me.
“What are those influences in the atmosphere, that play over our nerves
like fingers on stringed instruments, and call forth now a sweet, exultant note,
and now the saddest wail?
“Where is the other world? In what will another life consist? Is not the
hour hastening when the veil must be rent for me? Great Spirit, to whom, as my
Father, I have prayed from my childhood, help me! Sustain me through the
ordeal I dread and must undergo! Give me strength! Give me patience! Give me
– oh, give me faith!”
She fell back on her pillow. Mrs. Pryor stole quietly from the room. She
re-entered it soon after, as if she had overheard nothing.
The next day several callers came. It had become known that Miss
Helstone was worse. Mr. Hall and his sister Margaret arrived; both left the
sickroom in tears, so altered had they found the patient. Hortense Moore came,
and Caroline seemed stimulated by her presence. She assured her, smiling, that
she was not dangerously ill; she talked to her cheerfully, and with her flushed
complexion, she looked better.
“How is Mr. Robert?” asked Mrs. Pryor, as Hortense was preparing to
take leave.
“He was very well when he left. News from the police about the rioters
has taken him to Birmingham for a fortnight.”
“He is not aware that Miss Helstone is very ill?”
“Oh no! He thought, like me, that she had only a bad cold.”
As evening closed in, Mrs. Pryor brought her patient some tea. Caroline,
opening her eyes from a moment’s slumber, viewed her nurse with an
unrecognizing glance.
“I smelt the honeysuckles this summer morning,” she said, “as I stood at
the counting-house window.”
Strange words like these pierce a loving listener’s heart more poignantly
than steel. They sound romantic, perhaps, in books; in real life they are
harrowing.
“My darling, do you know me?” said Mrs. Pryor.
“I went in to call Robert to breakfast. I have been with him in the garden.
He asked me to go. The peaches are ripening.”
“My darling! my darling!” repeated the nurse.
“I thought it was daylight – long after sunrise. It looks dark. Is the moon
set?” The moon, lately risen, was gazing full and mild upon her.
“Then it is not morning? I am not at the cottage? Who is this at my
bedside?”
“It is myself – your friend – your nurse – your – lean your head on my
shoulder.” In a lower tone – “O God, take pity! Give her life, and give me
courage! Teach me words!”
Some minutes passed in silence. The patient lay mute and passive in the
nurse’s trembling arms.
“I am better now,” whispered Caroline at last. “I feel where I am. This is
Mrs. Pryor near me. I was dreaming. How fast your heart beats, ma’am! Do not
be afraid.”
“It is only a little anxiety, which will pass. I have brought you some tea,
Cary. Your uncle made it himself. You know he says he can make a better cup
of tea than any housewife. Taste it. He is concerned to hear that you eat so
little.”
“I am thirsty. Let me drink.” She drank eagerly.
“What o’clock is it?” she asked.
“Past nine.”
“Oh! I have yet a long night before me. But the tea has made me strong. I
will sit up.”
Mrs. Pryor raised her, and arranged her pillows.
“The afternoon has been bad since Hortense went;” said Caroline.
“Perhaps the evening may be better. It is a fine night, I think?”
“Very fine – a perfect summer night. The old church-tower gleams like
silver.”
“Can you see many weeds and nettles amongst the graves? or do they
look flowery?”
“I see closed daisy-heads gleaming like pearls. Thomas has mown down
the dock-leaves and rank grass, and cleared all away.”
“I always like that to be done; it soothes one’s mind to see the place in
order. I dare say the moonlight will fall through the east window of the church
full on the Helstone monument. When I close my eyes I seem to see poor
papa’s epitaph on the white marble. There is plenty of room for other
inscriptions underneath.”
“William Farren came to look after your flowers this morning. He has
taken two of your favourite plants home to nurse for you.”
“If I were to make a will, I would leave William all my plants; Shirley my
trinkets – except one, which must not be taken off my neck; and you, ma’am,
my books.” After a pause – “Mrs. Pryor, you know I always delight to hear you
sing. Sing me a hymn. Sing ‘Our God, our help in ages past.’”
Mrs. Pryor at once complied. Her speaking voice was sweet and silver
clear; in song it was almost divine, and trembled with tender expression.
The servants in the kitchen, hearing it, stole to the stair-foot to listen.
Even old Helstone, as he walked in the garden, pondering over the feeble nature
of women, stood still to catch the mournful melody. Why it reminded him of his
forgotten dead wife, he could not tell. He was glad to recollect that he had
promised to pay Wynne, the magistrate, a visit that evening. He was averse to
gloomy thoughts, and usually found means to make them march in doublequick time. The hymn followed him faintly as he crossed the fields. He
hastened his pace, that he might get beyond its reach.
 “Our God, our help in ages past,
 Our hope for years to come,
 Be Thou our guard while troubles last–
 O Father, be our home!”
“Now sing a Scottish song,” suggested Caroline. “‘Ye banks and braes o’
bonnie Doon.’”
Again Mrs. Pryor obeyed, but after the first stanza she stopped. She could
get no further.
“You are weeping at the sadness of the song. Come here, and I will
comfort you,” said Caroline, in a pitying accent. Mrs. Pryor sat on the edge of
the bed, and allowed the wasted arms to encircle her.
“You often soothe me; let me soothe you,” murmured the young girl,
kissing her cheek. “I hope it is not for me you weep? I do not feel very ill – only
weak.”
“But your heart is almost broken, Caroline; you have been so neglected,
so repulsed, left so desolate.”
“I believe grief has been my worst ailment. I sometimes think if happiness
came to me I could revive yet.”
“Do you wish to live?”
“I have no object in life.”
“You love me, Caroline?”
“Very much – very truly.”
“I will return directly, dear,” remarked Mrs. Pryor.
Gliding to the door, she softly turned the key in the lock, and came back.
She bent over Caroline and gazed intently on her face.
“Then, if you love me,” said she, “it will be neither shock nor pain for
you to know that from my veins issued the blood which flows in yours; that you
are mine – my daughter – my own child.”
“Mrs. Pryor–”
“My own child!”
“That means – you have adopted me?”
“It means that, if I have given you nothing else, I at least gave you life;
that I bore you, nursed you; that I am your true mother.”
“But Mrs. James Helstone – my father’s wife, whom I do not remember,
she is my mother?”
“She is your mother. James Helstone was my husband. I say you are
mine. I thought perhaps you were all his, which would have been cruel. But
God permitted me to be the parent of my child’s mind. These features are
James’s; he had a fine face when he was young. Papa gave you your blue eyes
and soft brown hair, my darling; he gave you your oval face and regular
features; but the heart and brain are mine, in you developed to excellence. I
esteem my child as highly as I do most fondly love her.”
“Is it true? Is it no dream? My own mother! Is she one I can be so fond of
as I can of you? I have been told people generally did not like her.”
“They told you that? Well, your mother now tells you that, not having the
gift to please people generally, for their approval she does not care. Her
thoughts are centred in her child. Does that child welcome or reject her?”
“But if you are my mother, the world is all changed to me. Surely I can
live. I should like to recover–”
“You must recover. Daughter! we have been long parted; I return now to
cherish you again.”
She cradled her in her arms; she rocked her softly, as if lulling a young
child to sleep.
“My mother – my own mother!”
The offspring nestled to the parent; that parent gathered her closer still.
She covered her with noiseless kisses; she murmured love over her, like a dove
nurturing its young.
There was silence for a long while.
“Does my uncle know?”
“I told him when I came to stay with you here.”
“Did you recognize me when we first met at Fieldhead?”
“How could it be otherwise? I was prepared to see my child.”
“I saw you were disturbed.”
“Caroline, you do not know what an age of strange sensation I lived,
during the two minutes that elapsed between you being announced and your
entrance. Your appearance shook me.”
“Why? Were you disappointed?”
“What will she be like? I had asked myself; and when I saw you, I could
have dropped. I said, I will never own her; she shall never know me.”
“But I said and did nothing remarkable. I felt a little diffident at meeting
strangers – that was all.”
“I soon saw you were diffident. That was the first thing which reassured
me.”
“You puzzle me.”
“I had reason to dread beauty, to mistrust grace and courtesy. Beauty and
affability had come in my way when I was young and desolate – a toil-worn
governess breaking down before her time. These, Caroline, when they smiled
on me, I mistook for angels. I followed them home; and when I had given my
chance of future happiness into their hands, I witnessed a transfiguration – saw
the white mask lifted, the bright disguise put away, and opposite me sat down –
O God, I have suffered!”
She sank on the pillow.
“I have suffered! None saw – none knew. There was no sympathy, no
redress!”
“Take comfort, mother. It is over now.”
“It is over. God kept me in the days of my anguish. Through great
tribulation He brought me through to this salvation. He has cast away my fear,
and given me in its stead perfect love. But, Caroline–”
“Mother!”
“When you next look on your father’s monument, respect the name
chiselled there. To you he did only good. On you he conferred all his beauties,
and none of his defects. You owe him gratitude. Leave, between him and me,
the settlement of our mutual account. God is the arbiter. This world’s laws were
powerless to protect me, or to restrain him! As you said, it is all over now; he
sleeps in that church. To his dust I say this night, what I have never said before,
‘James, slumber peacefully! Your terrible debt is cancelled! Look! I wipe out
the long, black account with my own hand! James, your child atones. This one
good gift you gave me has nestled to my heart, and tenderly called me
“mother.” Husband, rest forgiven!’”
“Dearest mother, that is right! Can papa’s spirit hear us? Is he comforted
to know that we still love him?”
“I said nothing of love. I spoke of forgiveness.”
“O mother, you must have suffered!”
“O child, the human heart can suffer! We never know how deep, how
wide it is, till misery fills it with rushing blackness.”
“Mother, forget.”
“Forget!” she said, with the strangest laugh. “The world will change
before I forget.”
“Hush, mother! Rest! Be at peace!”
And the child lulled the parent, as the parent had lulled the child. At last
Mrs. Pryor wept. She grew calmer, and resumed her tender attentions.
Replacing her daughter on the bed, she smoothed the pillow, rearranged the soft
hair, and refreshed the damp brow.
“Mamma, let them bring a candle, so that I may see you; and tell my
uncle to come in. I want to hear him say that I am your daughter. And, mamma,
take your supper here. Don’t leave me for one minute tonight.”
“O Caroline, it is well you are gentle! You will say to me, Go, and I shall
go; Do this, and I shall do it. You inherit a certain manner as well as certain
features – softly spoken, though, thank God! Well,” she added, under her
breath, “he spoke softly too, once; and then, when the world was not listening,
sounds to curdle the blood.”
“It seems so natural, mamma, to ask you for this and that. But do not let
me be troublesome. Stop me if I encroach.”
“You must not depend on me to stop you; I have little moral courage. The
want of it is my bane. It is that which kept me apart from my child during the
ten years since my husband’s death. It was that which first permitted the infant I
might have kept a while longer to be snatched from my embrace.”
“How, mamma?”
“I let you go as a babe, because you were pretty, and I feared your
loveliness, deeming it the stamp of perversity. They sent me your portrait, taken
at eight years old; it confirmed my fears. Had it shown me a heavy, bluntfeatured, commonplace child, I should have hastened to claim you; but I saw
the delicacy of an aristocratic flower – a ‘little lady’. I had too recently crawled
from under the yoke of the fine gentleman – escaped crushed and paralysed – to
dare to meet his still finer representative. My sweet little lady overwhelmed me
with dismay; her air of elegance froze my marrow. In my experience, truth had
not gone along with beauty. A form so straight and fine, I argued, must conceal
a mind warped and cruel. I resolved to leave you in your uncle’s hands.
Matthewson Helstone, I knew, was an upright if austere man. He and all the
world thought badly of me for my strange, unmotherly resolve, and I deserved
to be misjudged.”
“Mamma, why did you call yourself Mrs. Pryor?”
“It was a name in my mother’s family. I could not bear my married name.
My new name sheltered me. Under it, I resumed my old occupation of teaching.
At first I scarcely earned a living; but how safe seemed the hunger and chill of a
cold hearth when free from terror! How serene was solitude, when I feared no
violence and vice!”
“But, mamma, you have been in this neighbourhood before. How was it
that when you reappeared here with Miss Keeldar you were not recognized?”
“I only paid a short visit, as a bride, twenty years ago, and then I was very
different. My figure, my features, my hair – everything is altered. You cannot
imagine me slim and dressed in scanty white muslin, with hair in Grecian curls
above my forehead?”
“You must, indeed, have been different. Mamma, I heard my uncle
coming into the house. Ask him to step upstairs, and let me hear his assurance
that I am truly awake and not dreaming.”
Mrs. Pryor duly summoned the rector.
“She’s not worse, I hope?” he inquired hastily.
“I think her better. She seems stronger.”
“Good!” said he, brushing quickly into the room. “Ha, Cary! how do? Did
you drink my cup of tea? I made it for you just as I like it myself.”
“I drank it every drop, uncle. It did me good. I wished for company, so I
begged Mrs. Pryor to call you in.”
The rector looked pleased, and yet embarrassed. He was willing enough
to bestow his company on his sick niece for ten minutes; but how to entertain
her he knew not. He hemmed and fidgeted.
“You’ll be up in a trice,” he observed. “The little weakness will soon pass
off; and then you must drink port wine and eat game and oysters. I’ll get them
for you, if they are to be had anywhere. Bless me! we’ll make you as strong as
Samson before we’re done.”
“Who is that lady, uncle, standing beside you?”
“Good God!” he ejaculated. “She’s not wandering, is she, ma’am?”
Mrs. Pryor smiled.
“I am wandering in a pleasant world,” said Caroline, in a soft, happy
voice, “and I want you to tell me whether it is real or visionary. What is the
name of that lady, uncle?”
“We must have the doctor again, ma’am. Thomas must go for him.”
“No; I don’t want a doctor. Mamma shall be my only physician. Now, do
you understand, uncle?”
Mr. Helstone pushed up his spectacles to his forehead, and took a pinch of
snuff from his snuff-box. Thus fortified, he answered briefly, “I see daylight.
You’ve told her then, ma’am?”
“And is it true?” demanded Caroline. “Is she really my mother?”
“You won’t cry, or make any scene, or turn hysterical, if I answer Yes?”
“Cry! I’d cry if you said No. It would be terrible to be disappointed now.
But how do you call her?”
“I call her Agnes Helstone. She married my brother James, and is his
widow. She had the trouble of bringing you into the world. Mind you show
your duty to her by quickly getting well!”
“If wishing to get well will help me, I shall not be long sick. This morning
I had no reason and no strength to wish it.”
Fanny here tapped at the door, and said that supper was ready.
“Uncle, if you please, send me a little bit of supper – anything you like,
from your own plate. That is wiser than going into hysterics, is it not?”
“It is spoken like a sage, Cary. When women are sensible and intelligible,
I can get on with them. It is only the superfine sensations and extreme notions
that put me out. If a woman asks me for something edible or wearable, I can
understand the demand; but when they pine for sympathy, sentiment, and
whatnot – I can’t do it; I don’t know it; I haven’t got it.”
Mr. Helstone then departed, but soon returned, bringing a plate.
“This is chicken,” he said, “but we’ll have partridge tomorrow. – Lift her
up, and put a shawl over her. Now, here is the very same little silver fork you
used when you first came to the rectory. That strikes me as being what you may
call a happy thought – a delicate attention. Take it, Cary, and munch away.”
Caroline did her best. Her uncle frowned to see her so weakened. He
prophesied, however, great things for the future; and as she smiled gratefully,
he stooped over her pillow, kissed her, and said, with a broken, rugged accent,
“Good-night, bairnie! God bless thee!”
Caroline enjoyed peaceful rest that night, encircled by her mother’s arms,
and pillowed on her breast; and though more than one feverish dream came to
her in slumber, yet, when she woke, returning consciousness brought so happy
a feeling that her agitation was swiftly soothed.
As for the mother, she spent the night like Jacob, wrestling with God in
earnest prayer.
↑

Chapter 25

THE WEST WIND BLOWS


Not always do those who dare such divine conflict prevail. Night after
night the supplicant may cry in agonised, soundless voice: “Spare my beloved.
Heal my life’s life. God of heaven, be merciful!” And after this cry and strife
the sun may rise and see him worsted. At morn the dear, pale lips may murmur
of a night of yet worse suffering.
Then the watcher approaches the patient’s pillow, and sees a new and
strange moulding of the familiar features, feels that the unbearable moment
draws nigh, that it is God’s will his idol shall be broken. He bends his head, and
subdues his soul to the sentence he cannot avert and scarce can bear.
Happy Mrs. Pryor! She was still praying when her child softly woke in
her arms. There was no piteous moaning, no deaf apathy. Caroline’s first words
showed no fever or delirium.
“Mamma, I have slept so well. I only dreamed and woke twice.”
Mrs. Pryor rose with a start, joyful tears called into her eyes by that
affectionate word “mamma.”
For many days the mother dared rejoice only with trembling. That first
revival seemed like the flicker of a dying lamp. If the flame streamed up bright
one moment, the next it sank dim. Exhaustion followed close on excitement.
Caroline made a touching endeavour to appear better, but too often failed.
The effort to eat, to talk, to look cheerful, was unsuccessful. Many an hour
passed when Mrs. Pryor feared that she would never grow stronger.
During this time the mother and daughter seemed left almost alone in the
neighbourhood. It was the close of August; the weather was very dry and dusty,
very cloudless, too, though a pale haze seemed to rob the heaven of blue, and
the earth of freshness. Almost every family in Briarfield was away. Miss
Keeldar and her friends were at the seaside; so were the Yorkes. Mr. Hall and
Louis Moore, between whom a friendship had arisen, had gone to walk in the
Lakes. Even Hortense, who would fain have stayed at home, had been so
earnestly entreated by Miss Mann to accompany her again to Wormwood Wells
that she felt obliged to comply. As for Robert, from Birmingham he had gone to
London, where he still stayed.
However, there came a day when the dry east wind dropped. A cloud
arose in the west, and spread wide: rain and tempest followed. When that was
over the sun broke out, heaven regained its azure, and earth its green; the hills
rose clear, freed from that pale sickly haze.
Her mother’s care and the pure, fresh wind, blowing soft through the
window, rekindled Caroline’s energies. At last Mrs. Pryor began to hope. It was
not merely Caroline’s smile which was brighter, but a certain look had passed
from her face – a dread, glassy look, familiar to those who have watched by
sickbeds. Mrs. Pryor saw laid on the pillow a face pale and wasted, but not
white and rigid.
Now, too, Caroline was not always saying she was thirsty; food was not
so distasteful to her. With what anxious care her nurse prepared what she
preferred! How she watched her as she ate!
Nourishment brought strength. Caroline could sit up. Then she longed to
breathe the fresh air, to revisit her flowers, to see how the fruit had ripened. Her
uncle had bought a garden-chair for her use. He carried her down in his arms,
and placed her in it, and William Farren wheeled her round the walks, to show
her what he had done amongst her plants.
William and she found plenty to talk about. They had a common interest
in animals, birds and plants; they held similar views about humane treatment of
the lower creation, and had a similar turn for observing natural history. The nest
of some ground-bees, which had burrowed in the turf under a cherry-tree, was
one subject of interest; the haunts of hedge-sparrows, and the welfare of certain
fledglings, was another.
Mrs. Pryor wondered how her daughter could be so at ease with a
workman. She found it impossible to speak to him otherwise than stiffly. She
felt as if a great gulf lay between her caste and his, and that to cross it or meet
him half-way would be to degrade herself. She gently asked Caroline, “Are you
not afraid, my dear, to converse with that person so unreservedly? He may
presume, and become troublesomely garrulous.”
“You don’t know William, mamma. He never presumes. He is too proud
and sensitive to do so. William has very fine feelings.”
Mrs. Pryor smiled sceptically at the naïve notion of that rough-handed
clown having “fine feelings.” Farren, for his part, was sulky towards Mrs.
Pryor. He knew when he was misjudged.
Mrs. Pryor liked the evening; for then she was alone with her daughter.
During the day she would have her cool moments, as was her wont. Relations
between her and Mr. Helstone were very respectful but rigidly ceremonious. By
dint of strict civility and well-maintained distance they got on smoothly.
Towards the servants Mrs. Pryor was shy; but her diffidence made her
appear haughty to Fanny and Eliza, and she was unpopular with them. She
knew it, and felt dissatisfied with herself.
This dejected mood changed under Caroline’s influence. The affection of
her child thawed her frost; she grew smiling and pliant. Caroline hung on her
with easy dependence; she confided in her, and contented the mother’s heart.
She liked to hear her daughter say, “Mamma, do this;” “Please, mamma,
fetch me that;” “Mamma, read to me;” “Sing a little, mamma.” Nobody else had
ever so looked for help at her hand. Other people were always reserved with
her, as she was reserved and stiff with them. Caroline showed no such
reproachful sensitivity.
Yet Caroline could find fault. She had her eyes wide open to habits that
could be remedied. On certain points she would artlessly lecture her parent; and
that parent, instead of being hurt, felt pleasure in discovering that the girl was
so much at home with her.
“Mamma, I am determined you shall not wear that old gown any more. Its
fashion is not becoming. You shall put on your black silk every afternoon. In
that you look nice; it suits you. And you shall have a black satin dress for
Sundays. My uncle gives me cash to get what I want. You know he is generous;
and I have set my heart on seeing you in black satin. Let me choose the pattern.
You always want to disguise yourself like a grandmother. You would persuade
one that you are old and ugly. Not at all! On the contrary, when well dressed
and cheerful you are very comely indeed. And then you speak like a young
lady, with such a clear, fine tone, and you sing better than any young lady I ever
heard. Why do you wear such dresses and bonnets, mamma, such as nobody
else ever wears?”
“Does it annoy you, Caroline?”
“Very much. People say you are miserly; and you are not, for you give
liberally to the poor, though in secret. But I will be your lady’s-maid myself.
When I get a little stronger I will set to work, and you must be good, mamma,
and do as I bid you. My own mamma,” she went on, “who belongs to me, and
to whom I belong! I am a rich girl now. I have something I can love, and not be
afraid of loving. Mamma, who gave you this little brooch? Was it papa?”
“My only sister gave it me, Cary. Would that your Aunt Caroline had
lived to see her niece!”
“Have you nothing of papa’s – no gift of his?”
“I have one thing that I prize, invaluable and sweet to me.”
“Show it, mamma. Is it here or at Fieldhead?”
“It is talking to me now. Its arms are round me.”
“Ah, mamma, you mean your teasing daughter, who never lets you alone;
who follows you upstairs and down, like a dog.”
“Whose features still give me such a strange thrill sometimes. I half fear
your fair looks yet, child.”
“I am sorry papa was not good. I do so wish he had been. Wickedness
kills love. If you and I thought each other wicked, how miserable we should be!
Mother, before I knew you, I had a fear that you were not good. And now I am
delighted to find you perfect – almost; kind, clever, nice. Your sole fault is that
you are old-fashioned, and of that I shall cure you. Mamma, put your work
down; read to me. I like your southern accent; it is so pure. When you first met
me, mamma, did I seem to speak roughly?”
“No. I almost wished you had. Your father spoke well, and you inherit the
gift.”
“Poor papa! When he was so agreeable, why was he not good?”
“Why he was as he was, I cannot tell. It is a deep mystery. The key is in
the hands of his Maker. There I leave it.”
“Mamma, put down your sewing; here is a book – your favourite –
Cowper.”
These commands were the mother’s pleasure. If ever she delayed
compliance, it was only to hear them repeated, and to enjoy her child’s soft,
half-playful urgency. And then, when she yielded, Caroline would say archly,
“You will spoil me, mamma. I always thought I should like to be spoiled, and I
find it very sweet.” So did Mrs. Pryor.
↑

Chapter 26

OLD COPY-BOOKS


By the time the Fieldhead party returned to Briarfield, Caroline was
nearly well. As soon as Miss Keeldar arrived home she called at the rectory.
A shower of rain was falling on the late flowers when the garden wicket
was heard to swing open, and Shirley passed the window. On her entrance she
showed her feelings in her own peculiar fashion. When deeply moved, she was
not garrulous. She took Caroline in her arms, gave her one look, one kiss, then
said, “You are better. God keep you in good health!”
She began to talk about the journey; but her eye still wandered to Caroline
with some trouble and amazement. Suddenly her piercing glance turned to Mrs.
Pryor.
“When will my governess return to me?” she asked.
“May I tell her all?” demanded Caroline of her mother. Shirley was soon
enlightened.
“Very good,” was the cool comment. “But it is no news to me.”
“What! did you know?”
“I guessed long since. I have heard somewhat of Mrs. Pryor’s history and
of Mr. James Helstone’s career and character, from talking to Miss Mann; also
he is one of Mrs. Yorke’s warning examples, that she hangs out to scare young
ladies away from matrimony. I was sceptical, but when I asked Mr. Yorke
about it, he said, ‘James Helstone was a man-tiger. He was handsome,
dissolute, soft, treacherous, courteous, cruel–’ Don’t cry, Cary; we’ll say no
more about it.”
“I am not crying, Shirley; go on.”
“Fortunately I have said all that I have to say.”
“But papa is dead; they should let him alone now.”
“They should; and we will let him alone. Cry away, Cary; it will do you
good. Beside, maybe every drop blots out a sin. – Madam,” she continued,
addressing Mrs. Pryor, “did you think I could see you and your daughter
together without noticing your similarity in many points, and observing your
emotions in the presence of your child? I made guesses, and they are correct.
But I said nothing; it was not my business.”
“That is not like you,” said Caroline; “you are not reserved; you talk
frankly.”
“I may be frank, yet know where to stop. In showing my treasure I may
withhold a gem or two.”
Caroline thus got a new view of Shirley. Before long, the prospect was
renewed.
As soon as she had sufficient strength, Miss Keeldar invited her daily to
Fieldhead. Perhaps Shirley had become weary of her honoured relatives the
Sympsons. She did not say so; but she claimed Caroline eagerly.
The Sympsons were church people, so they received the rector’s niece
with courtesy. Mr. Sympson proved to be a man of spotless respectability, pious
principles, and worldly views; his lady was a very good woman – patient, kind,
well-bred. She had been brought up on a narrow system of views, starved on a
few prejudices – a mere handful of bitter herbs; a few preferences, soaked till
they had no flavour; and some excellent principles, made up in a stiff raised
crust of bigotry difficult to digest. Far too submissive was she to complain of
this diet.
The daughters were an example to their sex. They were tall, with Roman
noses. and had been educated faultlessly. All they did was well done. History
and the most solid books had cultivated their minds. They knew by heart a
certain young ladies’ schoolroom code of behaviour, and never deviated from
it; they regarded with whispered horror all deviations in others. Originality –
whether in a book, speech, or person – was to them an evil, and they were quick
to recognize its signs, and to shudder and recoil.
Henry Sympson, the only son and youngest child, was a boy of fifteen,
who generally stayed with his tutor. When he left him, he sought out Shirley.
This boy differed from his sisters. He was little, lame, and pale; but emotion
could give colour to his cheek and decision to his crippled movements. He was
to be a clergyman. His mother loved him, but Mr. and the Misses Sympson, not
understanding him, let him much alone. Shirley made him her pet, and he made
Shirley his playmate.
In the midst of this family circle, or rather outside it, moved the tutor –
the satellite.
Yes, Louis Moore was a satellite of the house of Sympson, connected, yet
apart. They treated him with dignity. The father was austerely civil, sometimes
irritable; the mother was attentive, but formal; the daughters saw in him an
abstraction, not a man. It seemed, by their manner, that their brother’s tutor did
not live for them. They were learned; so was he – but not for them. They were
accomplished; he had talents too, imperceptible to their senses. The most
original observation from his lips fell unheard on their ears. Nothing could
exceed the propriety of their behaviour.
One fact strangely astonished Caroline. It was to discover that her cousin
Louis had absolutely no sympathizing friend at Fieldhead; that to Miss Keeldar
he was as much a mere teacher, as little a man, as to the Misses Sympson.
Why was the kind-hearted Shirley so indifferent to the dreary position of
a fellow-creature isolated under her roof? She was not, perhaps, haughty to him,
but she never noticed him – she let him alone. He came and went, spoke or was
silent, and she rarely recognized his existence.
As to Louis Moore himself, he had the air of a man used to this life. His
faculties seemed walled up in him. He never laughed; he seldom smiled; he was
uncomplaining. His pupil Henry loved him; he asked nothing more than civility
from the rest of the world. It even appeared that he would accept nothing more;
for when Caroline made gentle overtures of friendship, he did not encourage
them.
In the house one living thing alone was his friend, besides Henry: and that
was the ruffianly Tartar, who had a singular partiality for him – a partiality so
marked that sometimes, when Moore entered the room, Tartar would rise from
Shirley’s feet and take himself to the taciturn tutor. Once she noticed this
desertion, and softly tried to coax him back. Tartar looked, slavered, and
sighed, but remained at Louis Moore’s side. That gentleman patted him, and
smiled to himself.
An acute observer might have remarked, that same evening, that after
Tartar had returned to Shirley, and was once more lying near her footstool, the
audacious tutor by one word and gesture fascinated him again. Tartar pricked
up his ears and came to receive the expected caress. As it was given, the
significant smile again rippled across Moore’s quiet face.
“Shirley,” said Caroline one day, as they two were sitting alone in the
summer-house, “did you know that my cousin Louis was tutor in your uncle’s
family before the Sympsons came down here?”
Shirley’s reply was not so prompt as usual, but at last she answered, “Yes,
of course.”
“It puzzles me that you never spoke of it, although you talk a great deal.
How was it never mentioned?”
“Because it never was,” and Shirley laughed.
“You are a singular being! You were silent as the grave about Mrs. Pryor,
and now here is another secret. But why you made it a secret is the mystery.”
“I never made it a secret. If you had asked me who Henry’s tutor was, I
would have told you. Besides, I thought you knew.”
“I am puzzled about something else. You don’t like poor Louis. Why? Is
it his position? Do you wish that Robert’s brother were more highly placed?”
“Robert’s brother, indeed!” was the exclamation, uttered in a tone close to
scorn; and with an impatient movement Shirley snatched a rose peeping
through the open window.
“Yes,” repeated Caroline, “Robert’s brother. Louis is not so handsome as
Robert; but he is as much a gentleman.”
“Wise, humble, pious Caroline!” exclaimed Shirley ironically. “We
should not despise plain features, nor an honest occupation, should we? There is
your subject in the garden,” she continued, pointing through the clustering
creepers; Louis Moore was visible, coming slowly down the walk.
“He is not ugly, Shirley,” pleaded Caroline; “he is not ignoble. He is sad;
silence seals his mind. But I believe him to be intelligent; and if he had not
something good about him, Mr. Hall would never seek his society.”
Shirley laughed sarcastically. “Well, well. Since he’s Cyril Hall’s friend
and Robert Moore’s brother, we’ll just tolerate his existence, eh, Cary? You
believe him to be not quite an idiot, do you? Something good about him – not
an absolute ruffian! Your opinion has weight with me; and I will speak to him.”
He approached the summer-house. Unaware that it was occupied, he sat
down on the step; Tartar, who had followed him, lay across his feet.
“Old boy!” said Louis, pulling his ear, which had been torn and chewed in
a hundred battles, “This garden is not ours, but we enjoy its greenness and
perfume, don’t we?”
He sat silent, caressing Tartar, who slobbered affectionately. A faint
twittering commenced among the trees; little birds fluttered down, as light as
leaves, and hopped expectantly on the grass.
“The small brown elves actually remember that I fed them the other day,”
said Louis. “They want some more biscuit. Today I have none – not a crumb,
little sprites.”
He put his hand in his pocket and drew it out empty.
“A want easily supplied,” whispered Miss Keeldar.
She took from her reticule some sweet-cake; for she always carried
something to throw to the chickens or sparrows. She crumbled it, and bending
over his shoulder, put the crumbs into his hand.
“There,” said she; “there is a providence for the improvident.”
“This September afternoon is pleasant,” observed Louis Moore, as, not at
all discomposed, he calmly cast the crumbs on to the grass.
“You take a sort of harsh solitary triumph in drawing pleasure from the
lower creation.”
“Solitary, but not harsh. With animals I feel I am Adam’s son, the heir of
him to whom dominion was given over every living thing. Your dog likes and
follows me. The pigeons from your dovecot flutter at my feet. Your mare in the
stable knows me as well as it knows you, and obeys me better.”
“And my roses smell sweet to you, and my trees give you shade.”
“And,” continued Louis, “no caprice can withdraw these pleasures from
me; they are mine.”
He walked off. Tartar followed him, and Shirley remained standing on the
summer-house step. Caroline saw that her face was pale, as if her pride bled
inwardly.
“You see,” remarked Caroline apologetically, “his feelings are so often
hurt it makes him morose.”
“You see,” retorted Shirley, with ire, “he is a topic on which you and I
shall quarrel; so drop it.”
“I suppose he has more than once behaved in this way,” thought Caroline
to herself, “and that makes Shirley distant to him. Yet I wonder she cannot
make allowances. She is not often so inconsiderate, so irritable.”
Two friends of Caroline increased her favourable opinion of Louis
Moore. William Farren, whose cottage he had visited with Mr. Hall,
pronounced him a “real gentleman; to see how t’ bairns liked him, and how t’
wife took to him first minute she saw him. Them childer ha’ a keen sense i’
finding out folk’s natures.” And Mr. Hall stated that Louis Moore was the best
fellow he had met with since he left Cambridge.
“But he is so grave,” objected Caroline.
“Grave! the finest company in the world!” said Mr. Hall. “Full of odd,
quiet, out-of-the-way humour. Never enjoyed an excursion so much in my life
as the one I took with him to the Lakes. His understanding and tastes are so
superior, it does a man good to be with him; and his temper and nature are
fine.”
“At Fieldhead he looks gloomy.”
“Oh! I fancy he is rather out of place there. The Sympsons are good
people, but not the folks to comprehend him.”
“I don’t think Miss Keeldar likes him.”
“She doesn’t know him. She has sense enough to do justice to his merits.”
“Well, I suppose she doesn’t know him,” mused Caroline; but before long
she had to refuse Miss Keeldar even this excuse for her prejudice.
One day she chanced to be in the schoolroom with Henry Sympson, an
amiable and affectionate boy whom she liked. The boy was busied about some
mechanical contrivance, and began to ransack his tutor’s desk for a piece of
twine he needed for his work. Moore was absent, out walking with Mr. Hall.
Henry could not find what he wanted, though he rummaged in every
compartment; and at last, opening an inner drawer, he came upon a little bundle
of exercise-books, tied with tape. Henry looked at them.
“What rubbish Mr. Moore stores in his desk!” he said. “I hope he won’t
keep my old exercises so carefully.”
“What is it?”
“Old copy-books.” He threw the bundle to Caroline.
“If they are only copy-books, I suppose I may open them?”
“Oh, yes. Mr. Moore’s desk is half mine – he lets me keep all sorts of
things in it – and I give you leave.”
On scrutiny they proved to be French compositions, written in a peculiar
but exquisitely clear hand. Caroline recognized the writing without needing to
see the name signed at the end of every essay. Yet that name astonished her –
“Shirley Keeldar, Sympson Grove”, and a date four years back.
She tied up the packet, and held it, meditating. She half felt as if, in
opening it, she had violated a confidence.
“They are Shirley’s, you see,” said Henry carelessly.
“Did you give them to Mr. Moore? She wrote them with Mrs. Pryor, I
suppose?”
“She wrote them in my schoolroom at Sympson Grove, when she lived
with us there. Mr. Moore taught her French; it is his native language.”
“I know. Was she a good pupil, Henry?”
“She was a wild, laughing thing; she made lesson-time charming. She
learned fast. French was nothing to her. She spoke it as quick as Mr. Moore
himself.”
“Was she obedient? Did she give trouble?”
“She gave plenty of trouble, in a way. She was giddy, but I liked her. I’m
desperately fond of Shirley. She is the light of my eyes. I said so to Mr. Moore
last night.”
Caroline laughed. “He would reprove you for exaggerating.”
“He didn’t. He only smiled, and said that if Miss Keeldar was no more
than that, she was less than he took her to be; for I was but a short-sighted little
chap. I’m afraid I am a poor cripple, Miss Helstone, you know.”
“Never mind, Henry, you are a very nice little fellow; and God has given
you a good disposition and an excellent heart and brain.”
“I shall be despised. I sometimes think both Shirley and you despise me.”
“Listen, Henry. Generally, I don’t like schoolboys. They seem to me little
ruffians, who take an unnatural delight in killing and tormenting birds, and
whatever is weaker than themselves. But I like you. You have almost as much
sense as a man; you are fond of reading, and you can talk sensibly about what
you read.”
Miss Keeldar here entered.
“Henry,” she said, “I have brought your lunch. I shall prepare it myself.”
She placed on the table a glass of milk, a plate of something which looked
not unlike leather, and a toasting-fork.
“What are you two doing, ransacking Mr. Moore’s desk?” she asked.
“Looking at your old French copy-books,” returned Caroline. “Look here!
They must be considered precious; they are kept carefully.”
She showed the bundle. Shirley snatched it up. “Did not know one was in
existence,” she said. “I thought the whole lot had long since lit the kitchen fire.
What made you keep them, Henry?”
“I didn’t. It never entered my head. Mr. Moore put them in the inner
drawer of his desk. Perhaps he forgot them.”
“He forgot them, no doubt,” echoed Shirley. “They are extremely well
written,” she added complacently.
“What a giddy girl you were, Shirley, in those days! A slim, light creature
whom, though you were so tall, I could lift off the floor. I see you with your
long curls on your shoulders, and your streaming sash. You used to make Mr.
Moore lively – that is, at first. I believe you grieved him after a while.”
Shirley turned the closely-written pages and said nothing. Presently she
observed, “That was written one winter afternoon. It was a description of a
snow scene.”
“I remember,” said Henry. “Mr. Moore said it was well done. Afterwards
you made him draw the landscape you described. I can remember him sitting at
his easel, and you standing behind him, watching him draw the snowy cliff, the
pine, the deer lying under it, and the half-moon hung above.”
“Where are his drawings, Harry? Caroline should see them.”
“In his portfolio. But it is padlocked; he has the key.”
“Ask him for it when he comes in.”
“You should ask him, Shirley. You are shy of him now. You are grown a
proud lady to him; I notice that.”
“Shirley, you are a real enigma,” whispered Caroline in her ear. “What
queer discoveries I make day by day now! Even this boy reproves you.”
“I have forgotten old times, you see, Harry,” said Miss Keeldar,
answering young Sympson, and not heeding Caroline.
“Which you never should have done. You don’t deserve to be a man’s
morning star if you have so short a memory.”
“A man’s morning star, indeed! and by ‘a man’ is meant your worshipful
self, I suppose? Come, drink your milk.”
He rose and limped towards the fire.
“My poor lame darling!” murmured Shirley, in her softest voice.
“Do you like me or Mr. Sam Wynne best, Shirley?” inquired the boy, as
she settled him in an arm-chair.
“O Harry, Sam Wynne is my aversion; you are my pet.”
“Me or Mr. Malone?”
“You again, a thousand times.”
“Yet they are great whiskered fellows, six feet tall.”
“Have I not often told you who was almost as little, as pale, as suffering
as you, and yet as powerful as a giant and brave as a lion?”
“Admiral Horatio?”
“Admiral Horatio, Viscount Nelson; great at heart as a Titan; gallant and
heroic; commander of England’s navy, and hurler of her thunder over the
flood.”
“A great man. But I am not warlike, Shirley; and yet my mind is so
restless.”
“Harry, your mind is a captive. It is stronger and older than your frame.
But be patient. Study carefully not only books but the world. You love nature;
love her without fear. You will not be a soldier or a sailor, Henry; but – listen to
my prophecy – you will be an author, perhaps a poet.”
“An author! It is a flash of light to me! I will! I’ll write a book so that I
may dedicate it to you.”
“You will write it so that you may give your soul its natural release. Bless
me! what am I saying? more than I understand. Here is your toasted oatcake,
Hal; eat and live!”
“Willingly!” here cried a voice outside the open window. “Miss Keeldar,
may I come in and partake?”
It was Mr. Hall, and with him was Louis Moore, returned from their walk.
“There is a proper luncheon laid out in the dining-room,” said Shirley,
“with proper people seated round it. You may join them if you please; but if
your ill-regulated tastes lead you to prefer ill-regulated proceedings, step in
here.”
“I shall allow myself to be led by the nose,” returned Mr. Hall, who
entered along with Louis Moore. The latter’s eye fell on his desk.
“Burglars!” said he. “Henry, you deserve the cane.”
“Shirley and Caroline did it.”
“False!” cried both the girls. “We never laid hands on a thing, except in
the spirit of laudable inquiry!”
“Exactly so,” said Moore, with his rare smile. “And what have you
ferreted out?”
He perceived the inner drawer was open. “This is empty,” said he. “Who
has taken–”
“Here!” Caroline hastened to say, and she restored the little packet to its
place. He shut it up and locked it with a small key; he put the other papers in
order, closed the desk, and sat down without further remark.
“I thought you would have scolded much more, sir,” said Henry. “The
girls deserve reprimand.”
“I leave them to their own consciences.”
“If I had not been here, they would have ransacked your portfolio too; but
I told them it was padlocked.”
“And will you have lunch with us?” here interposed Shirley, wishing, it
seemed, to turn the conversation.
“Certainly, if I may.”
“You will be restricted to milk and Yorkshire oatcake.”
“Your oatcake!” He made a grimace.
“He cannot eat it,” said Henry. “He thinks it is like bran.”
“Come, then; we will allow him a few crackers.”
The hostess measured out the milk, and distributed the bread round the
cosy circle. She then took the post of toaster-general, kneeling on the rug, fork
in hand. Mr. Hall seemed in his best spirits: he talked and laughed gleefully.
Louis met him in congenial spirit. He did not laugh much, but he uttered in a
quiet tone the wittiest things. He proved to be excellent company. Caroline
marvelled at his self-possession, when the cool and lofty Miss Keeldar was
kneeling before the fire, almost at his feet.
But Shirley was not cool and lofty at this moment. She appeared not to
mind that she was waiting on her cousin’s tutor. When she offered him his
portion, Moore took it from her hand as calmly as if he had been her equal.
“You are overheated now,” he said; “let me relieve you.”
And he took the toasting-fork from her with a quiet authority, to which
she submitted passively.
“I should like to see your pictures, Louis,” said Caroline. “Would not you,
Mr. Hall?”
“To please you, I should; but, for my own part, I had enough of him
painting in Cumberland and Westmoreland. Many a wetting we got amongst the
mountains because he would persist in sitting on a camp-stool, catching effects
of rain-clouds, gathering mists, and what not.”
“Here is the portfolio,” said Henry.
Louis took it, and gave Shirley the key. “You spoiled the lock for me
once; try now.”
She opened it, and had the first view of every sketch herself. She enjoyed
the treat – if treat it were – in silence, without comment. Moore stood behind
her chair and looked over her shoulder, and when she had done and the others
were still gazing, he left his post and paced through the room.
A carriage was heard in the lane – the gate-bell rang. Shirley started.
“There are callers,” she said, “and I shall be summoned. A pretty figure to
receive company! Henry and I have been gathering fruit half the morning. Oh
for rest under my own vine and my own fig-tree! Happy is the slave-wife of the
Indian chief, who has no drawing-room duty to perform, but can sit at ease
weaving mats, and stringing beads, and peacefully flattening her pickaninny’s
head in an unmolested corner of her wigwam. I’ll emigrate.”
Louis Moore laughed. “To marry a White Cloud or a Big Buffalo, and to
devote yourself to the tender task of digging your lord’s maize-field while he
smokes his pipe.”
Shirley seemed about to reply, but here the schoolroom door opened to
admit Mr. Sympson. He looked aghast when he saw the group around the fire.
“I thought you were alone, Miss Keeldar,” he said, with a scandalized air.
“I find quite a party. The family from De Walden Hall are in the drawingroom.” And he bowed and withdrew.
“The Wynnes! Couldn’t be a worse set,” murmured Shirley. She sat still,
looking unwilling to stir, and flushed with the fire. Her dark hair was
dishevelled; wilful she looked, and singularly pretty – prettier than usual, as if
some soft inward emotion had given new bloom to her features.
“Shirley, Shirley, you ought to go,” whispered Caroline.
“If most of those present tell me to go, I will do my duty. Let those who
think I ought to go hold up their hands.”
The vote against her was unanimous.
“You must go,” said Mr. Hall, “and behave courteously too.”
Louis Moore added a low “Hear, hear!”
Caroline smoothed Shirley’s curls and tidied her clothing; she was sent
out of the room, pouting at her dismissal.
“There is a curious charm about her. And now I must away,” said Mr.
Hall. Caroline left too.
“Henry, get your books; it is lesson-time,” said Moore, sitting down to his
desk.
“A curious charm!” repeated the pupil. “True. Is Shirley not a kind of
white witch?”
“No irrelevant questions; study in silence.”
Mr. Moore looked and spoke sternly – sourly. Henry knew this mood. It
was rare; but when it came he was in awe of it. He obeyed.
↑

Chapter 27

THE FIRST BLUESTOCKING


Miss Keeldar and her uncle had characters that would not harmonize. He
was irritable, and she was spirited. He was despotic, and she liked freedom. He
was worldly, and she, perhaps, romantic.
He had come down to Yorkshire with a purpose. He anxiously desired to
have his niece married, to match her with a suitable husband, and wash his
hands of her for ever.
Unfortunately, Shirley and he had always disagreed on the meaning of the
word “suitable.” She had never yet accepted his definition; and it was doubtful
whether she would now.
The trial soon came. Mr. Wynne proposed on behalf of his son, Samuel
Wynne.
“Decidedly suitable!” pronounced Mr. Sympson. “A fine estate, real
substance, good connections. It must be done!”
He sent for his niece to the oak parlour; he communicated the offer; he
gave his opinion; he claimed her consent.
It was withheld.
“No; I shall not marry Samuel Wynne.”
“I ask why. I must have a reason. He is more than worthy of you.”
She stood on the hearth, pale as the white marble slab behind her; her
eyes flashed large, unsmiling.
“May I ask in what sense that young man is worthy of me?”
“He has twice your money, twice your common sense, and equal
respectability.”
“Had he a hundred times my money I would take no vow to love him.”
“Please state your objections.”
“He has been despicably profligate. Accept that as the first reason why I
spurn him.”
“Miss Keeldar, you shock me!”
“That conduct alone sinks him in a gulf of immeasurable inferiority. I
cannot esteem his intellect: there is a second stumbling-block. His views are
narrow, his feelings are blunt, his tastes are coarse, his manners vulgar.”
“He is a respectable, wealthy man! To refuse him is presumptuous.”
“I refuse point-blank! Cease to annoy me with the subject; I forbid it!”
“Is it your intention ever to marry; or do you prefer celibacy?”
“I deny your right to claim an answer to that question.”
“May I ask if you expect some peer of the realm to demand your hand?”
“I doubt if the peer breathes to whom I would give it.”
“I almost believe you are mad. Frantic and impractical girl! Take
warning! I dare you to sully our name by a mésalliance!”
“Our name! Am I called Sympson?”
“God be thanked that you are not! But be on your guard; I will not be
trifled with! Take care!”
“Why? What shadow of power have you over me? Why should I fear
you?”
“Take care, madam!” His voice and hand trembled alike.
“Scrupulous care I will take, Mr. Sympson. Before I marry I am resolved
to esteem – to admire – to love.”
“Preposterous stuff! Unwomanly!”
“To love with my whole heart. I know I speak in an unknown tongue; but
I feel indifferent whether you understand or not.”
“And if this love of yours should fall on a beggar?”
“I do not esteem begging.”
“On a low clerk, a play-actor, a play-writer, or – or a shabby, whining
artist?”
“For the shabby and whining I have no taste; for literature and the arts I
have. And Samuel Wynne cannot write a note without errors; he reads only a
sporting paper; he was the booby of Stilbro’ grammar school!”
“Unladylike language! Great God! to what will she come?” He lifted his
hands and eyes. “Why are not the laws more stringent, that I might compel her
to hear reason?”
“Console yourself, uncle. Were you the Czar, you could not compel me to
this step. I will write to Mr. Wynne. Give yourself no further trouble on the
subject.”
However, Mr. Wynne was not the only suitor. Miss Keeldar – or her
fortune – had by this time made a sensation in the district. No less than three
offers followed Mr. Wynne’s, all more or less eligible. All were in turn pressed
on her by her uncle, and all were refused. Yet amongst them was more than one
gentleman of respectable character as well as wealth. Many besides her uncle
asked whom she expected to entrap, so make her so insolently fastidious.
At last the gossips thought they had found the key to her conduct, and her
uncle was sure of it. The discovery altered his whole behaviour to his niece.
They had lately been at loggerheads. The aunt could not reconcile them;
the daughters froze at their quarrels, and became chilled with decorous dread if
they chanced to be alone with their audacious cousin. But then a change came.
Mr. Sympson was appeased and his family tranquillized.
The village of Nunnely had a hall, called the priory – an older, more
lordly house than any in Briarfield or Whinbury; and what is more, it had a
baronet, which neither Briarfield nor Whinbury could boast. The present
baronet, a young man who had hitherto lived in a distant province, was
unknown on his Yorkshire estate.
During Miss Keeldar’s stay at the fashionable watering-place of
Cliffbridge, she and her friends had been introduced to Sir Philip Nunnely.
They met him again on the sands, the cliffs, on walks, and sometimes at public
balls. He seemed unpretending; rather timid than proud, and glad of their
society.
With any unaffected person Shirley could easily make friends. She
walked and talked with Sir Philip; she and her aunt and cousins sometimes took
a sail in his yacht. She liked him because she found him kind and modest, and
was charmed that she had the power to amuse him.
One slight drawback there was: Sir Philip had a literary turn. He wrote
poetry – sonnets and ballads. Perhaps Miss Keeldar thought him a little too fond
of reciting these works; perhaps she wished them a little better written, a little
more original. At any rate, she always winced when he referred to his poems,
and tried to divert the conversation into another channel.
He would beguile her to take moonlight walks with him for the sole
purpose, it seemed, of pouring into her ear his longest ballads. He would lead
her away to lonely spots by the sea, and in the scented shade of gardens, with
tall cliffs rising behind them, he would pull out his latest batch of sonnets, and
read them in a voice tremulous with emotion. He did not seem to know that
though they might be rhyme, they were not poetry. It appeared, by Shirley’s
face, that she knew it, and felt heartily mortified by the single foible of this
good and amiable gentleman.
Often she tried gently to wean him from his fanatical worship of the
Muses. On all ordinary subjects he was sensible enough. He questioned her
sometimes about his place at Nunnely; she was happy to describe the area, and
advised him to visit his ancestral halls. Somewhat to her surprise, Sir Philip
followed her advice, and in late September, arrived at the priory.
He soon called at Fieldhead, and his first visit was not his last. He said
that under no roof had he found such pleasant shelter as beneath Fieldhead’s
massive oak beams; a cramped, modest dwelling compared with his own, but he
liked it.
Presently it was not enough to sit with Shirley in her panelled parlour; he
made parties for her to his own grounds, his glorious forest; and to remoter
scenes by the rivers Wharfe and Aire.
Shirley’s uncle foresaw the splendid time when he should be able to
allude nonchalantly to his “nephew the baronet.” Now his niece appeared to
him no longer “a mad girl,” but a “most sensible woman: peculiar, but very
clever.” He treated her with deference; he made mysterious jokes about the
superiority of woman’s wit over man’s wisdom; and remarked on the
generalship, the tactics, of “a person not a hundred miles from Fieldhead.” In
short, he was elated.
His niece received his innuendoes with composure, apparently not
understanding them. When charged with being preferred by the baronet, she
said she believed he did like her, and for her part she liked him. She had never
thought a man of rank could have so much goodness, and, on the whole, so
much sense.
Time proved, indeed, that Sir Philip liked her. He sought her presence
more and more. About this time strange feelings hovered round Fieldhead;
restless hopes and haggard anxieties haunted its rooms. There was a sense of
expectancy that kept the nerves strained.
One thing seemed clear: Sir Philip was not a man to be despised. If not
highly intellectual, he was intelligent. He was no Sam Wynne. As to his lineage
and wealth, both were, of course, far beyond Shirley’s.
His appearance, it is true, was boyish. His features were plain and slight,
his stature insignificant. But Shirley soon checked her merriment on this point;
she would even fire up if anyone was uncomplimentary about him. He had “a
pleasing countenance,” she affirmed; “and a good heart.” She still reserved a
rare shaft of sarcasm for his unfortunate poetry; but even here she would
tolerate no irony except her own.
In short, matters had reached a point which seemed fully to warrant an
observation made by Mr. Yorke to the tutor, Louis.
“That brother Robert of yours seems to me to be either a fool or a
madman. Two months ago I could have sworn he had the game all in his own
hands; and then he leaves the area and stays in London for weeks together, and
by the time he comes back he’ll find himself checkmated. Louis, I’d write to
Robert, if I were you, and tell him not to let his chances slip.”
“Robert had views on Miss Keeldar?” inquired Louis, as if the idea was
new to him.
“Views I suggested to him myself, for she liked him.”
“As a neighbour?”
“As more than that. I have seen her change colour at the mere mention of
his name. Write to the lad, I say, and tell him to come home. He is a finer
gentleman than this bit of a baronet.”
“Does it not strike you, Mr. Yorke, that for a penniless adventurer to
aspire to a rich woman’s hand is presumptuous – contemptible?”
“Oh, if you are for high notions, I’ve naught to say. I’m a plain, practical
man myself, and if Robert is willing to give up that royal prize to a puling slip
of aristocracy, I am quite agreeable. In his place I would have acted differently.
But you tutors are such solemn chaps; it is almost like speaking to a parson.”
Rumour had indeed ceased to couple Shirley’s name with that of Moore;
but it appeared that she had not forgotten him. That seemed proved by the
attention which a sudden attack of illness led her to show Robert’s tutorbrother, to whom she habitually behaved with strange alternations of cool
reserve and docile respect – now sweeping past him in all the dignity of the
moneyed heiress, and then accosting him as abashed school-girls accost their
stern professors.
Louis Moore had perhaps caught the fever in one of the poor cottages of
the district, which he and Mr. Hall had visited together. At any rate he sickened,
and was obliged to keep to his chamber.
He lay tossing on his bed one evening, with Henry by him, when there
was a light tap on the door.
“How is Mr. Moore tonight?” asked a low voice.
“Come in and see him yourself,” said Henry.
“Is he asleep?”
“I wish he could sleep. Come and speak to him, Shirley.”
“He would not like it.” But she stepped in, and Henry led her to the
couch.
The shaded light showed Miss Keeldar elegantly dressed. There was a
party assembled below, including Sir Philip Nunnely; the ladies were now in
the drawing-room, and their hostess had stolen from them to visit Henry’s tutor.
Her white dress glistened strangely amid the obscurity of the sickroom. She
looked chastened and pensive, and spoke gently.
“Mr. Moore, how are you tonight?”
“I have not been very ill, and am now better.”
“I heard that you complained of thirst. I have brought you some grapes;
can you taste one?”
“No; but I thank you for remembering me.”
“Just one.”
She offered a grape to his lips. He shook his head, and turned aside his
flushed face.
“But what can I bring you instead? What do you like to drink?”
“Mrs. Gill supplies me with toast-and-water.”
“I wonder what caused this fever? I hear you often visit the sick with Mr.
Hall. You should be on your guard.”
“That reminds me, Miss Keeldar, that perhaps you had better not enter
this chamber or come near this bed. I do not believe my illness is infectious, but
you should not run the risk. Leave me.”
“I will go soon; but I should like to do something for you before I depart
– any little service–”
“They will miss you below.”
“No; the gentlemen are still at table.”
“They will not linger long. Sir Philip Nunnely is no wine-drinker, and I
hear him walking to the drawing-room.”
 “Your hearing is acute.”
“It seems sharpened at present. Sir Philip was here to tea last night. I
heard you sing to him. When he left, I heard him call you outside, to look at the
evening star. I heard him kiss your hand.”
“Impossible!”
“No: my chamber is just above the front door; the window was open. You
stood ten minutes with him on the steps. I heard your discourse, every word.
Henry, give me some water.”
“Can I do nothing?” asked Shirley.
“Nothing; for you cannot guarantee me a night’s peaceful rest, and it is all
I want. Sleep has left me.”
“Yet you said you were not very ill?”
“I am often sleepless when well.”
“If I could, I would give you the most placid slumber – quite deep and
dreamless.”
“Blank annihilation! I do not ask that.”
“With dreams of all you most desire,” she added.
“Monstrous delusions! The sleep would be delirium, the waking death.”
“Your wishes are not so delusional.”
“Miss Keeldar, my character is not, perhaps, quite as legible to you as you
think.”
“Possibly. But I should like to help you sleep. If I took a book and read to
you? I can well spare half an hour. I would read softly.”
“It would not do. I am too feverish and excitable to bear a soft voice close
at my ear. You had better leave me.”
“Well, I will go.”
“And no good-night?”
“Yes, sir, yes. Mr. Moore, good-night.” (Exit Shirley.)
“Henry, my boy, go to bed now.”
“Give me your blessing, sir.”
“God bless you, my best pupil!”
“You never call me your dearest pupil!”
“No, nor ever shall.”
Miss Keeldar did not repeat the visit, nor again disturb the sickroom. A
sickroom, indeed, it soon ceased to be. In a few days Mr. Moore shook off his
illness, and resumed his duties as tutor. He still had his old teacher’s authority
over Shirley, as proved by the manner in which he sometimes put down her
high reserve with a firm, quiet hand.
One afternoon the Sympson family were gone out to take a carriage
airing. Shirley, never sorry to snatch a reprieve from their society, had remained
behind, detained by business, as she said. The business – a little letter-writing –
was soon done; and Miss Keeldar betook herself to the garden.
It was a peaceful autumn day; the russet woods were still full of leaf. The
purple heath-bloom, faded but not withered, tinged the hills. Fieldhead’s
gardens bore the seal of gentle decay. Yellow leaves had fluttered down on to
the walks; a few apples still enriched the trees. A blossom here and there
expanded pale and delicate amidst a knot of faded leaves.
These single flowers – the last of their race – Shirley culled as she
wandered thoughtfully amongst the beds. Henry Sympson called to her as he
came limping from the house.
“Shirley, Mr. Moore would be glad to see you in the schoolroom and to
hear you read a little French, if you have no more urgent occupation.”
“Did Mr. Moore tell you to say that?”
“Certainly; why not? Do come, and let us once more be as we were at
Sympson Grove. We used to have pleasant school-hours.”
Miss Keeldar perhaps thought that circumstances were changed since
then; however, she made no remark, but quietly followed Henry.
Entering the schoolroom, she inclined her head, as in former times, and
hung her bonnet beside Henry’s cap. Louis Moore sat at his desk, turning the
leaves of a book and marking passages with his pencil.
“You proposed to read to me a few nights ago,” said he. “I could not hear
you then, but I can now. A little renewed practice in French may profit you.
Your accent, I have observed, begins to rust.”
“What book shall I take?”
“Here are the posthumous works of St. Pierre. Read a few pages of the
‘Fragments de l’Amazone.’”
She accepted the chair which he had placed near his own; the volume lay
on his desk between them, but her sweeping curls dropped and hid the page
from him.
“Put back your hair,” he said.
For one moment Shirley looked not quite certain whether she would obey.
She glanced at the professor’s face. Perhaps if he had been looking at her
harshly or undecidedly she would have rebelled, and the lesson have ended; but
he was as calm and cool as marble. She threw the veil of hair behind her ear,
and began to read.
The language had become strange to her tongue; it faltered and stopped.
“I can’t do it. Read me a paragraph, if you please, Mr. Moore.”
What he read she repeated. She caught his accent in three minutes.
“Très bien,” was the approving comment. “You could not write French as
you once could, I dare say?”
“Oh no! I should make strange work of it now.”
“You could not compose the essay ‘La Première Femme Savante’?”
“Do you still remember that rubbish?”
“Every line.”
“I doubt you.”
“I will engage to repeat it word for word,” said he.
“You would stop short at the first line.”
“Challenge me.”
“I challenge you.”
He proceeded to recite the following. He gave it in French, but we must
translate, and also shorten it a little.
And it came to pass, when men began to multiply on the face of the earth,
and daughters were born unto them, that the sons of God saw the daughters of
men, that they were fair; and they took them wives of them.
This was in the dawn of time, an epoch so remote, so veiled in obscurity
that it evades perception and baffles research. It must suffice to know that the
world then existed; that men peopled it; that man’s nature, with its passions,
sympathies, pains, and pleasures, informed the planet and gave it soul.
A certain tribe colonized a certain spot on the globe; no sandy plain, nor
scant oasis, but a forest valley, with rocky sides and deep shade, formed by tree
crowding on tree. Here dwell human beings, but so few, and so hidden that they
are neither heard nor seen. Are they savage? Doubtless. They live by the crook
and the bow; half shepherds, half hunters. Are they happy? No, not more happy
than we are. Are they good? No, not better than ourselves. Their nature is our
nature.
There is one in this tribe too often miserable – an orphaned child. No-one
cares for her. She is fed sometimes, but oftener forgotten. The hollow tree and
chill cavern are her home. Forsaken and wandering, she lives more with the
wild beast and bird than with her own kind. Hunger and cold are her comrades,
and solitude besets her. Unheeded and unvalued, she should die; but she both
lives and grows. The gentle charm vouchsafed to flower and tree, bestowed on
deer and dove, nurtures the human child.
All solitary, she has sprung up straight and graceful. Nature cast her
features finely, in pure lines. Her form gleams ivory-white through the trees;
her hair flows long, and glossy; her eyes are full and dewy. Her forehead is a
clear, candid page, whereon knowledge might write a golden record. You see in
the desolate young savage nothing vicious or vacant. She haunts the wood
harmless and thoughtful, though of what one so untaught can think it is not easy
to guess.
On the evening of one summer day, before the Flood, being utterly alone,
she went up from the vale to watch Day take leave and Night arrive. A crag
overspread by a tree was her station. The oak roots, turfed and mossed, gave a
seat; the oak boughs, thick-leaved, wove a canopy.
Slow and grand the Day withdrew, passing in purple fire. Then Night
entered, quiet as death. The wind fell, the birds ceased singing. Now every nest
held happy mates, and hart and hind slumbered blissfully safe in their lair.
The girl sat, her body still, her soul astir; she felt the world, the sky, the
night, boundlessly mighty. Of all things herself seemed the centre – a small,
forgotten atom of life, a spark of soul, burning unmarked to waste in the heart
of a black hollow. She asked, was she thus to burn out and perish, her living
light doing no good, never seen, never needed? How could this be, she
demanded, when her life beat so true, and real, and potent; when something
within her stirred and restlessly asserted a God-given strength?
She gazed abroad on Heaven and Evening. Heaven and Evening gazed
back on her. She bent down, searching bank, hill, river, spread dim below.
Above her head she raised her hands.
“Guidance – help – comfort – come!” was her cry.
There was no answer.
She waited, kneeling, steadfastly looking up. Yonder sky was sealed; the
solemn stars shone alien and remote.
At last she thought Something above relented; she felt as if Something far
round drew nigher; she heard as if Silence spoke. There was no language, no
word, only a tone. A deep, soft sound, like a storm whispering, made twilight
undulate.
Once more, profounder, nearer, clearer, it rolled harmonious. A voice
passed between Heaven and Earth.
“Eva!”
“Here am I.”
“Eva!”
“O Night, I am here!”
The voice, descending, reached Earth.
“Eva!”
“Lord,” she cried, “behold thine handmaid!”
“I come – a Comforter!”
“Lord, come quickly!”
The Evening flushed full of hope; the Moon ascended large, but her light
showed no shape.
“Lean towards me, Eva. Enter my arms.”
“Thus I lean, O Invisible but felt! And what art thou?”
“Eva, I have brought a living draught from heaven. Daughter of Man,
drink of my cup!”
“I drink: it is as if sweetest dew visited my lips. My arid heart revives; my
affliction is lightened. And the night changes! the wood, the hill, the moon, the
wide sky – all change!”
“All change, and for ever. I take from thy vision darkness; I loosen thy
fetters! I take to myself the spark of soul until now forgotten!”
“O take me! O claim me! This is a god.”
“This is a son of God – one who feels himself in the life that stirs you. He
is suffered to reclaim his own and to aid it.”
“A son of God! Am I indeed chosen?”
“Thou only in this land. To me it is given to rescue, to sustain, to cherish
mine own. Acknowledge in me that Seraph on earth named Genius.”
“My glorious Bridegroom! All I would have at last I possess. I receive a
revelation. The dark hint, the obscure whisper, which have haunted me from
childhood, are interpreted. Thou art He I sought. Godborn, take me, thy bride!”
“Come again into the heaven whence thou wert sent.”
That Presence, invisible but mighty, gathered her in like a lamb to the
fold; that voice, soft but all-pervading, vibrated through her heart like music.
Her eye received no image; and yet she saw a vision of the majesty of marching
stars, the energy of colliding elements, the rooted endurance of hills; the lustre
of heroic beauty rushing victorious on the Night, vanquishing its shadows.
Such was the bridal hour of Genius and Humanity. Who shall rehearse the
tale of their after-union? Who shall depict its bliss and bale? Who shall record
the long strife between Serpent and Seraph: how the Father of Lies insinuated
evil into good, pride into wisdom, poison into passion? How the “dreadless
Angel” defied him, and refined the polluted cup, exalted the debased emotion –
purified, justified, watched, and withstood? How, by his patience, by his
strength, this faithful Seraph fought for Humanity a good fight through time;
and, when Time’s course closed, and Death was encountered at the end, how
Genius still held close his dying bride, sustained her through the agony of the
passage, bore her triumphant into his own home, Heaven; restored her to
Jehovah, her Maker; and at last crowned her with the crown of Immortality?
Who shall of these things write the chronicle?
“I never could correct that composition,” observed Shirley, as Moore
concluded. “Your censor-pencil scored it with condemnatory lines, which I
could not understand.”
She had taken a crayon from the tutor’s desk, and was drawing little
leaves on the margin of the book.
“French may be half forgotten, but the habits of your French lesson are
retained, I see,” said Louis. “Miss Keeldar, her mark on every page.”
Shirley dropped her crayon as if it burned her fingers.
“Tell me, what were the faults of that essay?” she asked. “Were they
grammatical errors, or did you object to the substance?”
“I never said that the lines I drew were indications of faults at all. You
assumed it.”
“What else did they mean?”
“No matter now.”
“Mr. Moore,” cried Henry, “make Shirley repeat some of the pieces she
used to say so well by heart.”
“If I ask for any, it will be ‘Le Cheval Dompté,’” said Moore.
She turned aside her head; the neck and cheek flushed warm.
“Ah! she has not forgotten, you see, sir,” said Henry, exultant. “She
knows how naughty she was.”
A smile made Shirley’s lip tremble; she bent her face, and hid it half in
her curls, which fell loose again. “Certainly I was a rebel,” she answered.
“A rebel!” repeated Henry. “Yes; you and papa had quarrelled terribly,
and you defied both him and mamma. You said he had insulted you–”
“He had insulted me,” interposed Shirley.
“And you wanted to leave Sympson Grove directly. You packed your
things, and papa threw them out of your trunk; mamma and Mrs. Pryor cried,
and begged you to be patient; and you knelt on the floor with your things in one
of your passions. Your features, in such passions, are quite beautiful. You
scarcely look angry, only resolute, and in haste; yet one feels that at such times
an obstacle cast across your path would be split with lightning. Papa lost heart,
and called Mr. Moore.”
“Enough, Henry.”
“No, it is not enough. I hardly know how Mr. Moore managed, except
that I recollect he spoke quietly to papa and the ladies, and got them away; and
afterwards he said to you, Miss Shirley, that it was of no use lecturing now, but
that the tea-things were just brought into the schoolroom, and he was very
thirsty, and he would be glad if you would leave your packing for the present
and come and make a cup of tea for him and me. You came; you would not talk
at first, but soon you softened. Mr. Moore began to tell us about the Continent,
the war, and Bonaparte – subjects we were both fond of listening to. After tea
he said we should neither of us leave him that evening, lest we should again get
into mischief. I never passed so pleasant an evening. The next day he gave you,
missy, a lecture of an hour, and wound it up by telling you to learn ‘Le Cheval
Dompté.’ You learned it instead of packing, Shirley. We heard no more of your
running away.”
“She never said a lesson with greater spirit,” added Moore. “She for the
first time gave me the treat of hearing my native tongue spoken without accent
by an English girl.”
“She was as sweet as summer cherries for a month afterwards,” struck in
Henry: “a good hearty quarrel always improved Shirley’s temper.”
“You talk of me as if I were not present,” observed Miss Keeldar.
“Are you sure you are present?” asked Moore. “At times since my arrival
here, I have been tempted to ask the lady of Fieldhead if she knew what had
become of my former pupil.”
“She is here now.”
“I see her, and humble enough; but I would advise neither Harry nor
others to believe too much in the humility which one moment can hide its
blushing face like a modest little child, and the next lift it pale and lofty as a
marble Juno.”
“One man in times of old, it is said, gave life to the statue he had
chiselled,” answered Shirley; “others may have the contrary gift of turning flesh
to marble.”
Moore paused to turn this observation over in his mind.
“You mean,” he said at last, “that some men inspire repugnance, and so
chill the kind heart.”
“Ingenious!” responded Shirley. “If the interpretation pleases you, you are
welcome to hold it valid. I don’t care.”
And with that she raised her head, lofty and statue-like, as Louis had
described it.
“Behold the metamorphosis!” he said. “But Henry must not be
disappointed of his recitation. Let us begin.”
“I have forgotten the first line.”
“I have not. My memory, if slow, is retentive. I acquire only gradually
both knowledge and liking, but both prove lasting. Attention, Henry! Miss
Keeldar consents to favour you. It begins, ‘Voyez ce cheval ardent et
impétueux.’”
Miss Keeldar began; but she soon stopped.
“Unless I hear it I cannot continue it,” she said.
“Yet it was quickly learned – soon gained, soon gone,” said the tutor. He
recited the passage with slow, impressive emphasis.
Shirley listened. When he ceased, she took the word up as if from his lips;
she took his very tone; she reproduced his manner, his pronunciation, his
expression.
“Now say ‘Le Songe d’Athalie,’” she entreated.
He said it for her. She took it from him, finding lively excitement in
making his language her own. She asked for more; the old school pieces were
revived.
He went through some of the best passages of Racine and Corneille, and
heard the echo of his own deep tones in the girl’s voice, that modulated itself
faithfully on his. Their enthusiasm had kindled to a glow, which the slight fuel
of French poetry no longer sufficed to feed; perhaps they longed for a trunk of
English oak to be thrown on the flame.
Moore observed, “And these are our best pieces! We have nothing more
dramatic or natural.” And then he smiled and was silent. He stood on the hearth,
leaning his elbow on the mantelpiece, serenely alight.
Twilight was closing on the autumn day. The schoolroom windows
admitted scarce a gleam of sky; but the fire gave light enough to talk by.
And now Louis Moore addressed his pupil in French, and she answered at
first with laughing hesitation and in broken phrase. Moore encouraged and
corrected her. Henry joined in the lesson, his arm round Shirley’s waist. The
group was happy, until the dull, rumbling sound of wheels was heard outside in
the yard.
“It is the carriage,” said Shirley; “and I am not dressed for dinner.”
A servant came in with Mr. Moore’s candle and tea. “Mr. Sympson and
the ladies are returned,” she said, “and Sir Philip Nunnely is with them.”
“How you did start, Shirley!” said Henry, when the maid had gone. “But I
know why – don’t you, Mr. Moore? I know what papa intends. He is a little
ugly man, that Sir Philip. I wish he had not come. Shirley should have made tea
for you and me, Mr. Moore, and we would have had a happy evening.”
Moore was locking up his desk. “That was your plan, was it, my boy?”
“Don’t you approve it, sir?”
“I approve nothing utopian. Look Life in its iron face; stare Reality out of
its brassy countenance. Make the tea, Henry; I shall be back in a minute.”
He left the room; so did Shirley, by another door.
↑

Chapter 28

PHOEBE


Shirley probably got on pleasantly with Sir Philip that evening, for the
next morning she came down in one of her best moods.
“Isabella and Gertrude, will you take a walk with me?” she asked after
breakfast. So rare was such an invitation from Miss Keeldar that the cousins
hesitated before they fetched their bonnets.
It did not suit these three young persons to be thrown much together. Miss
Keeldar liked the society of few ladies, apart from Mrs. Pryor and Caroline. She
was civil and kind to her cousins; but she usually had little to say to them. In
her sunny mood this morning, she contrived to entertain even the Misses
Sympson with the sparkle of her spirit.
What made her so joyous? The day was dim and waning. The walks
through the woods were damp; the sky was overcast; and yet Shirley’s heart
seemed light and sunny.
As they neared Fieldhead on their return, she delayed behind her cousins
to give some directions to her foreman, John,. She re-entered the house perhaps
twenty minutes after them. She excused herself from luncheon, and went
upstairs.
“Is not Shirley coming to luncheon?” asked Isabella. “She said she was
hungry.”
An hour after, one of her cousins went to seek her in her chamber. She
was sitting at the foot of the bed, her head resting on her hand; she looked quite
pale, very thoughtful, almost sad.
“You are not ill?”
“A little sick,” replied Miss Keeldar. Certainly she was changed from
what she had been two hours before.
But this change soon seemed to pass like a light summer cloud. When she
joined her friends at dinner, she talked as usual. She remained with them during
the evening, and declared herself perfectly recovered. It had been a mere
passing faintness, not worth a thought; yet it was felt there was a difference in
Shirley.
The next day – the day, the week, the fortnight after – this new peculiar
shadow lingered on her face. A strange quietude settled over her look and
voice. The alteration was not marked; yet it was there, and it would not pass
away. It hung over her like a cloud – but to mention it annoyed her. She
declared with hauteur that she was not ill.
“Had anything happened to affect her spirits?”
She scornfully ridiculed the idea. “What did they mean? She had no
spirits to affect.”
“Something must be the matter – she was so altered.”
“She supposed she had a right to alter.” And she peremptorily requested
to be let alone.
Then she would make every effort to appear gay, and she seemed
indignant at herself if she could not perfectly succeed. Brief self-spurning
epithets burst from her lips when alone. “Fool! Coward!” she would say, “if
you must tremble, tremble in secret! How dare you betray your imbecile
anxieties? Shake them off; rise above them – or else hide them.”
And to hide them she did her best. She became resolutely lively in
company. When weary of effort, she sought the wild solitude on Zoë, her mare.
She took long rides of half a day. Her uncle disapproved, but he dared not
remonstrate, for her anger alarmed him.
Yet she still maintained, “I am perfectly well; I have no ailment.”
And health, indeed, she must have had, to withstand the weather she now
encountered. Wet or fair, calm or storm, she took her daily ride over Stilbro’
Moor, Tartar untiring at her side.
The eyes of gossips – those eyes which are everywhere – noticed two or
three times that instead of turning back from the top of Stilbro’ Moor, she rode
forwards all the way to the town. She was seen to alight at the door of a
solicitor. Some people affirmed that Miss Keeldar was involved in business
speculations connected with Hollow’s Mill – that she had lost money, and was
forced to mortgage her land. Others guessed that she was going to be married,
and that settlements were being prepared.
Mr. Moore and Henry Sympson were together in the schoolroom.
“Henry, make haste. Are you nearly ready with that lesson?”
“No. I have not construed a line.”
Mr. Moore looked up. The boy’s tone was rather peculiar.
“If the task presents difficulties, Henry, bring them to me. We will work
together.”
“Mr. Moore, I can do no work.”
“My boy, you are ill.”
“No, sir, but my heart is full.”
“Shut the book. Come here, Harry, to the fireside.”
Harry limped forward. His tutor placed him in a chair; his lips were
quivering, his eyes brimming. He bent down his head, and wept.
“Harry? You have a grief; tell it me.”
“Sir, I have such a grief as I never had before: I can hardly bear it.”
“Well, let us talk it over. What is the cause?”
“The cause, sir, is Shirley. Everyone thinks her changed – you too, Mr.
Moore.”
“Not seriously, no. Besides, she says she is well.”
“There it is, sir. As long as she said she was well, I believed her. But
now–”
“Has she said anything to you? You and she were together in the garden
for two hours this morning. My dear Harry, if Miss Keeldar has said she is ill,
and enjoined you to keep her secret, do not obey her. For her life’s sake, speak,
my boy. What have you learned?”
“I have learned that she has just made her will.”
“Made her will?”
The tutor and pupil were silent.
“She told you that?” asked Moore, after some minutes.
“She told me quite cheerfully. She said I was the only person besides her
solicitor, and Mr. Helstone and Mr. Yorke, who knew anything about it; and
she wished specially to explain its provisions to me.”
“Go on, Harry.”
“‘Because,’ she said, looking down on me with her beautiful eyes – oh!
they are beautiful, Mr. Moore! I love them! I love her! She is my star! Heaven
must not claim her!”
“Henry Sympson, go on when I tell you.”
“‘Because,’ she said, ‘if I made no will, and died before you, Harry, all
my property would go to you; and I do not intend that it should be so. You,’ she
said, ‘will have your father’s whole estate, which is larger than Fieldhead. Your
sisters will have nothing; so I have left them some money, though I do not love
them half so much as I love one lock of your fair hair.’ She called me her
‘darling,’ and let me kiss her. She went on to tell me that she had left Caroline
Helstone some money too; that this manor house she had bequeathed to me; and
that all the rest of her property, amounting to about twelve thousand pounds,
she had willed to a good man, who would make the best use of it – a man, she
said, that was both gentle and brave, strong and merciful – a man that might not
claim to be pious, but who had the spirit of love and peace with him. He visited
the fatherless and widows, and kept himself unspotted from the world. Then she
asked, ‘Do you approve, Harry?’ I could not answer. My tears choked me, as
they do now.”
Mr. Moore allowed his pupil a moment to master his emotion. He then
demanded, “What else did she say?”
“When I approved her will, she told me I was a generous boy, and she
was proud of me. ‘And now,’ she added, ‘in case anything should happen, you
will know what to say to Malice when it insinuates that Shirley has wronged
you, that she did not love you. You will know that I did love you, Harry; no
sister could have loved you better.’ Mr. Moore, sir, when I remember her voice,
my heart beats as if it would break. She may go to heaven before me; but the
rest of my life – and my life will not be long, I am glad of that now – shall be a
straight journey in her footsteps. I thought to enter the vault of the Keeldars
before her. Otherwise, lay my coffin by her side.”
Moore answered him with a weighty calm. “You are wrong, both of you –
you harm each other in imagining calamity.”
“But, Mr. Moore, you smile.”
“My boy, I am neither nervous, nor poetic, nor inexperienced. I see things
as they are. Come, you are neither of you going to heaven yet. I have the best
hopes of you both – a pair of half-fledged eaglets. Now, what is your inference
from all you have told me?”
“That Shirley thinks she is going to die.”
“She referred to her health?”
“Not once; she never complains to anyone; but she is grown quite thin.”
“Do you know where she is now, Henry? Is she riding out?”
“Surely not, sir. It rains fast.”
“That is no guarantee that she is not cantering over Rushedge. Lately she
has never permitted the weather to stop her rides.”
“You remember, Mr. Moore, how wet and stormy it was last Wednesday
– so wild, indeed, that she would not permit Zoë to be saddled? Yet she herself
faced the blast on foot; that afternoon she walked nearly as far as Nunnely. I
asked her, when she came in, if she was not afraid of taking cold. ‘Not I,’ she
said. ‘It would be too much good luck for me. The best thing that could happen
to me would be to take a good cold and fever, and so pass away like other
Christians.’ She is reckless, you see, sir.”
“Reckless indeed! Go and find out where she is, and request her to come
here.”
“Yes, sir.” He started up.
“Harry! Do not deliver the message formally. Make it sound like an
ordinary summons to the schoolroom. And, Harry–”
“Sir?”
“Till I call you, you are excused from lessons.”
Henry departed. Mr. Moore, left alone, rose from his desk.
“I can be very cool with Henry,” he said. “I can seem to make light of his
apprehensions, and speak as if, in my eyes, they were both children. Let me see
if I can keep up the same role with her. At times I have seemed about to forget
it, when my tongue faltered, and I stood in her presence, not master – no – but
something else. I trust I shall never so play the fool. A Philip Nunnely may
redden when he meets her eye, and let his hand tremble when it touches hers;
but I will not. So far I have done very well. She has sat near me, and I have not
shaken. I have encountered her looks and smiles like a tutor. I am poor, and
must not compromise an inch of my self-respect. What did she mean by that
allusion to cold people who turn flesh to marble? It pleased me – I hardly know
why. A strange, secret ecstasy steals through my veins at moments, but I’ll not
encourage it. I shall stay sober.”
He paused, listening.
“Will she come, or not? If she comes, what shall I say to her? How shall I
explain the request? Shall I apologize to her? I must keep up the role of
professor, otherwise – I hear a door.”
He waited. Many minutes passed.
“Henry is entreating her to come; she declines. My request is
presumptuous in her eyes. I would prefer her proud; it will steel me. Her scorn
startles me from my dreams; her sarcastic look puts strength into every nerve I
have. A step approaches.”
The door unclosed; Miss Keeldar came in. She carried her needlework
and wore her neat indoor dress and silk apron, a quiet domestic character from
the fireside.
Mr. Moore had the advantage. He should have addressed her at once in
solemn accents. Perhaps he would have, had she been saucy; but she looked
down with youthful shyness. The tutor stood silent.
“Did you want me, sir?” she asked.
“I ventured, Miss Keeldar, to ask an interview of a few minutes.”
“Well, sir” (not lifting her eyes), “what about?”
“Be seated. The subject I would broach is one of some moment. Perhaps I
have hardly a right to approach it. The liberty I have taken arises from a
conversation with Henry. The boy is unhappy about your health. It is of your
health I would speak.”
“I am quite well,” she said briefly.
“Yet changed.”
“That matters to none but myself. We all change.”
“Will you sit down? Formerly, Miss Keeldar, I had some influence with
you: have I any now?”
“Let me read some French, Mr. Moore, and proclaim a truce to all
discussions of health.”
“No, no. It is time there were discussions.”
“Discuss away, then, but do not choose me for your text. I am healthy. I
have neither cough, pain, nor fever.”
“Is that the truth?” Louis Moore looked at her earnestly. “Why, then, are
you altered?”
“Am I altered?”
“Let us see. In the first place, do you sleep as you used to?”
“I do not; but not because I am ill.”
“Have you the appetite you once had?”
“No; but not because I am ill.”
“You remember this little ring fastened to my watch-chain? It was my
mother’s, and you have many a time playfully tried it on. It fitted your forefinger. Try now.”
She tried. The ring dropped from the wasted little hand. Louis picked it
up; an uneasy flush coloured his brow.
Shirley again said, “It is not because I am ill.”
“Not only have you lost sleep, appetite, and flesh,” proceeded Moore,
“but your spirits are low. There is a nervous disquiet in your manner, which was
not there before.”
“Mr. Moore, you have exactly hit it. I am nervous. Now, talk of
something else. What wet weather we have!”
“If you are nervous, it is not without a cause. But the ailment is not
physical. It came in one moment. I noticed the change. Your pain is mental. I
wish you would speak willingly. I believe confession would be half a cure.”
“No,” said Shirley abruptly. “I am afraid it would not.”
She was now seated. Resting her elbow on the table, she leaned her head
on her hand. Mr. Moore felt he had at last gained some footing in this difficult
path. She was serious, and could no longer affirm that nothing ailed her.
He allowed her some minutes for reflection. Once his lips moved to
speak, but he thought better of it. Shirley lifted her eye to his; he looked calm,
strong, trustworthy.
“I had better tell you than my aunt,” she said, “or my cousins, or my
uncle. They would all make such a bustle, and I dread that. You can bear a little
shock?”
“A great one, if necessary.”
Not a muscle of the man’s frame moved, and yet his large heart beat fast
in his deep chest. What was she going to tell him?
“Had I thought it right to go to you,” she said, “I would have told you at
once, and asked advice.”
“Why was it not right to come to me?”
“It might be right; but I could not do it. The mishap concerned me only. I
wanted to keep it to myself. I tell you, I hate to be an object of worrying
attention. Besides, it may pass away without result – God knows!”
Moore, though tortured with suspense, betrayed no impatience. His
tranquillity tranquillized Shirley; his confidence reassured her.
“Great effects may spring from trivial causes,” she remarked, as she
loosened a bracelet from her wrist, unfastened her sleeve, and turned it up.
“Look here, Mr. Moore.”
She showed a mark in her white arm – a deep though healed indentation –
something between a burn and a cut.
“Small as that mark is, it has taken my sleep away, and made me nervous,
thin, and foolish; because of it, I am obliged to look forward to a terrifying
possibility.”
The sleeve was readjusted, the bracelet replaced.
“I am a patient man,” he said, smiling, “but my pulse is quickening. Tell
me the tale.”
“It is a very short tale. I took a walk with Isabella and Gertrude, about
three weeks ago. They reached home before me; I stayed behind to speak to
John. Then I lingered in the lane, for I was in no hurry to rejoin the girls. As I
stood leaning against the gate-pillar, thinking some very happy thoughts about
my future – for that morning I imagined that events were beginning to turn as I
had long wished them to turn–”
“Ah! Nunnely had been with her the evening before!” thought Moore.
“I heard a panting sound; a dog came running up the lane. It was Phœbe,
one of Mr. Sam Wynne’s pointers. The poor creature ran with her head down,
her tongue hanging out; she looked as if bruised and beaten. Mr. Sam often
flogs his pointers cruelly. I called her. I meant to coax her into the house and
give her some dinner. But when I attempted to pat her head, she turned and
snatched at my arm, and bit it so as to draw blood, then ran panting on. Directly
after, Mr. Wynne’s keeper came up, carrying a gun. He asked if I had seen a
dog. I told him I had seen Phœbe.
“‘You had better chain up Tartar, ma’am,’ he said, ‘and keep within the
house. I am after Phœbe to shoot her. She is raging mad with rabies.’”
Mr. Moore leaned back in his chair and folded his arms. “And you told no
one, sought no help? You would not come to me?”
“I got as far as the schoolroom door; there my courage failed.”
“Why? What can I demand better in this world than to be of use to you?”
“I had no claim.”
“Monstrous! And you did nothing?”
“Yes. I walked straight into the laundry, where they were ironing. While
the maid was busy, I took an iron from the fire, and applied the glowing tip to
my arm. I bored it well in. It cauterized the little wound. Then I went upstairs.”
“I dare say you never once groaned?”
“I am sure I don’t know. I was very miserable. There was no calm in my
mind.”
“There was calm in your person. I remember listening the whole time we
sat at luncheon, to hear if you moved in the room above. All was quiet.”
“I was sitting at the foot of the bed, wishing Phœbe had not bitten me.”
“And alone. You like solitude, and disdain sympathy. You must feel
independent of help, of advice.”
“So be it, since it pleases you.” She smiled and bent to her embroidery,
but her eyelash glittered, and a drop fell.
Mr. Moore leaned forward on his desk.
“If it is not so,” he asked, with a peculiar, mellow change in his voice,
“how is it, then?”
“I don’t know.”
“You do know, but you won’t speak. All must be locked up in yourself,
because nobody can give the high price you require for your confidence.
Nobody has the honour, the intellect, the power you demand in your adviser.
There is not a shoulder in England on which you would rest your hand for
support. Of course you must live alone.”
“I can live alone, if need be. But the question is not how to live, but how
to die alone. That strikes me in a more grisly light.”
“You fear the effects of the virus? You anticipate a dreadful doom? You
are very nervous and womanish.”
“You complimented me two minutes since on my powerful mind.”
“If the affair were coolly examined, I feel sure it would turn out that there
is no danger at all. Do you truly expect that you will be seized with
hydrophobia, and die raving mad?”
“I expect it, and have feared it. Just now I fear nothing.”
“Nor do I. I doubt whether the smallest particle of virus mingled with
your blood; and if it did, let me assure you that, young and healthy as you are,
no harm will ensue. For the rest, I shall inquire whether the dog was really mad.
I expect she was not.”
“Tell nobody that she bit me,” Shirley begged.
“Make yourself easy. I am easy, though I value your life as much as I do
my own soul. Look up – I wish to see if you are cheered. Put your work down;
raise your head. Thank you. Is the cloud broken?”
“I fear nothing.”
“Is your mind restored to its natural sunniness?”
“Yes; but I want your promise,” she said. “If the worst should happen, my
uncle will be full of horror and weakness. Nobody in the house will be selfpossessed but you. Now promise to befriend me – to keep Mr. Sympson away
from me, not to let Henry come near, lest I should hurt him. Mind – mind that
you take care of yourself too. But I shall not injure you; I know I shall not.
Lock the chamber door against the surgeons; let them not lay a finger on me;
and lastly, if I give trouble, with your own hand administer to me such a sure
dose of laudanum as shall leave no mistake. Promise to do this.”
Moore left his desk, and walked around the room. Stopping behind
Shirley’s chair, he bent over her, and said, in a low, emphatic voice, “I promise
all you ask, without reservation.”
“If female help is needed, call in my housekeeper, Mrs. Gill. Let her lay
me out if I die. She is attached to me, and I can trust her integrity and courage.
But keep my good aunt and my timid cousins away. Once more, promise.”
“I promise.”
“That is good in you,” she said, looking up at him, and smiling.
“Does it comfort you?”
“Very much. Do you think me childish?”
“I do.”
“Ah! I am not so strong as people think, Mr. Moore; nor am I so
regardless of sympathy. But when I have any grief, I fear to impart it to those I
love. You should not taunt me with being childish, for if you were as unhappy
as I have been for the last three weeks, you too would want some friend.”
“We all want a friend, do we not? You have Caroline Helstone.”
“And you have Mr. Hall.”
“Yes. Mrs. Pryor is a wise, good woman. She can counsel you when you
need counsel.”
“For your part, you have your brother Robert, and your sister Hortense.”
“It appears we are both well provided.”
“It appears so.”
“How thankful and contented we ought to be!” commented Moore.
“Yes.”
“For my part, I am almost contented just now, and very thankful.”
Still leaning on the back of Miss Keeldar’s chair, Moore watched her
sewing. After a pause, he asked, “Is the shadow quite gone?”
“Wholly. I believe, Mr. Moore, griefs and fears nursed in silence grow
like Titan infants.”
“You will cherish such feelings no more in silence?”
“Not if I dare speak to you. But you are austere and shy, because you are
proud. Why are you proud?”
“Perhaps because I am poor, for one reason,” said he. “Poverty and pride
often go together.”
“That is such a nice reason. I should be charmed to discover another that
would pair with it.”
“What do you think of marrying sober Poverty to Caprice?”
“Are you capricious?”
“You are.”
“A libel,” responded she. “I am steady as a rock, fixed as the polar star.”
“In the morning I look out and see a fine, perfect rainbow, bright with
promise. Yet it is broken and faded within an hour. Later still, the stern sky
denies that it ever wore so benign a symbol of hope.”
“Well, Mr. Moore, you should contend against these changeful moods.
They are your besetting sin.”
“Miss Keeldar, I had once, for two years, a pupil who grew very dear to
me. Henry is dear, but she was dearer, although she vexed me twenty-three
hours out of the twenty-four–”
“She was never with you more than three hours at a time.”
“She sometimes stole the food from my plate; and when she had kept me
unfed for a day, she robbed these dishes of flavour, and made a fool of me
besides. I used to sleep well. She changed all this.”
“Mr. Moore–”
“And having taken from me peace of mind, she took from me herself –
quite coolly, just as if the world would be all the same to me without her. After
two years, we met again under her own roof. How do you think she behaved
towards me, Miss Keeldar?”
“Like one who had learned well from you.”
“She received me haughtily. She kept me aloof by the reserved gesture,
the rare and alienated glance, the word calmly civil.”
“She was an excellent pupil! Having seen you distant, she at once learned
to withdraw.”
“Conscience and honour dragged me apart from her with ponderous
fetters. She was free: she might have been merciful.”
“Never free to seek where she had been shunned.”
“Then she was inconsistent; she tantalized. She would suddenly show me
such a glimpse of loving simplicity – she would speak so gently, so kindly –
that I could not shut her image out of my heart. Explain why she distressed me
so.”
“She could not bear to be quite outcast,” said Shirley; “and on a cold day
she would sometimes feel she ought to go and see if you and Henry had a good
fire in the schoolroom; and once there, she liked to stay.”
“Tomorrow you will not be as you are today. We may give one day to
dreaming, but the next we must awake; and I shall awake to purpose the
morning you are married to Sir Philip Nunnely. I see us very clearly in the
mirror, Miss Keeldar; and I have been gazing on the picture all the time I have
been talking. What a difference between your head and mine! I look old for
thirty!”
“You are so grave, I never regard you as a young man, nor as Robert’s
junior.”
“I thought not.” He started as the dinner-bell rang; and Shirley rose.
“Mr. Moore,” she said, as she gathered up her silks, “have you heard from
your brother lately? Do you know why he stays in town so long? Does he talk
of returning?”
“He talks of returning; but what has caused his long absence I cannot tell.
To speak the truth, I thought none knew better than yourself why he was
reluctant to come home.”
A crimson shadow passed across Miss Keeldar’s cheek.
“Write to him and urge him to come,” she said. “He must not abandon the
county.”
“I am aware,” said Louis, “that he had an interview with you the evening
before he left. He turned from me afterwards, and I guessed that he would be
long away. I suppose Robert put too much trust in his manly beauty and
gentlemanhood. But I will write, and say you advise his return.”
“Do not say I advise his return, but that his return is advisable.”
The bell rang again, and Miss Keeldar obeyed its call.
↑

Chapter 29

LOUIS MOORE


Louis Moore was used to a quiet life. Having a large world in his own
head and heart, he tolerated confinement to a small, still corner of the real world
very patiently.
How hushed is Fieldhead this evening! All but Moore are gone to
Nunnely. Sir Philip wished them to meet his mother and sisters, who are now at
the priory. The kind baronet asked the tutor too; but the tutor would rather have
arranged to meet a ghost in the middle of Nunnely forest.
This night is not calm, although the wild rains have abated. The sky is
tossed by a high-rushing moonlight tempest. The moon reigns glorious, glad of
the gale, as if she gave herself to his fierce caress with love.
Moore, sitting in the schoolroom, hears the storm roar along the hallfront. He wants no shelter; he desires no subdued sounds.
“I am sick at heart of this cell,” says he.
He leaves it, and goes where the windows, larger than those in his
apartment, admit the sweeping vision of the autumn night-sky. He carries no
candle; moonbeams shine on every floor and wall.
Moore wanders through all the rooms. He seems following a phantom
from parlour to parlour. In the oak room he stops. This is not chill and fireless
like the salon. The hearth is hot and ruddy; the cinders tinkle in the intense heat;
near the rug is a little work-table, a desk and a chair.
Does the vision Moore has tracked occupy that chair? You would think
so, if you could see him standing before it with interest in his eye.
He makes discoveries. A small satin bag hangs on the chair-back. The
desk is open, the keys are in the lock. A pretty seal, a silver pen, a crimson
berry or two on a green leaf, a small, clean glove – these trifles at once decorate
and disarrange the picture.
Moore spoke.
“Her mark,” he said. “Here she has been – careless, attractive thing! –
called away in haste, and forgetting to put all to rights. Why does she leave
fascination in her footprints? She is heedless – there is always something to
chide in her, but she never offends. Any reprimand from her lover or her
husband would naturally melt from his lips in a kiss. Better pass half an hour in
remonstrating with her than a day in praising any other woman alive. Am I
muttering? Stop that.”
He did stop it. He stood thinking, and then he closed the curtains. He
added fuel to the fire; he lit a candle, and placed another chair at the desk; and
he sat down.
Taking from his pocket a small notebook and a pencil, he began to write
in a cramped, compact hand. Come near, reader. Stoop over his shoulder, and
read as he scribbles.
“It is nine o’clock; the carriage will not return before eleven. Freedom is
mine till then; I may occupy her room, with her little mementoes about me.
“I used rather to like Solitude. I once could court Solitude serenely, and
imagine my heart easier when I found her – mute, but majestic.
“Since that day I called S. to me in the schoolroom, and she came and sat
so near my side; since she opened the trouble of her mind to me, asked my
protection, appealed to my strength – since that hour I abhor Solitude. Cold
mate of Death!
“It is pleasant to write about her. Through this pencil I can say what I will
– say what I dare not even think aloud.
“We have scarcely encountered each other since that evening. Once,
when I was alone in the drawing-room, she entered, dressed for a concert at
Stilbro’. Her shyness drew a silver veil between us. Much triteness have I heard
and read about ‘maiden modesty,’ but used properly, the words are good. A
delicate splendour robed her, and the modesty of girlhood was her halo. I may
be the most fatuous of men, but in truth that shyness of hers touched me
exquisitely. I looked a stupid block, I dare say. I was alive to Paradise, as she
turned her glance from my glance, and softly averted her head to hide the blush
on her cheek.
“I know this is the talk of a dreamer – of a rapt, romantic lunatic. I do
dream now and then; how can I help it?
“What a child she is sometimes! What an unsophisticated, untaught thing!
She said I thought her childish, and I did. She imagined I despised her.
Despised her! It was unutterably sweet to feel myself at once near her and
above her – to be conscious of a natural right and power to sustain her, as a
husband should sustain his wife.
“I worship her perfections; but it is her faults, her foibles, that bring her
near to me, that nestle her to my heart, for a selfish but deeply-natural reason.
These faults are the steps by which I can have ascendency over her.
“It delights my eye to look on her. If I were a king and she the housemaid
that swept my palace-stairs, across all that space between us my eye would
recognize her qualities; a pulse would beat for her in my heart. Take away her
education, her ornaments, her sumptuous dress; place her at a cottage door, in a
drab gown; let her offer me there a drink of water, with that smile – I should
like her; I should linger to talk with her.
“How careless in her to leave her desk open, where I know she has
money! In the lock hang all her keys. There is a purse in that little satin bag; I
see the beaded tassel hanging out. All her little failings would, I know, irritate
my brother Robert. If they vex me it is a most pleasurable vexation. I delight to
find her at fault. I never lecture Henry, never feel disposed to do so. If he does
wrong – and that is very seldom, dear, excellent lad! – a word suffices. But the
moment her mischievous face meets my eye, expostulatory words crowd to my
lips, transforming me into a talker. It puzzles me sometimes. The more teasing
her mood, the more I seek her, the better I like her.
“She is never wilder, never less manageable than when she comes in fiery
from a ride on the hills; and I confess I have waited an hour in the courtyard for
the chance of seeing her return, and for the dearer chance of lifting her from the
saddle. I have noticed that she will never permit any man but myself to do that;
not even Sir Philip Nunnely. She is always mighty gentle with her young
baronet. But I know that she resigns herself to me willingly. Is she conscious
how my strength rejoices to serve her? I myself am not her slave; but all my
knowledge, all my prudence, all my calm, and all my power stand in her
presence humbly waiting a task. Does she know it?
“I have called her careless. Yet her carelessness never compromises her
refinement. Her possessions are frequently astray, but amongst them I never
saw anything that did not proclaim the lady – nothing sordid, nothing soiled.
Look at the pure kid of this little glove, at the fresh, unsullied satin of the bag.
“What a difference there is between her and Caroline Helstone! Caroline,
I fancy, is the soul of conscientious punctuality. She would precisely suit the
domestic habits of a certain kinsman of mine – so dexterous, quick and quiet.
But what could I do with anything so nearly faultless? She is certainly pretty:
but where is there anything to alter, anything to endure, anything to reprimand,
to be anxious about? She is a lily of the valley, needing no tint. What pencil
dare to paint her? My sweetheart, if I ever have one, must bear affinity to the
rose – a sweet, lively delight guarded with prickly peril. I was not made to be
mated with a lamb; I should find a young lioness or leopardess more congenial.
I should tire of the lamb’s mute, monotonous innocence; I should feel as
burdensome the nestling dove which never stirred in my bosom; but my
patience would exult in stilling the flutterings and training the energies of the
restless falcon.
“O my pupil! Never shall I do more than see, and worship, and wish for
thee. Alas! knowing I could make thee happy, will it be my doom to see thee
possessed by those who have not that power?
“However kind the hand, if it is feeble, it cannot bend Shirley; and she
must be bent. It cannot curb her; and she must be curbed.
“Beware, Sir Philip Nunnely! I never see her at your side without
observing her lips compressed, or her brow knit, in resolute endurance of some
trait of your character which she does not like, but believes atoned for by a
virtue. I observe her slight recoil when you draw a little too near, and gaze a
little too expressively, and whisper a little too warmly.
“I see a priest of Juno: he stands before me, watching late and lone at a
shrine in an Argive temple. For years of solitary ministry he has lived on
dreams. He loves the idol he serves, and prays day and night that his frenzy
may be fed. She has heard; she will favour him. He waits at the altar.
“A shock of heaven and earth is felt by that brave, lonely watcher. He is
wrapped in sudden light. Through the roof, through the wide-yawning, vast blue
of heaven, pours a wondrous descent, dread as the downrushing of stars. He has
what he asked. I see an insufferable glory burning terribly between the pillars.
Gods be merciful and quench it!
“In the morning, a pious Argive enters to make an early offering. There
was thunder in the night; the bolt fell here. The shrine is shivered, the marble
pavement split and blackened. Saturnia’s statue rises chaste, grand, untouched;
at her feet piled ashes lie pale. No priest remains; he who watched will be seen
no more.
“There is the carriage! Let me lock up the desk and pocket the keys. She
will be seeking them tomorrow; she will have to come to me asking if I have
seen them, looking ashamed, conscious that this is the twentieth time of asking.
I will tantalize her, before restoring them with a lecture. Here is the bag, too,
and the purse; the glove – pen – seal. She shall wring them all out of me slowly
and separately – only by confession, penitence, entreaty. Every feature of her
face, her bright eyes, her lips, shall go through each change they know, for my
pleasure – display each exquisite variety of glance and curve, to delight, thrill,
perhaps more hopelessly to enchain me. If I must be her slave, I will not lose
my freedom for nothing.”
He locked the desk, pocketed all the property, and went.
↑

Chapter 30

RUSHEDGE – A CONFESSIONAL


Everybody said it was high time for Mr. Robert Moore to return home.
The gossips agreed that it was not business that kept him away. He had finished
that long ago. He had soon run down his four ringleaders; he had attended their
trial, heard their conviction and sentence, and seen them safely shipped prior to
transportation.
The newspapers had reported this. None hailed his success, though the
mill-owners were glad of it, trusting that the terrors of the law would from now
on paralyse the disaffected. Disaffection, however, was still heard muttering to
himself in alehouses.
One report affirmed that Moore dared not come to Yorkshire; he knew his
life was forfeit if he did.
“I’ll tell him that,” said Mr. Yorke, when his foreman mentioned the
rumour; “and if that does not bring him home full gallop, nothing will.”
Either that or some other motive at last recalled him. He wrote to Joe
Scott naming the day he should arrive at Stilbro’, and Joe Scott having
informed Mr. Yorke, that gentleman went to meet him.
It was market-day. Moore arrived in time to take his usual place at the
market dinner, where the assembled manufacturers received him with
distinction, daring in private to do what they would not do in public – hailing
him as their champion. Moore’s unshaken nonchalance dampened their
enthusiasm and held it in a low, smouldering state.
Mr. Yorke, the president of these dinners, witnessed his young friend’s
bearing complacently. He despised men who were fooled by flattery or
popularity. Indifference appeased his rough spirit.
Robert, leaning back in his chair, quiet and almost surly, while the
clothiers and blanket-makers praised him, was a delectable sight for Mr. Yorke.
Moore drooped his head, and shrank before the tradesmen’s congratulations. He
soon forsook the wine and took to the road. Mr. Yorke followed him, and they
rode out of Stilbro’ together.
It was late in the day. The sun’s last ray had already faded from the cloudedges, and the October night was casting her shadow over the moorlands.
Mr. Yorke, moderately exhilarated with drink, and pleased to have young
Moore as a comrade, did much of the talking. He touched briefly on the trials
and conviction; he passed thence to the gossip of the neighbourhood, and before
long he attacked Moore on his personal concerns.
“Bob, I believe you are worsted, and you deserve it. Fortune offered you
twenty thousand pounds; you only had to hold out your hand and take it. And
what did you do? You called for a horse and rode to Warwickshire. Yet Fortune
waited for you. You might still have had the prize.
“Then, instead of thundering home in a breakneck gallop and laying your
laurels at her feet, you coolly went to London. What you have done there Satan
knows; nothing, I believe, but sat and sulked.”
“And who is to have this prize you talk so much about?”
“Only a baronet; that is all. She will be Lady Nunnely before Christmas.
Fool of a lad! I swear you might have had her.”
“By what sign, Mr. Yorke?”
“By every sign – by the light of her eyes; her cheeks grew red when your
name was mentioned.”
“My chance is quite over, I suppose?”
“It ought to be. But it is worth trying. I call this Sir Philip milk and water.
And then he writes verses. You are above that, at all events.”
“Would you advise me to propose, late as it is, Mr. Yorke?”
“You can but try, Robert. If she has a fancy for you, she will forgive
much. But, my lad, you are laughing.”
“I have quarrelled with myself, Yorke. I have battered my head by driving
it against a wall.”
“Why, what has gone wrong?”
“The machinery of all my nature; the whole engine of this human mill;
the boiler, which I take to be the heart, is fit to burst.”
“Ye’ll be jingling into poetry, Robert.”
“Hideous, base blunder! You may commit in a moment what you will rue
for years. Yorke, if I got off horseback and laid myself down in the road, would
you have the goodness to gallop over me, backwards and forwards, about
twenty times?”
“Wi’ all the pleasure in life, if there were no such thing as a coroner’s
inquest.”
“I certainly believed she loved me. I have seen her eyes sparkle radiantly
when she saw me in a crowd; she has flushed up crimson when she has offered
me her hand, and said, ‘How do you do, Mr. Moore?’
“My name had a magical influence over her,” continued Moore. “She
blushed when others said it. She pronounced it in her most musical tone. She
took an interest in me; she was anxious about me; she wished me well; she
sought to benefit me. I could come to but one conclusion – this is love.
“Yorke, in her I saw youth and beauty; and power. Her wealth offered me
the redemption of my honour. She had aided me substantially by a loan of five
thousand pounds. Could I believe she loved me? Indeed I smiled at her naïveté
and simplicity in showing her love. That whip of yours seems to have a good
heavy handle, Yorke; swing it about your head and knock me out of the saddle,
if you please.”
“Patience, Robert, till the moon rises and I can see you. Did you love her
or not?”
“She is very pretty, in her own style. She has a look of a thing made out
of fire and air, at which I stand and marvel, without a thought of clasping it. She
attracted my interest and vanity. I never felt as if nature meant her to be my
other and better self. When that question came to me, I flung it off, saying
brutally that I should be rich with her and ruined without her – vowing I would
be practical, and not romantic.”
“A very sensible resolve,” said Mr. Yorke.
“With this sensible resolve I walked up to Fieldhead one night last
August, the eve of my departure. I had sent a note, and I found her at home, and
alone.
“She received me without embarrassment, for she thought I came on
business. I was embarrassed enough, but determined. I hardly know how I got
the operation over. I sternly offered myself – my fine person – with my debts,
of course, as a settlement.
“It vexed me to find that she neither blushed, trembled, nor looked down.
She responded, ‘I doubt whether I have understood you, Mr. Moore.’
“And I had to go over the whole proposal twice, before she would fully
take it in. And then, what did she do? Instead of faltering a sweet Yes, or
maintaining a soft, confused silence, she started up, walked twice fast through
the room, and exclaimed, ‘God bless me!’
“Yorke, I stood on the hearth, and I knew my doom. There was no
misunderstanding her aspect and voice. She stopped and looked at me.
“‘God bless me!’ she repeated, in that shocked, indignant, yet saddened
tone. ‘You have made a strange proposal; and if you knew how strangely you
worded it and looked it, you would be startled at yourself. You spoke like a
brigand who demanded my purse rather than like a lover who asked my heart.’
“I knew, as she uttered it, it was true. I looked at her, dumb and wolfish.
She at once enraged and shamed me.
“‘Gérard Moore, you know you don’t love Shirley Keeldar,’ she said. I
might have broken out into false swearing – vowed that I did love her; but I
could not lie in her face. Besides, she would not have believed me. She would
never have mistaken my half-coarse, half-cold admiration for true manly love.
“Next, she sat down in the window-seat and cried passionately. Her eyes
were haughty, pained; saying, you have outraged me. She added words.
“‘I did respect – I did like you,’ she said, ‘Yes, as much as if you were my
brother; and you – you want to make a speculation of me, for that mill!’
“And what do you think I said? ‘Whatever my own feelings were, I was
persuaded you loved me, Miss Keeldar.’
“Beautiful, was it not? She sat quite confounded. ‘Is it Robert Moore that
speaks?’ I heard her mutter. ‘Do you mean,’ she asked aloud, ‘you thought I
loved as we love those we wish to marry? You insinuate that all the frank
kindness I have shown you has been a complicated, bold, and immodest
manœuvre to ensnare a husband. You imply that at last you come here out of
pity to offer me your hand, because I have courted you. Let me say this: you
have seen wrong. Your mind is warped; you have judged wrong. Your tongue
betrays you; you now speak wrong. I never loved you. Be at rest there. My
heart is as pure of passion for you as yours is barren of affection for me.’
“I hope I was answered, Yorke?
“‘I seem to be blind and besotted,’ was my remark.
“‘Loved you!’ she cried. ‘Why, I have been as frank with you as a sister –
never shunned you, never feared you. Your presence cannot make me tremble,
nor quicken my pulse.’
“I alleged that the sound of my name moved her; it made her blush.
“‘Not for your sake!’ she declared briefly. I urged explanation, but could
get none.
“‘When I sat beside you at the school feast, did you think I loved you
then? When I called on you in the counting-house, when I walked with you on
the pavement, did you think I loved you then?’
“I said I did. Yorke, she rose, she grew tall, she expanded almost to flame.
“‘Then you say that I have acted as no woman can act without degrading
herself. You were once high in my esteem, but are now hurled down; you, once
intimate in my friendship, are cast out. Go!’
“I went not. I had seen her lip quiver. I knew another storm of tears would
fall, and then I believed some calm must follow, and I would wait for it.
“This time she wept more softly. Her eyes lifted to me a gaze more
reproachful than haughty, more mournful than incensed.
“‘O Moore!’ said she. I groaned.
“‘I have done wrong,’ I said, ‘and I will go.’
“I took my hat. Yet I believed she would not let me depart. But she was
silent. I was obliged to turn back of my own accord when I reached the door,
and to say, ‘Forgive me.’
“‘I could, if there was not myself to forgive too,’ was her reply; ‘but to
mislead an intelligent man I must have done wrong.’
“I broke out suddenly with some declamation I do not remember. I know
that I sincerely wished to absolve her. She had done no wrong.
“At last she extended her hand. For the first time I wished to take her in
my arms and kiss her. I did kiss her hand many times.
“‘Some day we shall be friends again,’ she said, ‘when you have had time
to read my actions in a true light, and not so horribly to misinterpret them. Time
may give you the right key to all.’
“Drops rolled slow down her cheeks. She wiped them away.
“‘I am deeply sorry for what has happened,’ she sobbed. So was I, God
knows! Thus were we parted.”
“A queer tale!” commented Mr. Yorke.
“I’ll do it no more,” vowed his companion; “never more will I mention
marriage to a woman unless I feel love. Credit and commerce may take care of
themselves. I mean to work diligently, and wait patiently. If the worst comes, I
will take an emigrant’s berth, and go out with Louis to America. No woman
shall ever again feel towards me as Miss Keeldar felt. In no woman’s presence
will I ever again stand such a fool and a knave, such a brute and a puppy.”
“Tut!” said the imperturbable Yorke, “you make too much of it. Still, I
am surprised that she did not love you; and that you did not love her. You are
both young; you are both handsome, and have wit enough. What ailed you that
you could not agree?”
“We never could be at home with each other, Yorke. We jarred when we
came very near. I have sat at one side of a room and observed her when she was
most natural and lively. I have drawn a little nearer, have joined the circle round
her seat, and been left alone with her. Were we happy thus? For myself, I must
say No. Always a feeling of constraint came over me; I became stern and
strange. We talked politics and business. If we had confidences, they were
confidences of the counting-house, not of the heart. She never crept into my
heart.”
“Well, lad, it is a queer thing. I don’t mind telling thee that thy talk brings
back a glimpse of my own past life. Twenty-five years ago I tried to persuade a
beautiful woman to love me, and she would not. I had not the key to her nature;
she was a stone wall to me, doorless and windowless.”
“But you loved her, Yorke; you worshipped Mary Cave. You were never
a fortune-hunter.”
“Ay, I did love her; but then she was beautiful as the moon. There is
naught like her in these days. Miss Helstone, maybe, has a look of her, but
nobody else.”
“Who has a look of her?”
“That quiet, delicate Miss Helstone. Many a time I have looked at the
lassie in church, when she sits in shadow, and is very still and very pale, like a
marble statue.”
“Was Mary Cave in that style?”
“Far grander! You wondered why she hadn’t wings and a crown. She was
a stately, peaceful angel, was my Mary.”
“Mary Cave was not what you think her, Yorke. I have seen her picture at
the rectory. She is no angel, but a fair, regular-featured woman – rather too
lifeless for my taste. But supposing–”
“Robert,” interrupted Yorke, “I could fell you off your horse this moment.
However, I won’t. I know well enough that the passion I still have is only the
remnant of an illusion. If Miss Cave had possessed either feeling or sense, she
would have preferred me to that copper-faced despot.”
“Supposing, Yorke, she had been educated (no women were educated in
those days); supposing she had possessed a thoughtful, original mind, a love of
knowledge, which she took an artless delight in receiving from your lips;
supposing her conversation was varied and graceful; supposing that when you
were near her, you were at once comforted and contented; supposing that
whenever you looked at her or thought of her, you ceased to be hard and
calculating, and felt an unselfish longing to protect and cherish; supposing that
when you took your Mary’s little hand, you felt it tremble just as a warm little
bird trembles when you take it from its nest; supposing you had noticed her
shrink into the background on your entrance into a room, yet if you sought her
out she welcomed you with the sweetest smile, and only turned her eyes away
lest they should reveal too much; supposing, in short, your Mary had been
modest, sensitive and pure – would you have left her, to court another woman
for her wealth?”
Mr. Yorke raised his hat, and wiped his forehead with his handkerchief.
“The moon is up,” was his only remark.
“Yorke, if Mary had loved you silently yet faithfully, chastely yet
fervently, would you have left her?”
“Robert!” He lifted his arm, and paused. “Robert! I might swear
thunderous oaths that, in the case you put, death only should have parted me
from Mary. But I have lived in the world fifty-five years; I have been forced to
study human nature; and, to speak a dark truth, if Mary had loved me, if I had
been secure of her affection, the odds are” (he let his hand fall heavy on the
saddle) – “the odds are I should have left her!”
They rode side by side in silence. Before either spoke again they were on
the other side of Rushedge. Briarfield’s lights starred the purple skirt of the
moor. Robert recommenced first.
“I believe that we can get nothing in this world worth keeping, except
through struggle or peril. We err, we fall, we are humbled; then we walk more
carefully. If the soul has strength, it conquers and rules thereafter.”
“What art thou going to do now, Robert? What are thy plans?”
“For my private plans, I’ll keep them to myself – which is very easy, as at
present I have none. As for my public plans, my views are a little altered. While
I was in Birmingham and London I looked a little into reality, considered
closely and at their source the causes of the troubles of this country. I went
where there was want of food, of fuel, of clothing; where there was no work
and no hope. I saw what taught me a new lesson, and filled me with fresh
feelings. I have no more softness or sentiment than previously; mutiny and
ambition I regard as I have always regarded them. I should resist a riotous mob
just as before; I should hunt a ringleader as eagerly as ever; but I should do it
now chiefly for the sake of those he misled. Something there is to look to,
Yorke, beyond a man’s personal interest. To respect himself, a man must
believe he is just to his fellow-men. Unless I am more considerate to ignorance,
more forbearing to suffering, than I have been, I shall scorn myself as grossly
unjust. – What now?” he said, addressing his horse, which had turned to a
wayside trough. “Yorke, ride on; I must let him drink.”
Yorke accordingly rode slowly forwards. Stilbro’ Moor was left behind;
plantations rose shadowy on either hand; they were descending the hill; they
were almost home.
This close to the village, Mr. Yorke was not startled to hear a voice speak
behind the wall. The words, however, were peculiar.
“When the wicked perisheth there is shouting,” it said; “As the whirlwind
passeth, so is the wicked no more” (with a deeper growl): “Terrors take hold of
him as waters; hell is naked before him. He shall die without knowledge.”
A fierce flash and sharp gunshot violated the calm of night. Yorke, even
before he turned, knew the four convicts of Birmingham were avenged.
↑

Chapter 31

UNCLE AND NIECE


The die was cast. Sir Philip Nunnely knew it; Shirley knew it; Mr.
Sympson knew it. That evening, when the Fieldhead family dined at Nunnely
Priory, decided the business.
Two or three things combined to bring the baronet to a point. He had
observed that Miss Keeldar looked pensive and delicate. This struck him on his
poetic side. A spontaneous sonnet brewed in his brain; and while it was
working there, one of his sisters persuaded his lady-love to sit down to the
piano and sing one of his own ballads.
It chanced that Shirley, the moment before, had been gazing from a
window. She had seen that stormy moonlight which Louis Moore was at the
same instant contemplating from her own oak-parlour window; she had seen the
trees wrestling with the gale, and heard the roar of the forest. She turned back
touched, and wakened.
She sang, as requested. There was much about love in the ballad – faithful
love that disaster could not shake; that in poverty clung closer. The words were
set to a fine old air, and Shirley sang them well, with feeling and passion.
On leaving the instrument she sat down by the fire. The ladies were round
her; none of them spoke. They looked upon her as quiet poultry might look on
an egret, or an ibis. What made her sing so? They never sang so, with such
expression. It was decidedly improper. Shirley was judged.
Moreover, old Lady Nunnely eyed her stonily from her great chair. Her
gaze said, “This woman is not of my kind. I object to her as my son’s wife.”
Her son, catching the look, read its meaning. He grew alarmed: he must
make haste.
The room they were in had once been a picture-gallery, and still had a
shadowy, long-withdrawing look. A deep recess with a couch, a cabinet and a
window formed a room within a room. Two persons standing there might talk
quietly, and no-one be the wiser.
Sir Philip persuaded two of his sisters to sing a duet; the elder ladies were
conversing together. He was pleased to notice that Shirley rose to look at the
pictures. He had a tale to tell about one beautiful ancestress; so he joined her,
and began to tell it.
There were mementoes of the same lady in the cabinet within the recess,
and while Shirley was stooping to examine the missal and the rosary, and while
the Misses Nunnely indulged in a prolonged screech, guiltless of expression, Sir
Philip stooped too, and whispered a few hurried sentences. At first Miss
Keeldar was so still you might have fancied her changed to a statue; but she
presently looked up and answered. They parted. Miss Keeldar returned to the
fire, and resumed her seat. The baronet gazed after her, then went and stood
behind his sisters. Only Mr. Sympson had noticed the pantomime.
That gentleman drew his own conclusions. Had he been as acute as he
was meddling, he might have seen something in Sir Philip’s face which
corrected his ideas. Ever shallow and hasty, he went home quite cock-a-hoop.
He was not a man that kept secrets well. The next morning, while
employing his son’s tutor as his secretary, he must needs announce to him, with
much flimsy pomp of manner, that he had better prepare himself for an early
return south, as Mr. Sympson’s important business in Yorkshire was now on the
brink of fortunate completion. His anxious efforts were likely, at last, to be
crowned with success. A truly eligible addition was about to be made to the
family.
“Sir Philip Nunnely?” Louis Moore guessed.
Mr. Sympson treated himself to a pinch of snuff and a chuckling laugh,
before ordering the tutor to proceed with business.
For a day or two Mr. Sympson continued as bland as oil, but also he
seemed to sit on pins. He was for ever looking out of the window and listening
for carriage-wheels. He waited to be consulted, for lawyers to be summoned,
for settlement discussions to begin.
At last there came a letter for Miss Keeldar. He knew the handwriting; he
knew the crest on the seal. He handed it to her, but he did not see it read, for
Shirley took it to her own room; nor did he see it answered, for she wrote her
reply shut up, and it took her the best part of a day. He questioned her whether
it was answered; she responded, “Yes.”
Again he waited, not daring to speak, kept mute by something in Shirley’s
face – a very awful and inscrutable something. He thought of calling Louis
Moore to ask him for an interpretation of that look; but his dignity forbade it.
Moore himself, perhaps, had his own private difficulties connected with that
baffling bit of translation; he looked like a student for whom grammars are
blank and dictionaries dumb.
Mr. Sympson went to visit the Wynnes. He returned sooner than
expected, and requested Miss Keeldar’s presence for a “strictly private
interview.”
She rose, showing no surprise, and followed her uncle into the drawing
room like a person about to undergo an extraction at the dentist.
“I have been to De Walden Hall,” said Mr. Sympson. He paused. Miss
Keeldar studied the carpet and gave no response.
“I have learned,” he went on, “a circumstance which surprises me. It
seems that Nunnely Priory is shut up – that the family have left the county. It
seems that Sir Philip himself has accompanied his mother and sisters.”
“Indeed!” said Shirley.
“May I ask if you share the amazement with which I received this news?”
“No, sir.”
“Is it news to you?”
“Yes, sir.”
Mr. Sympson fidgeted in his chair. “I mean to have a thorough
explanation. I will not be put off. My questions must be answered. I will have
clear, satisfactory replies. I am not to be trifled with. (Silence.)
“It is an extraordinary thing – very singular – most odd!” he expostulated.
“I suppose, sir, the family had a right to go.”
“Sir Philip is gone!” (with emphasis).
Shirley raised her brows. “Bon voyage!” said she.
“This will not do; this must be altered, ma’am.”
He drew his chair forward; he pushed it back; he looked perfectly
incensed, and perfectly helpless.
“Come now, uncle,” said Shirley, “do not fret and fume. Ask me what
you want to know. I promise you truthful replies.”
“I demand to know, Miss Keeldar, whether Sir Philip has made you an
offer?”
“He has.”
“He made you an offer that night we dined at the priory? He proposed in
the recess? I saw it all. Subsequently you received a letter from him. On what
subject?”
“No matter.”
“Ma’am, is that the way in which you speak to me?”
Shirley’s foot tapped quick on the carpet.
“There you sit, silent and sullen – you promised truthful replies.”
“Sir, I have answered you thus far. Proceed.”
“I should like to see that letter.”
“You cannot see it.”
“I must and shall, ma’am; I am your guardian.”
“Having ceased to be a ward, I have no guardian.”
“Ungrateful being! Reared by me as my own daughter–”
“Once more, uncle, have the kindness to keep to the point. Let us both
remain cool. Listen! You have asked me whether Sir Philip made me an offer.
That question is answered. What do you wish to know next?”
“I desire to know whether you accepted or refused him, and know it I
will.”
“Certainly, you ought to know it. I refused him.”
“Refused him! You – you, Shirley Keeldar, refused Sir Philip Nunnely?”
“I did.”
The poor gentleman bounced from his chair. “There it is! There it is!”
“I am sincerely sorry, uncle, that you are so disappointed.”
Concession and contrition never do any good with some people. They
merely harden them. One such was Mr. Sympson.
“I disappointed? What is it to me? You would insinuate, perhaps, that I
have motives?”
“Most people have motives for their actions.”
“She accuses me to my face! She charges me with bad motives!”
“I did not say bad motives. Uncle, you tire me. I want to go away.”
“No! I will be answered. What are your intentions, Miss Keeldar, in
respect of matrimony?”
“To be quiet, and to do just as I please.”
“Just as you please! Wholly indecorous.”
“Mr. Sympson, I advise you not to become insulting. You know I will not
bear that.”
“You read French. Your mind is poisoned with French novels. You have
imbibed French principles.”
“You are now treading on dangerous ground, sir. Beware!”
“It will end in infamy. I have foreseen it all along.”
“Do you assert, sir, that something in which I am concerned will end in
infamy?”
“That it will – that it will. You said just now you would act as you please.
You acknowledge no rules – no limitations.”
“Silly stuff! You tire me, uncle.”
“What, madam, could be your reasons for refusing Sir Philip?”
“At last there is a sensible question; I shall be glad to reply. Sir Philip is
too young for me. I regard him as a boy. All his relations would be annoyed if
he married me. I am not his equal in the world’s view.”
“Is that all?”
“Our dispositions are not compatible. He is very amiable; but not my
master in any point. I could not trust myself with his happiness. I will accept no
hand which cannot hold me in check.”
“I thought you liked to do as you please. You are vastly inconsistent.”
“When I promise to obey, it shall be in the belief that I can keep that
promise. I could not obey a youth like Sir Philip. Besides, he would never
command me. He would expect me always to rule, and I have no taste for that.”
“You no taste for swaggering, and ordering, and ruling?”
“Not my husband; only my uncle. Any man who wishes to live in decent
comfort with me as a husband must be able to control me.”
“I wish you had a real tyrant.”
“A tyrant would not hold me for a day. I would rebel.”
“You bewilder one’s brain with your self-contradiction!”
“That is evident.”
“You had better find some doting fool,” said Mr. Sympson; “you might
pin him to your apron.”
“I might do that with a boy; did I not say I prefer a master? One who can
control my impatient temper; a man whose approval can reward, whose
displeasure can punish me; a man I shall feel it impossible not to love, and very
possible to fear.”
“What is there to hinder you from doing all this with Sir Philip? He is a
man of rank; he is a poet. You and Henry rave about poetry! Marry a poet, then,
in God’s name! Marry Sir Philip.”
“You are almost as good a poet as he.”
“Madam, you are wandering from the point.”
“Indeed, uncle, I wanted to do so. Do not let us get out of temper with
each other; it is not worth while.”
“Out of temper, Miss Keeldar! I should be glad to know who is out of
temper.”
“I am not, yet.”
“If you mean that I am, you are guilty of impertinence.”
“You will be soon, if you go on at that rate.”
“There it is! You would try the patience of Job. This is not a laughing
matter, miss. I am convinced that there is mischief here. You described just
now, with far too much freedom for your years and sex, the sort of individual
you would prefer as a husband. Pray, did you paint from the life?”
Shirley opened her lips, but instead of speaking she only glowed rose-red.
“I shall have an answer!”
“It was an historical picture, uncle, from several originals. I have been in
love several times, with heroes of many nations.”
“What next–”
“And philosophers.”
“She is mad!”
“Once I loved Socrates; and I admired Themistocles.”
“Miss Keeldar–”
“To pass over a few centuries, Washington was a plain man, but I liked
him; but to speak of the present–”
“Ah! the present.”
“To quit crude schoolgirl fancies, and come to realities–”
“Realities indeed, ma’am!”
“To reveal the present idol of my soul–”
“You will make haste, if you please. Confess.”
“Confess I must. My heart is full of the secret. It must be spoken. I only
wish you were Mr. Helstone; you would sympathize with me better.”
“I will know the name!”
“My hero is rather like Mr. Helstone. Their very faces are similar – a pair
of hawks – dry, direct, decided. But my hero is the mightier of the two. His
mind has the clearness of the deep sea, the patience of its rocks, the force of its
billows.”
“Rant and fustian! Miss Keeldar, does the person reside in Briarfield?
Speak, girl!”
“That was well said, uncle. ‘Speak, girl!’ It is quite tragic. England has
howled savagely against this man, uncle, and she will one day roar exultingly
over him. This country will change in her demeanour to him; he will never
change in his duty to her. Come, uncle, I’ll tell you his name. Arthur Wellesley,
Lord Wellington.”
Mr. Sympson rose up furious. He bounced out of the room, but
immediately bounced back again, shut the door, and resumed his seat.
“Ma’am, you shall tell me this. Will your principles permit you to marry a
man without money – a man below you?”
“Never a man below me.”
“Will you, Miss Keeldar, marry a poor man? I insist upon knowing. My
family respectability shall not be compromised.”
“A good resolution; keep it.”
“Madam, it is you who shall keep it.”
“Impossible, sir, since I form no part of your family.”
“Whom will you marry, Miss Keeldar?”
“Not Mr. Sam Wynne, because I scorn him; not Sir Philip Nunnely,
because I only esteem him.”
“Such obstinacy could not be unless you were under improper influence.”
“What do you mean? Improper influence! What old woman’s cackle is
that?”
“Are you a young lady?”
“I am a thousand times better: I am an honest woman, and as such I will
be treated.”
“Do you know” (leaning mysteriously forward, and speaking with ghastly
solemnity) – “do you know the whole neighbourhood teems with rumours
respecting you and a bankrupt tenant of yours, the foreigner Moore?”
“Does it?”
“It does. Is it he you will marry?”
“He is handsome, and manly, and commanding.”
“You declare it to my face! The knave!”
“He is talented and resolute. He is a ruler in his bearing.”
“She glories in it! No shame, no fear!”
“When we speak the name of Moore, shame should be forgotten and fear
discarded. The Moores know only honour and courage.”
“She is mad. That Moore is the brother of my son’s tutor. Would you let
him call you sister?”
Bright shone Shirley’s eye now. “No, no; not for a century of life.”
“But Mr. Louis Moore’s sister you will be.”
“Mr. Sympson, I am sick at heart with all this weak trash; I will bear no
more. Your thoughts are not my thoughts, your gods are not my gods. We do
not view things in the same light; we do not measure them by the same
standard; we hardly speak in the same tongue. It is not that I hate you; you are a
good sort of man. Perhaps you mean well in your way. But we are ever at
variance. You annoy me with small meddling, with petty tyranny; you
exasperate my temper. As to your narrow rules, your little prejudices, bundle
them off, Mr. Sympson; I’ll none of them. I wash my hands of the lot. I walk by
another creed and faith than you.”
“Another creed! I believe she is an infidel.”
“An infidel to your religion, an atheist to your god.”
“An atheist!!!”
“Your god, sir, is the world. In my eyes you are an idolater. Sir, your god,
your fish-tailed Dagon, rises before me as a demon. You have raised him to a
throne and given him a sceptre. Behold how hideously he governs! See him
busied at the work he likes best – making marriages. He binds the young to the
old, the strong to the imbecile. He fetters the dead to the living. In his realm
there is secret hatred; there is unspoken disgust; there is treachery and vice. In
his dominions children grow unloving between parents who have never loved;
infants are nursed on deception from their very birth; they are reared amongst
lies. Your god is a masked Death.”
“This language is terrible! My daughters and you must associate no
longer, Miss Keeldar. I could not have believed–”
“Now, sir, do you begin to be aware that it is useless to scheme for me;
that in doing so you but sow the wind to reap the whirlwind? I am anchored on
a resolve you cannot shake.”
Mr. Sympson was bewildered. “Never heard such language!” he
muttered; “Never was so addressed in my life!”
“You are quite confused, sir. You had better withdraw, or I will.”
He rose hastily. “We must leave this place; they must pack up at once.
She’s not fit for them to be with.”
He made his way to the door; dropped his snuff-box, leaving the contents
scattered on the carpet; and stumbled out, almost falling over Tartar. In his
exasperation he hurled an oath at the dog and a coarse epithet at his mistress.
“Poor Mr. Sympson! he is both feeble and vulgar,” said Shirley to herself.
“My head aches, and I am tired,” she added; and leant her head upon a cushion.
An intruder entering the room a quarter of an hour afterwards found her
asleep. He paused, and said, “Miss Keeldar.”
Perhaps his voice harmonized with her dream. Without opening her eyes,
she turned her head a little, so that her face became visible: rosy, happy, half
smiling, but her eyelashes were wet. Shirley looked like a child that had been
naughty and punished, but was now forgiven and at rest.
“Miss Keeldar,” again said the voice. This time it woke her. She looked
up, and saw Louis Moore standing two or three yards away.
“O, Mr. Moore!” she said. “I was afraid it was my uncle again: he and I
have quarrelled.”
“Mr. Sympson should let you alone,” was the reply. “Can he not see that
you are still far from strong?”
“I assure you he did not find me weak. I did not cry when he was here.”
“He is about to leave Fieldhead – so he says. He is now giving orders to
his family.”
“Are you and Henry to go?”
“I believe, as far as Henry is concerned, that was the gist of his scarcely
intelligible orders; but he may change tomorrow. I doubt whether he will leave
you for weeks yet. To myself he addressed some words which will require a
little attention and comment by-and-by, when I have time to think about them.
At the moment he came in I was busied with a note I had got from Mr. Yorke –
I cut short the interview with Mr. Sympson somewhat abruptly. I left him
raving. Here is the note. It refers to my brother Robert.”
“I shall be glad to hear news of him. Is he coming home?”
“He is come. He is at Briarmains. Mr. Yorke went yesterday to Stilbro’ to
meet him.”
“Mr. Moore, something is wrong – what has happened?”
“If you turn so pale I shall be sorry I have spoken. It might have been
worse. Robert is not dead, but much hurt.”
“O sir, it is you who are pale. Sit down.”
“Read the note.”
Miss Keeldar read that last night Robert Moore had been shot at from
behind the wall of Milldean plantation; that he was wounded severely, but it
was hoped not fatally. Of the assassin, or assassins, nothing was known; they
had escaped. “No doubt,” Mr. Yorke wrote, “it was done in revenge.’
“He is my only brother,” said Louis. “Shot like some wild beast from
behind a wall.”
“Be hopeful. He will get better – I know he will.” Shirley held her hand
over Mr. Moore’s, touching it lightly.
“Well, give me your hand,” he said. Awaiting neither consent nor refusal,
he took it. “I am going to Briarmains now,” he went on. “Will you step over to
the rectory and tell Caroline Helstone what has happened? She will hear it best
from you.”
“Immediately,” said Shirley. “Ought I to say that there is no danger?”
“Say so.”
“You will come back soon, and let me know more?”
“I will either come or write. Good-morning now.”
“You will bear up, come what may.”
“We shall see.”
Shirley’s fingers were obliged to withdraw from the tutor’s. Louis was
obliged to relinquish the hand folded in his own.
“I thought I should have had to support her,” he said, as he walked
towards Briarmains, “and it is she who has made me strong. That look of pity,
that gentle touch! It lay like a snowflake; it thrilled like lightning. A thousand
times I have longed to possess that hand – to have it in mine. I have possessed
it; her fingers and mine can never be strangers more. Having met once they
must meet again.”
↑

Chapter 32
THE SCHOOLBOY AND THE WOOD-NYMPH


His own house, Briarmains, being nearer than the Hollow, Mr. Yorke had
conveyed Robert Moore there. He had seen him laid in the best bed, as carefully
as if he had been one of his own sons. The sight of Moore’s welling blood, the
spectacle of the fine head suddenly laid low in the dust, made him indeed the
son of the Yorkshire gentleman’s heart.
There was nobody else to help him; he had to do it all himself. This utter
dependence of the speechless, bleeding young man brought out his
benevolence. Mr. Yorke liked to have power; and he now had power over a
fellow-creature’s life. It suited him.
No less did it suit his wife. Some women would have been terror-struck to
see a gory man brought in over their threshold. You would have supposed it a
cause for hysterics. No. Mrs. Yorke went into hysterics when Jessie would not
leave the garden to come to her knitting; but an attempted murder nearby – a
half-murdered man in her best bed – cheered her spirits.
Mrs. Yorke was a woman who, while making her maid-servant miserable,
would nurse a hospital full of plague patients like a heroine. She almost loved
Moore with her tough heart. She chased Jessie and Rose from his room, and
forbade the housemaids to enter it. Moore became the apple of her eye.
Strange! Louis Moore was permitted to sit on the edge of the bed and
hold his brother’s hand; and Mrs. Yorke bore it well. She allowed him to stay
half the day there; she once allowed him to sit up all night in the chamber; she
herself rose at five o’clock of a wet November morning, and with her own
hands lit the kitchen fire, and made the brothers’ breakfast, and served it to
them. Majestically arrayed in a boundless flannel wrapper, a shawl and
nightcap, she sat and watched them eat, as complacently as a hen beholds her
chickens feed. Yet she would not let the cook or the housemaid so much as
carry up a basin of gruel.
Two ladies called one day, pale and anxious, and begged earnestly,
humbly, to be allowed to see Mr. Moore one instant. Mrs. Yorke hardened her
heart, and sent them packing.
But when Hortense Moore came, it was not so bad. Hortense and Mrs.
Yorke possessed an exhaustless mutual theme of conversation, in the corrupt
tendencies of servants. Their views of this class were similar; they were both
suspicious and severe. Hortense, too, showed no jealousy of Mrs. Yorke’s
attentions to Robert; she did not interfere, but fidgeted about the house and
kitchen, making herself generally useful. They both agreed in excluding visitors
from the sickroom, and held the young mill-owner captive.
Mr. MacTurk, the surgeon, pronounced his wound to be dangerous, but
not hopeless. Mrs. Yorke and Hortense promised to observe his directions
faithfully, so Moore was left in their hands.
Doubtless they nursed him to the best of their ability; but something went
wrong. The bandages were displaced; great loss of blood followed. MacTurk,
being summoned, came in haste. He was one of those surgeons whom it is
dangerous to vex – abrupt in his best moods, in his worst savage. On seeing
Moore’s state he relieved his feelings by a little flowery language about
meddling womankind.
For the best part of one winter night he and two male assistants were
busied about Moore. Shut up alone with him in his chamber, they wrangled
with Death over his exhausted frame. The conflict was sharp; it lasted till dawn.
Then the two assistants were left with the patient, while the senior went
himself in search of additional strength, in the person of Mrs. Horsfall, the best
nurse on his staff. To this woman he gave Moore in charge. She took the
responsibility stolidly, as she did also the easy-chair by the bed. That moment
she began her reign.
Mrs. Horsfall had one virtue – she obeyed MacTurk’s orders to the letter.
In other respects she was no woman, but a dragon. Hortense Moore fell before
her; Mrs. Yorke withdrew, crushed; yet both these women were personages of
some dignity. Cowed by the breadth, the height, and the brawn of Mrs. Horsfall,
they retreated to the back parlour. She, for her part, sat upstairs when she liked,
and downstairs when she preferred it. She took her dram of gin three times a
day, and her pipe of tobacco.
Morning and evening MacTurk came to see Moore. His case became
interesting in the surgeon’s eyes. MacTurk regarded him as a damaged piece of
clockwork, which it would be a credit to his skill to set going again. Robert
Moore had a pleasant time of it – in pain, in danger, too weak to move, almost
too weak to speak, a sort of giantess as his keeper, the three surgeons his sole
society. Thus he lay through the whole drear month of November.
At first Moore used feebly to resist Mrs. Horsfall. He hated the sight of
her rough bulk, and dreaded the contact of her hard hands; but she taught him
docility. She turned him in his bed as another woman would have turned a babe
in its cradle. When he was good she addressed him as “my dear”, and when he
was bad she sometimes shook him. If he tried to speak when MacTurk was
there, she lifted her hand and bade him “Hush!” like a nurse checking a forward
child. If she had not smoked and taken gin, it would have been better, he
thought; and once, in her absence, he hinted to MacTurk that “that woman was
a dram-drinker.”
“Pooh! my dear sir, they are all so,” was the reply. “But drunk or sober,
she always remembers to obey me.”
At length the fogs and rains withdrew. Behind November came deep
winter – clearness, stillness, frost.
A calm day had settled into a crystalline evening. The world wore a North
Pole colouring; the hills were lilac blue; the sky was ice; when the stars rose,
they were of white crystal; faint emerald hues tinged the landscape.
What is this, moving in a wood no longer green, no longer even russet,
this dark blue object? Why, it is a schoolboy who is trudging home alone, and
seeking a certain tree where he can sit. Why is he lingering here? The air is cold
and the time grows late. He sits down. What is he thinking about?
Impossible to say; for he is silent, and his face shows nothing. This boy is
a stripling of fifteen – slight, and tall for his years. His eye seems prepared to
note any attempt to control him; he looks as if he is alert for resistance. Wise
teachers avoid unnecessary interference with that lad. He is best let alone. Time
will educate and experience train him.
Martin Yorke (for it is a young Yorke) tramples on the name of poetry.
Talk sentiment to him, and you would be answered by sarcasm. Yet here he is,
wandering alone, waiting on Nature, while she unfolds a page of stern and
solemn poetry beneath his attentive gaze.
Being seated, he takes from his satchel a book – a volume of fairy tales.
There will be light enough to read by for an hour.
He reads. He is led into a solitary mountain region; he hears bells tinkle
on the wind. From the formless folds of the mist there rides a bright vision – a
green-robed lady, on a snow-white palfrey. She asks him some mysterious
question. He is spell-bound, and must follow her into fairyland.
A second legend bears him to the sea-shore. There tumbles in a strong
tide, boiling at the base of dizzy cliffs. Black rocks stretch far into the sea,
wreathed in spray. Some lone wanderer is out on these rocks, treading
cautiously. He hears a cry. Looking up he sees, at the point of the reef, a tall,
pale thing – human-shaped but made of spray – transparent, tremulous, awful.
Hush! Shut the book; hide it in the satchel. Martin hears a tread. The dead
leaves rustle on the wood path. Martin watches; the trees part, and a woman
emerges.
She is dressed in dark silk, a veil covering her face. Martin never met a
lady in this wood before. He observes that she is young; and, if not for the fact
that he now recognizes her as one whom he has often pronounced ugly, he
would think her beautiful behind the thin gauze of that veil.
She passes him and says nothing. He knew she would. All women are
proud monkeys, and he knows no more conceited doll than that Caroline
Helstone. The thought is hardly hatched in his mind when the lady retraces her
steps to him, raises her veil, and softly asks, “Are you one of Mr. Yorke’s
sons?”
No evidence would ever have persuaded Martin Yorke that he blushed
when thus addressed; yet blush he did, to the ears.
“I am,” he said bluntly, and encouraged himself to wonder,
superciliously, what would come next.
“You are Martin, I think?” It was a simple sentence, a little timid; but it
stilled him like a note of music.
Martin had a keen sense of his personality; he felt it right that the girl
should know him from his brothers. It was acceptable to hear a lady address
him as “Martin,” and not Mr. Martin or Master Martin, which would have lost
her his good graces for ever. But so would slipshod familiarity. The slight tone
of bashfulness was considered perfectly in place.
“I am Martin,” he said.
“Are your father and mother well?” (it was lucky she did not say papa and
mamma; that would have undone all); “and Rose and Jessie?”
“I suppose so.”
“My cousin Hortense is still at Briarmains?”
“Oh yes.” Martin gave a comic half-smile and groan, which the lady
responded to. She could guess what the young Yorkes thought of Hortense.
“Does your mother like her?”
“They agree so well about the servants that they can’t help liking each
other.”
“It is cold tonight.”
“Why are you out so late?”
“I lost my way in this wood.”
Martin allowed himself a refreshing laugh of scorn. “Lost your way in the
mighty forest of Briarmains!”
“I never was here before, and I believe I am trespassing now. You might
inform against me if you chose, Martin, and have me fined. It is your father’s
wood.”
“I should think I knew that. But I will guide you out.”
“You need not. I have found the track now. Martin,” (a little quickly),
“how is Mr. Moore?”
Martin had heard certain rumours; it struck him that it might be amusing
to make an experiment.
“Going to die. Nothing can save him. All hope flung overboard!”
She put her veil aside, looked into his eyes, and said, “To die!”
“The women did something about his bandages that finished everything.
He would have got better otherwise. I am sure they should be arrested, tried,
and brought in for Botany Bay, at the very least.”
The questioner, perhaps, did not hear this judgment. She stood
motionless. In two minutes, without another word, she moved forwards; no
good-night, no further inquiry. This was not amusing, nor what Martin had
calculated on. He expected something dramatic. It was hardly worth while to
frighten the girl if she would not entertain him in return. He called, “Miss
Helstone!”
She did not turn. He hastened after and overtook her.
“Come; are you uneasy about what I said?”
“You know nothing about death, Martin; you are too young for me to talk
to about it.”
“Did you believe me? It’s all flummery! Moore eats like three men. They
are always making something tasty for him – cooking some dainty in the
kitchen. I think I will play the old soldier, and be fed on the fat of the land like
him.”
“Martin!” Her voice trembled. “It is exceedingly wrong of you, Martin.
You have almost killed me.”
She stopped and leaned against a tree, shuddering, and as pale as death.
Martin contemplated her with curiosity. In one sense it was intensely
interesting; he was beginning to have a relish for discovering secrets. In another
sense, it reminded him of what he had once felt when he had heard a blackbird
lamenting for her nestlings, which Matthew had crushed with a stone, and that
was not a pleasant feeling. He began to cast about in his mind what he could do.
He smiled.
“Eureka!” he cried. “I’ll set all straight. You are better now, Miss
Caroline. Walk forward.”
Not reflecting that it would be difficult for Miss Helstone to climb a wall
or penetrate a hedge, he led her out by a short cut, which meant helping her
over some formidable obstacles. While he railed at her for helplessness, he
liked to feel himself of use.
“Martin, before we separate, assure me seriously, on your word of
honour, that Mr. Moore is better.”
“How much you think of that Moore!”
“No – but – his friends may ask me.”
“You may tell them he is well enough, only idle. You may tell them that
he takes mutton chops for dinner, and the best arrowroot for supper.”
“Who nurses him, Martin?”
“Why, a woman as round and big as our water-butt – a rough old girl. It is
my belief she knocks him about terribly in that room. I listen at the wall
sometimes, and I think I hear her thumping him. You should see her fist. I
would not be in his shoes. In fact, it is my private opinion that she eats most of
what goes up on the tray to Mr. Moore.”
Profound silence and meditation on Caroline’s part, and a sly
watchfulness on Martin’s.
“You never see him, I suppose, Martin?”
“No. I don’t care to. Did not you come to our house with Mrs. Pryor,
about five weeks ago, to ask after him?” inquired Martin.
“Yes.”
“I dare say you wished to be shown upstairs?”
“We did wish it; but your mother declined.”
“Ay! I heard it all. She behaved rudely and harshly.”
“She was not kind; for you know, Martin, we are relations, and it is
natural we should take an interest in Mr. Moore. But here we must part; we are
at your father’s gate.”
“I shall walk home with you.”
“They will miss you, and wonder where you are.”
“Let them. I can take care of myself.”
Martin knew that he had already incurred the penalty of a lecture, and dry
bread for his tea. No matter; the evening had provided him with an adventure.
As he walked home with Caroline, he promised to see Mr. Moore, in spite
of the dragon who guarded his chamber, and fixed an hour on the next day
when Caroline was to come to Briarmains Wood for news. He would meet her
at a certain tree.
Having reached home, the dry bread and the lecture were duly
administered to him, and he was sent to bed early. He accepted his punishment
stoically.
Before going to his chamber he paid a secret visit to the dining-room: a
still, cold apartment, seldom used. He stood before the mantelpiece, and lifted
his candle to two pictures hung above – two female heads: one, a type of serene
beauty, happy and innocent; the other, more lovely, but forlorn and desperate.
“She looked like that,” he said, gazing on the latter sketch, “when she
turned white, and leaned against the tree.”
“I suppose,” he pursued, when he was sitting on his bed – “I suppose she
is what they call ‘in love’ with that long thing in the next room. Whisht! is that
Horsfall clattering him? I wonder he does not yell out; but I suppose she is
making the bed. It is queer. Zillah Horsfall is a woman, and Caroline Helstone
is a woman; they are not much alike though. Is she a pretty girl, that Caroline? I
suspect she is. Very nice to look at – something so clear in her face, so soft in
her eyes. I approve of her looking at me. She has long eyelashes. If she behaves
well, and continues to suit me, I may do her a good turn. I rather like the idea of
dodging my mother and old Horsfall. And I know what reward I will claim –
one displeasing to Moore, and agreeable to myself.”
He turned into bed.
↑

Chapter 33

MARTIN’S TACTICS


It was necessary to Martin’s plan that he should stay at home that day.
Accordingly, he found no appetite for breakfast, and at school-time took a
severe pain about his heart, which made it advisable that, instead of setting out
to the grammar school with Mark, he should stay in his father’s arm-chair by
the fireside. With Mark gone to school, and Matthew and Mr. Yorke withdrawn
to the counting-house, four other things remained to be done.
The first of these was to obtain some breakfast, which he could not do
without; the second, third and fourth were to get his mother, Miss Hortense, and
Mrs. Horsfall successfully out of the way before four o’clock that afternoon.
Martin set off to the larder. The servants were in the kitchen, breakfasting
behind closed doors; his mother and Miss Moore were airing themselves on the
lawn, and discussing the servants. Martin made a fastidious selection of food.
There were apples laid upon a shelf; he picked out three. There was pastry on a
dish; he selected an apricot puff and a damson tart. On the plain household
bread his eye did not dwell; but he surveyed with favour some currant teacakes, and chose one. With his clasp-knife, he cut a wing of fowl and a slice of
ham; he thought a cold custard-pudding would go with these; and with his
booty, he sallied forth into the hall.
He was half-way across when the front door opened, and there stood
Matthew. Better far had it been the Devil, horns, hoofs, and all.
Matthew, sceptic and scoffer, had already expressed disbelief in Martin’s
pain about the heart, and had muttered something about “shamming.” The sight
now before him – the apples, the tarts, the tea-cakes, and the rest – gave him
proof of his own sagacity.
Martin paused one instant; then he saw how this untoward event might be
turned to excellent account. It might be handled so as to accomplish his second
task – the disposal of his mother. He knew that a collision between him and
Matthew always gave Mrs. Yorke a fit of hysterics; after which his mother was
sure to indulge in an afternoon in bed. This would suit him perfectly.
The collision duly took place in the hall. A dry laugh, an insulting sneer,
met by a cutting reply, were the signals. They rushed at it. Martin made a great
deal of noise. In flew the servants, Mrs. Yorke, and Miss Moore; Mr. Yorke
was summoned.
“Sons,” said he, “one of you must leave my roof if this occurs again.”
Martin now allowed himself to be taken off. He had been hurt; he was the
younger and slighter; but he was quite cool. He even smiled.
Once during that morning, he seemed to flag. “It is not worth while to
bother myself for that Caroline,” he remarked. But a quarter of an hour
afterwards he was again in the dining-room, looking at the portrait of despair.
“Yes,” he said, “I made her sob and shudder. I’ll see her smile before I’ve
done with her; besides, I want to outwit all these womenites.”
After dinner Mrs. Yorke duly withdrew to her chamber. Now for
Hortense.
That lady was just comfortably settled to stocking-mending in the back
parlour, when Martin, stretched on the sofa, lazily began to chat about Sarah,
the maid at the Hollow. In the course of much verbal meandering he hinted that
this damsel was said to have three suitors; and that Miss Mann had said she
knew for a fact that now the girl was left in sole charge of the cottage, she often
had them to meals, and fed them with the best food in the house.
It needed no more. Hortense could not have lived another hour without
going to the Hollow and inspecting the state of matters in person. Only Mrs.
Horsfall remained.
Martin, master of the field now, extracted from his mother’s work-basket
a bunch of keys; with these he opened the sideboard cupboard, produced a
black bottle and a small glass, placed them on the table, nimbly mounted the
stairs and tapped on Mr. Moore’s door. The nurse opened it.
“If you please, ma’am, you are invited to step into the back parlour and
take some refreshment. You will not be disturbed; the family are out.”
He watched her down; he shut the door. He knew she was safe.
The hard work was done; now for the pleasure. He snatched his cap, and
set off for the wood.
It was half-past three. It had been a fine morning, but the sky looked dark
now. It was beginning to snow; the wind blew cold; the wood looked dismal,
the old tree grim. Martin had to wait, walking to and fro, while the flakes fell
faster, and the wind howled pitifully.
“She is long in coming,” he muttered. “I wonder why I wish so much to
see her? She is not coming for me. But I have power over her, and I want to use
that power.”
He continued his walk.
“Now,” he resumed after a while, “if she fails to come, I shall hate and
scorn her.”
The church clock struck four. He heard a step so quick, so light, that it
scarcely sounded on the wood-walk. The wind blew fiercely now, and the
snow-storm increased; but on she came.
“Well, Martin,” she said eagerly, “how is he?”
“It is queer how much she thinks of him,” reflected Martin. “The blinding
snow and bitter cold are nothing to her, I believe; I almost wish I had a cloak to
wrap her in.”
“You have seen him?” she asked.
“No.”
“Oh! you promised you would. Now it will be so long before I know
anything certain about him, and I am sick of waiting. Martin, do see him, and
give him Caroline Helstone’s regards, and say she wished to know how he was,
and if anything could be done for his comfort.”
“I won’t.”
“You are changed. You were so friendly last night.”
“Come, we must not stand in this wood; it is too cold. I am delicate: if
you knew what a pain I had in my chest this morning, and how I went without
breakfast, you wouldn’t bring me here in the snow. Come, I say.”
“Are you really delicate, Martin? You have rosy cheeks.”
“That’s hectic. Will you come, or not?”
“Where?”
“Home with me. I was a fool not to bring a cloak. Put your arm through
mine; I’ll take care of you. Will you trust me?”
She looked into his face. “I think I will. Anything rather than return as
anxious as I came.”
“I can’t answer for that. However, I promise you shall see Moore
yourself.”
“Dear Martin, does he know?”
“Ah! I’m dear now. No, he doesn’t know.”
“And your mother and the others?”
“All is right.”
Caroline mused silently, but she walked on with her guide to Briarmains.
“Will you see him? I won’t, except to announce your arrival.”
“Martin, you are a strange boy, and this is a strange step; but all is strange
now. I will see him.”
“Here we are, then. Don’t worry; my father and Matthew are at the mill,
Mark is at school, the servants are in the back kitchen, Miss Moore is at the
cottage, my mother in her bed, and Mrs. Horsfall in paradise. Observe – the hall
is empty, the staircase quiet. The whole house and all its inhabitants are under a
spell, which I will not break till you are gone.”
“Martin, I trust you.”
“You never said a better word. Let me take your shawl. I will dry it for
you. You are cold and wet. Never mind; there is a fire upstairs. Follow me.”
He left his shoes on the mat, and mounted the stair unshod. Caroline stole
after, with noiseless step. At the end of a passage Martin paused before a door
and tapped twice – thrice. At last a voice said, “Come in.”
He entered briskly.
“Mr. Moore, a lady called to inquire after you. None of the women were
about. It is washing-day, and the maids are up to their ears in soap-suds, so I
brought her up here.”
“Is this a place to bring a lady to, you absurd lad?”
“No; so I’ll take her off.”
“Martin, stay here. Who is she?”
“Your grandmother.”
“Martin,” said the softest whisper at the door, “don’t be foolish.”
“Is she there?” inquired Moore hastily.
“She is there, fit to faint. She is standing on the mat.”
“Martin, you are an imp. Show her in.”
“Come, Miss Caroline.”
“Miss Caroline!” repeated Moore.
And when Miss Caroline entered she was met by a standing, thin, wasted
figure, who took both her hands.
“I give you a quarter of an hour,” said Martin, as he withdrew. “I will
wait in the gallery; nothing shall approach. But if you stay longer, I leave you to
your fate.”
He shut the door. In the gallery he was as elated as a king. No adventure
had ever made him feel so important or so interested.
“You are come at last,” said Moore, gazing on his visitress with hollow
eyes.
“Did you expect me before?”
“For a month, near two months, I have been in sad pain, and danger, and
misery, Cary.”
“I could not come.”
“Couldn’t you? But the rectory and Briarmains are not two miles apart.”
There was pain and there was pleasure in the girl’s face as she defended
herself.
“I came with mamma the very day we heard what had happened. Mr.
MacTurk then told us it was impossible to admit any stranger.”
“But afterwards – for many weeks past I have waited and listened. My
heart told me you must think of me, Cary. Not that I deserve thought; but we
are old friends – we are cousins.”
“I came again, Robert; mamma and I came again. And Mrs. Yorke turned
us away, saying, ‘I am responsible for his life; it shall not be forfeited for half
an hour’s idle gossip.’ But I must not tell you all she said; it was very
disagreeable. However, we came yet again – mamma, Miss Keeldar, and I. This
time we thought we should conquer, as we were three against one. But Mrs.
Yorke opened such a battery.”
Moore smiled. “What did she say?”
“Things that astonished us. Shirley laughed; I cried; mamma was
seriously annoyed. We were all three driven away. Since then I have walked
past the house every day, just for the satisfaction of looking up at your
window.”
“I have wished for you, Caroline.”
“I did not know that; I never dreamt one instant that you thought of me. If
I had imagined–”
“Mrs. Yorke would still have beaten you.”
“She would not. I would have come to the kitchen door; the servants
should have let me in, and I would have walked straight upstairs. In fact, it was
far more the fear of intruding on you that baffled me than the fear of Mrs.
Yorke.”
“Only last night I despaired of ever seeing you again. Weakness has
wrought terrible depression in me.”
“And you sit alone?”
“Worse than alone.”
“But you must be getting better, since you can leave your bed?”
“I doubt whether I shall live, after such exhaustion.”
“You shall go home to the Hollow. I will alter this. This shall be altered,
were there ten Mrs. Yorkes to do battle with.”
“Cary, you make me smile.”
“Do smile; smile again. Shall I tell you what I should like? I should like
you to be brought to the rectory, and given to me and mamma.”
“A precious gift! I have not laughed since they shot me till now.”
“Do you suffer pain, Robert?”
“Not so much now; but I am hopelessly weak, and my mind is
inexpressibly dark.”
“I understand your feelings,” she said; “I experienced something like it.
Since we met, I too have been very ill.”
“Very ill?”
“I thought I should die. The tale of my life seemed told. Every night, just
at midnight, I used to wake from awful dreams; and I felt I was close to the
end.”
“You speak my experience,” said Moore.
“I believed I should never see you again; and I grew so thin. I could do
nothing, and I could not eat. Yet you see I am better.”
“I am too feeble to say what I feel; but while you speak I do feel.”
“Here I am at your side, where I thought never more to be. You look at
me kindly. I despaired of that.”
Moore sighed – a sigh so deep it was nearly a groan. “May I be spared to
make atonement.”
“For what?”
“We will not touch on it now, Cary. Was Mrs. Pryor with you during your
illness?”
“Yes.” Caroline smiled brightly. “You know she is my mamma?”
“I have heard – Hortense told me. Does she make you happy?”
“What! mamma? She is dear to me; how dear I cannot say. I was
altogether weary, and she held me up.”
“That is a coal of fire heaped on my head; and so is every word you
address to me. Come nearer, Lina; give me your hand – if my thin fingers do
not scare you.”
She took those thin fingers; she bent her head and touched them to her
lips. Moore was much moved. A tear coursed down his hollow cheek.
“I’ll keep these things in my heart, Cary; that kiss I will put by, and you
shall hear of it again one day.”
“Come out!” cried Martin, opening the door – “come away; you have had
twenty minutes.”
“She will not stir yet, you hempseed.”
“I dare not stay longer, Robert.”
“Can you promise to return?”
“No, she can’t,” responded Martin. “The thing mustn’t become
customary; I’ll not have it repeated.”
“You’ll not have it repeated?”
“Hush! don’t vex him,” urged Caroline; “we could not have met today but
for him. But I will come again, if you wish.”
“It is my one wish.”
“Come away this minute. My mother has coughed, and got up. Let her
only catch you on the stairs, Miss Caroline! You’re not to bid him good-bye,
you are to march.”
Martin made them part. He half carried Caroline down the stairs, and
wrapped her shawl round her, and if his mother’s tread had not then creaked in
the gallery, and diffidence held him back, he would have claimed his reward.
He would have said, “Now, Miss Caroline, for all this give me one kiss.” But
she was already across the snowy road.
“She is my debtor, and I will be paid.” He flattered himself that it was
opportunity, not boldness, which had failed him. He misjudged the quality of
his own nature, and held it for something lower than it was.
↑

Chapter 34

CASE OF DOMESTIC PERSECUTION – REMARKABLE
INSTANCE OF PIOUS PERSEVERANCE IN THE DISCHARGE
OF RELIGIOUS DUTIES


Martin, having tasted excitement and power, wanted more. Miss Helstone
– that girl he had always called ugly, and whose face was now perpetually
before him – had come within his sphere. It fretted him to think the visit might
never be repeated.
Martin was no ordinary schoolboy; he was destined to grow up an
original. A few years later he took great pains to pare and polish himself down
to the pattern of the rest of the world, but he never succeeded. He now cast
about in his mind for the means of adding another chapter to his romance. He
did not yet know how many life-romances are doomed never to get beyond the
first or second chapter.
He had an irreligious dislike of Sunday. His father and mother never
failed to fill their large pew in Briarfield Church with their whole family. The
morning service was long, and the sermon usually little to Martin’s taste. This
Saturday afternoon, however, his woodland musings disclosed to him a newfound charm in the coming day.
It proved a day of deep snow – so deep that during breakfast Mrs. Yorke
announced that the children, instead of going to church, should sit silent for two
hours in the parlour, while Rose and Martin read John Wesley’s “Sermons”.
“Rose will do as she pleases,” said Martin, not looking up from his book.
“Rose will do as she is told, and Martin too,” said the mother.
“I am going to church.” So her son replied quietly, like a true Yorke, who
knows his will and means to have it.
“It is not fit weather,” said the father.
No answer. The youth read studiously; he slowly broke his bread and
sipped his milk.
“Martin hates to go to church, but he hates still more to obey,” said Mrs.
Yorke.
“I am not influenced by pure perverseness, but by a complication of
motives, the intricacies of which I should as soon think of explaining to you as I
should of turning myself inside out to exhibit the internal machinery of my
frame.”
“Hear Martin! hear him!” cried Mr. Yorke. “I must have this lad of mine
brought up to be a lawyer. He has the self-conceit, and words – words – words.”
“Some bread, Rose, if you please,” requested Martin with intense gravity.
He rang the bell, and gently asked for his walking-shoes.
“But, Martin,” urged his father, “there are snowdrifts all the way; a man
could hardly wade through. However, lad, go to church by all means. There is a
pitiless wind, and a sharp, frozen sleet. Go out into it, since thou prefers it to a
warm fireside.”
Martin quietly put on his cloak, scarf and cap, and went out.
“My father has more sense than my mother,” he pronounced. “How
women miss their aim!”
He reached church early.
“Now, if the weather frightens her, or if that Mrs. Pryor objects to her
going out, it will vex me; but, hail or ice, she ought to come. She will be here
for the chance of seeing me, as I am here for the chance of seeing her. She will
want to get a word about her confounded sweetheart, as I want to get another
taste of adventure.”
He looked round at the cold, empty church. As the bell tolled slowly,
elderly parishioners came in, and took the humblest seats. It is always the
frailest, the oldest, and poorest that brave the worst weather to attend church.
This wild morning not one affluent family appeared: all the cushioned pews
were empty; only on the bare oak seats sat the grey-haired elders and paupers.
“I’ll scorn her if she doesn’t come,” muttered Martin savagely to himself.
The rector’s shovel-hat had passed the porch. Mr. Helstone and his clerk were
in the vestry.
The bells ceased – the doors were closed – the service began. She was not
there. Martin scorned her.
“Worthless, vapid thing! Like all girls – weakly, selfish, shallow! She is
not like our picture at all. Her eyes are not large and expressive; her mouth has
not that charm I thought it had. What is she? A thread-paper, a doll, a toy; a
girl, in short.”
So absorbed was the young cynic he forgot to rise from his knees at the
proper place. He started up red (for he was sensitive to ridicule). To make the
matter worse, the church door had reopened, and the aisles were filling: patter,
patter, patter, a hundred little feet trotted in. It was the Sunday scholars.
According to Briarfield winter custom, these children had till now been kept
where there was a warm stove, and only led into church just before the
communion and sermon.
The little ones were settled first, and at last a tall class of young women
came quietly in, closing the procession. Their teacher, having seen them seated,
passed into the rectory pew. The French-grey cloak was known to Martin. Miss
Helstone had come to church in the storm after all. Martin probably whispered
his satisfaction to his hymn book; at any rate, he hid his face there for two
minutes.
Satisfied or not, he had time to get angry with her again before the sermon
was over. She had never once looked his way.
“If she takes no notice of me, I shall have a worse opinion of her than
ever. It would be despicable of her just to come for the sake of those sheepfaced Sunday scholars.”
The sermon ended; the congregation dispersed. She had not been near
him.
Now, indeed, as Martin set his face homeward, he felt that the sleet was
sharp and the east wind cold.
His nearest way lay through some untrodden fields. Near the second stile
rose a clump of trees. Was that an umbrella waiting there? Yes, an umbrella,
held with difficulty against the blast; behind it fluttered a French-grey cloak.
Martin grinned as he toiled up the steep field. He seated himself coolly upon the
stile, and said:
“I think you had better strike a bargain. Exchange me for Mrs. Pryor.”
“I hoped you would come this way, Martin. There is no chance of getting
a quiet word spoken in the church or churchyard.”
“Will you agree? Exchange me for Mrs. Pryor?”
“As if I could understand you! What puts Mrs. Pryor into your head?”
“You call her ‘mamma,’ don’t you? She is so careless a mamma, I should
be five times better. You may laugh. You have pretty teeth, as pretty as a pearl
necklace.”
“Martin, what now? I thought the Yorkes never paid compliments?”
“They have not done till now; but I feel I should start a new variety of the
Yorke species. I am rather tired of my own ancestors.”
“You are a very strange, unaccountable boy, Martin.”
“But Mrs. Pryor must be the most unnatural mamma in existence, to let
her daughter come out in this weather.”
“Mamma was very much concerned about me; but I was obstinate. I
would go. I thought of nothing else but seeing you. I thought the snow would
stop you. You don’t know how pleased I was to see you by yourself in the
pew.”
“I came to set the parish a good example. And so you were obstinate,
were you? I should like to see you obstinate. Let me take the umbrella.”
“I can’t stay two minutes; our dinner will be ready.”
“And so will ours; and we have always a hot dinner on Sundays. Roast
goose today, with apple-pie and rice-pudding; but I’ll make the sacrifice, if you
will.”
“We have a cold dinner on the Sabbath. But I must return; the house
would be in commotion if I failed to appear. Martin, how is Mr. Moore? Come,
tell me quickly.”
“Hang him! he is no worse; but as ill-used as ever – kept in solitary
confinement. Horsfall starves him; you saw how thin he was.”
“You were very good the other day, Martin. When will you be so good
again?”
“I see what you are after; but you’ll not wheedle me. The business gave
me far too much trouble.”
“But Mr. Moore wishes to see me, Martin, and I wish to see him.”
“I dare say” (coolly).
“Well, if you won’t help me, I’ll manage without help.”
“Do; there is nothing like self-reliance.”
“I have no time to reason with you now; but I consider you provoking.
Good-morning.”
Away she went, the umbrella shut, for she could not carry it against the
wind.
“She is not vapid; she is not shallow,” said Martin. “I shall like to see how
she will work her way without help. I have had a pleasant morning. She
expected to coax me at once, but she’ll not manage it. She shall come again,
and yet again. It would please me to put her in a passion – to make her cry. I
want to discover how far she will go – what she will dare to get her will. It
seems strange and new to find one human being thinking so much about
another as she thinks about Moore. But it is time to go home; I am hungry.
We’ll see whether Matthew or I shall get the largest slice of apple-pie today.”
↑

Chapter 35

WHEREIN MATTERS MAKE SOME PROGRESS, BUT NOT
MUCH


Martin had planned well. But older and wiser schemers than he are often
doomed to see their finest-spun projects swept to annihilation by the sudden
broom of Fate. In this instance, the broom was made out of the tough fibres of
Moore’s own stubborn purpose. Moore was now resuming his strength, and
making strange headway against Mrs. Horsfall. Each morning he amazed that
matron with fresh astonishment. First he told her he would dress himself. Then
he refused the coffee she brought him; he would breakfast with the family.
Lastly, he forbade her his chamber.
The morning after, he followed Mr. Yorke to his counting-house, and
requested a chaise be fetched from the Red House Inn. He was resolved, he
said, to return home to the Hollow that very afternoon. Mr. Yorke, instead of
opposing, aided him. The chaise was sent for, though Mrs. Yorke declared the
step would be his death. Moore, little disposed to speak, expressed his gratitude
to the servants and to Mrs. Horsfall by the chink of his coin. At this, the latter
and her patient parted the best friends in the world.
Next Moore betook himself to the parlour. He had Mrs. Yorke to appease;
she sat plunged in sullen dudgeon, speculating gloomily on the depths of man’s
ingratitude. He bent over her; she was obliged to look up. There was beauty still
in his pale, wasted features; there was earnestness and a sort of sweetness in his
hollow eyes.
“Good-bye!” he said, smiling. “You have been a mother to me; give your
wilful son one embrace.”
She kissed him. “Who is to nurse you at Hollow’s Cottage? Your sister
Hortense knows no more about such matters than a child.”
“Thank God! I have had nursing enough to last me my life.”
Here the little girls came in – Jessie crying, Rose quiet but grave. Moore
took them into the hall, out of their mother’s sight, to soothe them; for their
mother could not bear to see any living thing caressed but herself.
The boys were standing about the chaise as Moore entered it; but for them
he had no farewell. To Mr. Yorke he only said, “That was an unlucky shot for
you, Yorke; it turned Briarmains into a hospital. Come and see me at the
cottage soon.”
The chaise rolled away. In half an hour he alighted at his own garden
gate. Having dismissed the vehicle, he leaned on that gate an instant, to rest and
muse.
“Six months ago I left here,” said he, “a proud, angry, disappointed man. I
come back sadder and wiser. A cold, grey world lies round – a world where, if I
hope little, I fear nothing. If the worst comes, I can work, as Joe Scott does, for
an honourable living. Formerly, financial ruin was dishonour in my eyes. It is
not so now. Ruin is an evil, but one for which I am prepared. I have calculated
that I can put it off six months – not an hour longer. If things by that time alter,
I might conquer yet. But that thought is madness; let me see matters with sane
eyes. Ruin will come, lay her axe to my fortune’s roots, and hew them down. I
shall snatch a sapling, cross the sea, and plant it in American woods. Louis will
go with me. None but Louis? I cannot tell – I have no right to ask.”
He entered the house.
It was twilight out of doors; indoors it was already dark. Sarah had lit a
good fire in the parlour, and was preparing tea in the kitchen.
“Hortense,” said Moore, as his sister bustled over to help him off with his
cloak, “I am pleased to come home.”
Although he had never before called the cottage his home, Hortense did
not feel the novelty of this. Still, she was pleased that he was pleased.
He sat down, but soon rose again. He went to the window; he came back
to the fire.
“Hortense! This little parlour looks very clean and pleasant.”
“I have had the whole house thoroughly cleaned in your absence,
brother.”
“Sister, I think you ought to have a friend or so to tea, if only to see how
fresh and spruce you have made the little place.”
”True, brother. If it were not late I might send for Miss Mann.”
“So you might; but it is too late to disturb that good lady, and too cold for
her to come out. I want some quiet guest today, who would tire neither of us.”
“Miss Ainley?”
“An excellent person; but she lives too far off. Tell Harry Scott to step up
to the rectory with a request from you that Caroline Helstone should come and
spend the evening.”
“Would it not be better tomorrow, dear brother?”
“I should like her to see the place as it is just now; its brilliant cleanliness
and perfect neatness are so much to your credit.”
“It might benefit her in the way of example.”
The note was duly written and addressed to Miss Helstone. Very soon the
messenger returned, and with him the guest.
She entered through the kitchen, quietly tripped upstairs to take off her
bonnet and furs, and came down as quietly, with her beautiful curls smoothed,
her graceful merino dress trim and spotless, her gay little work-bag in her hand.
She lingered to exchange a few kindly words with Sarah, and to look at the new
kitten basking on the kitchen hearth, and then she went into the parlour.
The friendly welcome was of the tranquil sort that befitted cousins
meeting; a quiet pleasure diffused itself through the room; the tray and the
singing urn were brought in.
“I am pleased to come home,” repeated Mr. Moore.
They assembled round the table. Hortense chiefly talked. She
congratulated Caroline on the improvement in her health. Her colour and her
plump cheeks were returning, she remarked. It was true. There was an obvious
change in Miss Helstone: no longer crushed and saddened, she looked like one
who had been lifted on the wing of hope.
After tea Hortense went upstairs. She had not rummaged her drawers for a
month, and the impulse to perform that operation was now irresistible. During
her absence Caroline took up the conversation with ease; her elegance of
language gave fresh charm to familiar topics; a new music in the soft voice
gently surprised the listener; her face was kindled with animation.
“Caroline, you look as if you had heard good tidings,” said Moore, after
gazing at her for some minutes.
“Do I?”
“I sent for you this evening that I might be cheered; but you cheer me
more than I had calculated.”
“I am glad of that. It is pleasant to be here again.”
“Truly it is. And to see health on your cheek and hope in your eye is
pleasant, Cary; but what is the source of this sunshine I perceive about you?”
“For one thing, I am happy in mamma. I love her so much, and she loves
me. Long and tenderly she nursed me. Now I say it is my turn to attend to her.
You would laugh if you knew what pleasure I have in making dresses and
sewing for her. She looks so nice now, Robert; I will not let her be oldfashioned. And she is charming to talk to – full of wisdom, observant, rich in
information. Every day I like her better, I love her more tenderly.”
“You talk in such a way about ‘mamma’ it is enough to make one jealous
of the old lady.”
“She is not old, Robert.”
“Well, of the matron. But you said mamma’s affection was one thing that
made you happy; now for the other thing.”
“I am glad you are better.”
“What besides?”
“I am glad we are friends. I once thought we never should be.”
“Cary, some day I mean to tell you a thing about myself that is not to my
credit.”
“Ah, don’t! I cannot bear to think ill of you.”
“And I cannot bear that you should think better of me than I deserve.”
“Well, I half know your ‘thing;’ indeed, I believe I know all about it.”
“Whom does it concern besides me?”
She coloured; she hesitated.
“Speak, Cary! There is none present but ourselves. Whisper, Cary.”
Still she would not speak. Seeing that Moore waited, she at last said,
“Miss Keeldar spent a day at the rectory about a week ago. The evening came
on very wintry, and we persuaded her to stay all night.”
“And you and she curled your hair together?”
“How do you know that?”
“And then you chattered, and she told you–”
“It was not at curling-hair time, so you are not as wise as you think; and,
besides, she didn’t tell me. We slept in the same bed, although we did not sleep
much; we talked the whole night through.”
“I’ll be sworn you did! And then it all came out.”
“You are quite wrong. She did not tell me; but I inferred something, and I
gathered more from rumour, and I made out the rest by instinct.”
“But if she did not tell you that I wanted to marry her for the sake of her
money, and that she refused me indignantly and scornfully (you need not blush;
that is the plain truth) – if such was not the subject of her confidences, what
was? You say you talked the whole night through; what about?”
“About things we never thoroughly discussed before; but you hardly
expect I should tell you?”
“Yes, Cary; you said we were friends, and friends should always confide
in each other.”
“But you are sure you won’t repeat it? Not even to Louis?”
“Not even to Louis. What does Louis care for young ladies’ secrets?”
“Robert, Shirley is a curious being. She does not often show her feelings;
but when they rush out, river-like, full and powerful, you gaze, you wonder;
you admire, and – I think – love her. At dead of night, when all the house was
silent, and starlight and the cold reflection from the snow glimmered in our
chamber, then I saw Shirley’s heart – her heart’s core. It was like a shrine, for it
was holy and pure; like flame, for it was warm, and strong.”
“Can she love? She has loved none that have loved her yet.” And Moore
named a list of gentlemen, closing with Sir Philip Nunnely.
“She has loved none of these.”
“Yet some of them were worthy of a woman’s affection,” argued Moore.
“Of some women’s, but not of Shirley’s.”
“Is she better than others of her sex?”
“She is peculiar, and more dangerous to take rashly as a wife.”
“I can imagine that.”
“She spoke of you – not in the way you imagined; but I made her tell me
what she felt towards you. I wanted to know.”
“She thinks of me contemptuously, no doubt?”
“She thinks of you almost as highly as a woman can think of a man. Till
you shocked her (she said you had shocked her, but she would not tell me how)
she felt as a sister fondly feels towards a brother.”
“That is nonsense. She is too rich and proud to see me as a brother.”
“You don’t know her, Robert; and, somehow, I fancy that you cannot
know her. You and she will never thoroughly understand each other.”
“Maybe. I admire her; but I believe she is incapable of love–”
“Shirley incapable of love!”
“And that she will never marry. She will not relinquish her power or her
pride.”
“She hurt your feelings.”
“She did; though I had not a spark of tenderness or passion for her.”
“Then, Robert, it was very wicked in you to want to marry her.”
“She is very pretty. I acknowledge all her charms and feel none of them,
or only in a way she would disdain. I suppose I was tempted by the gilding of
the bait. Caroline, what a noble fellow your Robert is!”
“He made a great blunder once, and we will hear no more about it. We
will remember that we too shall be judged, and so we will give no scorn, only
affection.”
“Which won’t satisfy me, I warn you. Something besides affection –
something far stronger, sweeter, warmer – will be demanded one day. Is it there
to give?”
Caroline was much moved.
“Be calm, Lina,” said Moore soothingly. “I have no right or intention to
perturb your mind for months to come. Do not tremble; look me in the face. See
what a poor, pale, grim phantom I am – more pitiable than formidable.”
She looked shyly. “There is something formidable still, pale as you are,”
she said.
“To return to Shirley,” pursued Moore: “is it your opinion that she is ever
likely to marry?”
“She loves.”
“Platonically – theoretically – all humbug!”
“She loves sincerely. No confession of love passed her lips; but the
feeling showed itself in spite of her. She spoke of one man in a way that could
not be misunderstood. Having asked her opinion of you, I demanded a second
opinion of – another person about whom I had made puzzled conjectures. I was
determined to make her speak, and at last out it came, in a whisper, and yet with
such soft vehemence. I am sure that man’s happiness is as dear to her as her
own life.”
“Who is it?”
“I charged her with being in love. She just looked at me. It was quite
enough. The lioness has found her captor.”
“And who, pray, is the hero who has achieved such a conquest?”
“You still speak cynically; but I will make you change your note before I
have done.”
“We will see. What is his name, Cary?”
“Guess it.”
“Is it any one in this neighbourhood?”
“Yes, in Briarfield parish.”
“I don’t know a soul in Briarfield parish her equal. I suppose she is under
a delusion, and will plunge into some absurdity, after all.”
Caroline smiled.
“Do you approve the choice?” asked Moore.
“Quite.”
“Then I am puzzled; for you have a correct, steady judgment, inherited
from ‘mamma,’ I suppose.”
“I quite approve, and mamma was charmed.”
“Mrs. Pryor charmed! It can’t be romantic, then?”
“It is romantic, but it is also right.”
“Tell me, Cary; I am too weak to be tantalized.”
“You shall be tantalized – it will do you no harm; you are not so weak as
you pretend.”
“I have twice this evening had some thoughts of falling on the floor at
your feet and worshipping you downright. My mother was a Roman Catholic.
You look like the loveliest of her pictures of the Virgin. I think I will embrace
her faith and kneel and adore.”
“Robert, sit still; don’t be absurd, or I will go to Hortense.”
“You have stolen my senses. Heavenly rose, queen of angels!”
“Sit quietly, and guess your riddle. I’ll tell you what mamma said:
‘Depend upon it, my dear, such a choice will make the happiness of Miss
Keeldar’s life.’”
“I’ll guess once, and no more. It is old Helstone. Shirley is going to be
your aunt.”
“I’ll tell my uncle!” cried Caroline, laughing gleefully. “Guess again,
Robert.”
“It is the parson – Hall.”
“Indeed, no; he is mine, if you please.”
“Yours! Ay, all the women in Briarfield seem to idolise that priest. I
wonder why; he is bald and grey-haired. I’ll guess no more – I am tired. Miss
Keeldar may marry the Grand Turk for all I care.”
“Must I whisper?”
“Quickly. Here comes Hortense.”
She whispered. Robert gave a start, and a brief laugh. Miss Moore
entered, and Sarah followed behind. The hour of converse was over.
Robert found a moment to exchange a few more whispered sentences as
Caroline put on her shawl before departing.
“Must I forgive Shirley now?” he asked.
“Forgive her? Naughty Robert! Was she in the wrong, or were you?”
“Must I at length love her, Cary?”
Caroline looked up keenly. “Indeed, you must not; the idea is perverse.”
“But she is handsome. Hers is a beauty that grows on you. You think her
but graceful when you first see her; you discover her to be beautiful when you
have known her for a year.”
“Now, Robert, be good.”
“O Cary, I have no love to give. Were the goddess of beauty to woo me, I
could not meet her advances. I have no heart which I can call mine.”
“So much the better; you are a great deal safer without. Good-night.”
“Why must you always go, Lina, at the very instant when I most want you
to stay? One more word. Take care of your own heart – do you hear me?”
“There is no danger.”
“I am not convinced of that. The parson, for one: Cyril Hall.”
“As to you, you have been flirting with Miss Mann. She showed me the
other day a plant you had given her. Goodbye, Robert.”
↑

Chapter 36

WRITTEN IN THE SCHOOLROOM


Louis Moore’s doubts whether Mr. Sympson would leave immediately
turned out to be well founded. The day after the grand quarrel about Sir Philip
Nunnely, a sort of reconciliation was patched up between uncle and niece.
Shirley, who could never find it in her heart to be inhospitable (except to Mr.
Donne), earnestly begged the family to stay a little longer. Indeed, the uncle
could not bring himself to leave her unwatched – at full liberty to marry Robert
Moore as soon as that gentleman should be able to resume his courtship. So
they all stayed.
In his first rage against the house of Moore, Mr. Sympson had behaved
towards Mr. Louis so insolently that the tutor had promptly resigned his post,
and could be induced to resume it only until the family should quit Yorkshire.
Louis was persuaded by Mrs. Sympson’s entreaties and his own attachment to
his pupil; and probably he had a third motive. He would have found it very hard
indeed to leave Fieldhead just now.
Things went on pretty smoothly. Miss Keeldar’s health and spirits were
re-established. Moore had relieved her from every nervous apprehension; and
her fear seemed to have taken wing. Her heart became as light as a child’s, that
trusts all responsibility to its parents. Louis and William Farren, on making
inquiries, had concluded that the dog Phœbe was not mad – that it was only illusage which had driven her from home. Right or wrong, it is certain that in her
case the bite proved innocuous.
November passed; December came. The Sympsons were now really
departing, to be at home for Christmas. They were to leave in a few days. One
winter evening, during the last week of their stay, Louis Moore again took out
his notebook, and wrote in it as follows:
“She is lovelier than ever. Since that little cloud was dispelled all the
wanness has vanished, and with the magical energy of youth she blooms again.
“After breakfast this morning, when I had seen her, and listened to her,
and felt her in every atom of my frame, I went into the chill drawing-room.
There I read a poem or two; whether the spell was in me or in the verse I know
not, but my heart filled, my pulse rose, I glowed. I, too, am young as yet. I am
barely thirty, and there are moments when life beams sweetly upon me.
“It was time to go to the schoolroom. It is rather pleasant of a morning,
when the sun shines through the low lattice; the books are in order, and the
fireplace is clean. There I found Henry and Miss Keeldar together.
“I said she was lovelier than ever. She is. A delicate rose opens on her
cheek. Her eye, always dark and clear, speaks now as angels must have
communed when there was ‘silence in heaven.’ Her hair is soft as shadow; the
shoulders they fall on wear a goddess grace. Once I only saw her beauty, but
now I feel it.
“Henry was repeating his lesson to her before bringing it to me. He held
her hand as he recited. That boy gets more than his share of privileges. What
indulgence she shows him! If this went on, Henry in a few years would offer his
soul on her altar, as I have offered mine.
“I saw her eyelid flutter when I came in, but she did not look up; now she
hardly ever gives me a glance. She rarely speaks to me either, and when I am
present, she says little to others. In my gloomy moments I attribute this change
to indifference and aversion. In my sunny intervals I give it another meaning. I
say, were I her equal, I could find in this shyness love. Dare I look for it? What
could I do with it if found?
“This morning I dared at least contrive an hour’s communion with her. I
called Henry to the door, and said, ‘Go where you will, my boy; but, till I call
you, return not here.’
“Henry, I could see, did not like his dismissal. That boy is young, but a
thinker; his meditative eye shines on me strangely sometimes. He half feels
what links me to Shirley; the young, lame, half-grown lion would growl at me
now and then, because I have tamed his lioness, if the habit of discipline and his
affection did not subdue him. Go, Henry; be grateful that your love is
overlooked thus early, before it becomes passion. An hour’s fret will suffice to
express what you feel.
“I took my usual seat at the desk, with my usual outward calm. No one
who looks at my slow face can guess the vortex sometimes whirling in my
heart, engulfing thought and wrecking prudence. But I would not alarm her by
one eccentric movement; at present I would not utter one word of love, or
reveal one glimpse of the fire that burns me. Presumptuous I will never be. I
would rather part and leave her, and seek, on the other side of the globe, a new
life, cold and barren as the wave-washed rock. My plan this morning was to
scrutinise her – to read a line in the page of her heart. Before I left I was
determined to know what I was leaving.
“I had some quills to make into pens. My hands went to work steadily,
and my voice, when I spoke, was firm.
“‘This day week you will be alone at Fieldhead, Miss Keeldar.’
“‘Yes: I rather think my uncle will go this time. He is not pleased with
me.’
“‘In his way Mr. Sympson honestly wished you well. All he has done he
believed to be for the best.’
“‘You are kind to defend a man who has treated you with so much
insolence.’
“‘I never feel shocked at what is spoken in character; and most perfectly
in character was that vulgar and violent onset against me, when he had quitted
you.’
“‘You cease now to be Henry’s tutor?’
“‘I shall be parted from Henry for a while (though we shall meet again
somehow, for we love each other) and leave the Sympson family for ever.
Happily this change does not leave me stranded; it merely hurries on plans long
formed.’
“‘Nothing finds you off your guard. I was sure you would be calmly
prepared for sudden change. I always think you are like a solitary but watchful,
thoughtful archer in a wood. Such too is your brother. You two might be
homeless hunters in the loneliest western wilds; all would be well with you. The
hewn tree would make you a hut, the cleared forest would yield you fields, the
buffalo would feel your rifle-shot.’
“‘And an Indian tribe would afford us brides, perhaps?’
“‘No’ (hesitating), ‘I think not. I hope you would neither of you share
your hearth with that to which you could not give your heart.’
“‘What suggested the wild West to your mind, Miss Keeldar? Have you
entered my day-dreams, and beheld my brain at work?’
“She had torn a slip of paper into fragments, and threw morsel by morsel
into the fire, pensively watching them burn. She did not speak.
“‘How did you learn my intentions?’
“‘I am only discovering them now. I spoke at hazard.’
“‘Your hazard sounds like divination. A tutor I will never be again. I am
now a man of thirty; I have never been free since I was a boy of ten. I have such
a thirst for freedom, such a deep passion and longing to win her, I will not
refuse to cross the Atlantic for her sake; her I will follow deep into virgin
woods. I know no woman whom I love that would accompany me; but I am
certain Liberty will await me, sitting under a pine; and when I call her, she shall
fill my arms.’
“She was moved. I meant to move her. She could not answer me, nor look
at me. Her cheek glowed. On the dark lashes of her downcast eye trembled all
that is graceful in half-painful, half-pleasing shame.
“Soon she took her feelings under command, and sat down. I could read
her face. It said, I see the line which is my limit; nothing shall make me cross it.
I know how far I may reveal my feelings. I have advanced as far as my nature
permits; now here I stand rooted. My heart may break if it is baffled; let it
break. It shall never dishonour me!
“I, for my part, said to myself, ‘If she were poor, I would be at her feet; if
she were lowly, I would take her in my arms. But her gold and her lofty station
are two griffins that guard her on each side. Love looks and longs, and dares
not; Passion hovers, and is kept at bay; Truth and Devotion are scared. There is
no sacrifice to make in winning her. It is all clear gain, and therefore
unimaginably difficult.’
“Difficult or not, I had to say something. I could not sit silent with all that
beauty modestly mute in my presence. I spoke with quiet calm.
“‘Still, I know I shall be strangely placed with that mountain nymph
Liberty. She is, I suspect, akin to that Solitude which I once wooed, and from
which I now seek a divorce. These nymphs have an unearthly charm, like some
starlight evening; they inspire a wild but not warm delight; their beauty is the
beauty of spirits, of nature. Theirs is the dewy bloom of morning, the languid
flush of evening, the peace of the moon, the changefulness of clouds. I want
something different. This elfish splendour looks chill to my vision, and feels
frozen to my touch. I am not a poet; I cannot live with abstractions. Glorious as
Nature is, and deeply as I worship her, I would rather behold her through the
soft human eyes of a loved and lovely wife than through the wild orbs of the
highest goddess of Olympus.’
“‘Juno could not cook a buffalo steak as you like it,’ said she.
“‘She could not; but I will tell you who could – some young, penniless,
friendless orphan girl. I wish I could find such a one – pretty enough for me to
love, honest and modest. I care nothing for attainments, but I would fain have
the germ of those sweet natural powers which nothing acquired can rival; I can
manage the hottest temper that Fate wills. To such a creature I should like to be
first tutor and then husband. I would teach her my language, my habits and my
principles, and then I would reward her with my love.’
“‘Reward her, lord of the creation – reward her!’“ exclaimed she, with a
curled lip.
“‘And be repaid a thousandfold.’
“‘If she willed it, monseigneur.’
“‘And she should will it.’
“‘You have stipulated for any temper Fate wills. Compulsion is flint and a
blow to the metal of some souls.’
“‘And love is the spark it elicits.’
“‘Who cares for the love that is only a spark?’
“‘I must find my orphan girl. Tell me how, Miss Keeldar.’
“‘Advertise; and be sure you add that she must be a good plain cook.’
“‘I must find her; and when I find her I shall marry her.’
“‘Not you!’ and her voice took a sudden accent of peculiar scorn.
“I liked this. I had roused her from her pensive mood.
“‘Why doubt it?’ I said. ‘Of course I shall marry. Nothing is more
evident.’
“‘The contrary is evident, Mr. Moore.’
“She charmed me in this mood – disdainful pride lit her large fine eye,
that had just now the look of a falcon’s.
“‘How will you manage to marry, I wonder?’ she went on. “‘Accept
celibacy as your doom!’
“‘You cannot give what I already have. Celibacy has been mine for thirty
years. If you wish to offer me a parting gift, it must be something else.’
“‘Take worse, then!’
“‘How – what?’
“I now felt and spoke eagerly. I was unwise to lose my calm even for an
instant; it deprived me of an advantage. The little spark of temper dissolved in a
mocking smile.
“‘Look for any stout widow that has had a few husbands already.’
“‘She must not be rich. Oh, these riches!’
“‘Yours is the monstrous pride which counterfeits humility.’
“‘I am a dependant; I know my place.’
“‘I am a woman; I know mine.’
“‘I am poor; I must be proud.’
“‘I have obligations as stringent as yours.’
 “We had reached a critical point now, and we halted and looked at each
other. She would not give in, I felt. A few moments yet were mine, before the
end came. I would dally, wait, talk, and when impulse urged I would act. I am
never in a hurry; I never was in a hurry in my whole life. I proceeded:
“‘Apparently, Miss Keeldar, you are as little likely to marry as myself. I
know you have refused four advantageous offers, and, I believe, a fifth. Have
you rejected Sir Philip Nunnely?’
“‘Did you think I should take him?’
“‘I thought you might.’
“‘On what grounds, may I ask?’
“‘Conformity of rank, age, pleasing contrast of temper – for he is mild
and amiable – harmony of intellectual tastes.’
“‘A beautiful sentence! Let us take it to pieces. “Conformity of rank.” He
is quite above me. I am disdained by his family. “Suitability of age.” We were
born in the same year; consequently he is still a boy, while I am a woman – ten
years his senior to all intents and purposes. “Contrast of temper.” Mild and
amiable, is he; what am I? Tell me.’
“‘Sister of the bright, quick, fiery leopard.’
“‘And you would mate me with a lamb? Unjust! “Harmony of intellectual
tastes.” He is fond of poetry, and I hate it–’
“‘Do you? That is news.’
“‘I absolutely shudder at the sound of rhyme from Sir Philip. Harmony,
indeed! When did I whip up syllabub sonnets or string together penny-bead
stanzas in the belief that they were genuine jewels?’
“‘You might have the satisfaction of improving his tastes.’
“‘Pah! my husband is not to be my baby. I am not to set him his daily
lesson, and give him a sugar-plum if he is good, and a patient, pathetic lecture if
he is bad. Being a tutor, I suppose you think it the finest employment in the
world. I don’t. I reject it. Improving a husband! No. I shall insist upon my
husband improving me, or else we part.’
“‘God knows it is needed!’
“‘What do you mean by that, Mr. Moore?’
“‘What I say. Improvement is imperatively needed.’
“‘If you were a woman you would improve your husband charmingly. It
would suit you; schooling is your vocation.’
“‘May I ask whether, in your present just and gentle mood, you mean to
taunt me with being a tutor?’
“‘Yes, bitterly; and with anything else you please – any defect of which
you are painfully conscious.’
“‘With being poor, for instance?’ I asked.
“‘Of course. You are sore about your poverty.’
“‘About having nothing but a plain face to offer the woman who may
master my heart?’
“‘Exactly. You are sensitive about your features because they are not
quite on an Apollo pattern. You abase them in the faint hope that others may
say a word in their behalf – which won’t happen. Your face is nothing to boast
of, certainly. It looks like a god of Egypt – a great sand-buried stone head. No, I
will compare it to nothing so lofty. It looks like Tartar. You are my mastiff’s
cousin.’
“‘Tartar is your dear companion. In summer, when you rise early, and run
out into the fields, you always call him to follow you, sometimes with a whistle
that you learned from me. In the solitude of your wood, when you think nobody
but Tartar is listening, you whistle the very tunes you learnt from my lips, or
sing the very songs you have caught up from my voice. In the winter evenings
Tartar lies at your feet. You allow him to rest his head on your lap; you let him
lie on the edge of your gown. His rough hide is familiar with the feel of your
hand. I once saw you kiss him on his forehead. It is dangerous to say I am like
Tartar; I may claim to be treated like Tartar.’
“‘Perhaps, sir, you can extort as much from your penniless young orphan
girl, when you find her.’
“‘Oh, could I find her as I imagine her! Something to tame first, and teach
afterwards; to break in, and then to fondle. To lift the destitute proud thing out
of poverty; to influence and then to be indulgent to the capricious moods that
were never influenced and indulged; to see her alternately irritated and subdued
twelve times in a day; and perhaps, eventually, to behold her the exemplary
mother of a dozen children, only now and then giving little Louis a cordial cuff
by way of paying the interest of the vast debt she owes his father. Oh, my
orphan girl would give me many a kiss; she would watch on the threshold for
my coming home, and run into my arms; she would keep my hearth bright and
warm. God bless the sweet idea! Find her I must.’
“Her eyes flashed eagerly, her lips opened; but she re-closed them, and
turned away.
“‘Tell me where she is, Miss Keeldar! I must know. You can tell me.’
“‘I never will.’ All haughtiness. She turned to leave me.
“Could I now let her part as she had always parted from me? No. I had
gone too far; I had come too near the end not to drive home to it. All the doubt,
all the indecision, must be removed, and the plain truth seen.
“‘A minute, madam,’ I said, keeping my hand on the door-handle. ‘The
last word has not been spoken yet.’
“‘May I pass?’
“‘No; I guard the door. I would almost rather die than let you leave me
just now, without speaking the word I demand.’
“‘What dare you expect me to say?’
“‘What I must and will hear; what you dare not now suppress.’
“‘Mr. Moore, I hardly know what you mean. You are not like yourself.’
“I suppose I hardly was like my usual self, for I scared her – that I could
see. It was right: she must be scared to be won.
“‘You do know what I mean, and for the first time I stand before you
myself. I have flung off the tutor, and beg to introduce you to the man.’
“She trembled. She put her hand to mine as if to remove it from the lock.
She was powerless, and receded; and again she trembled.
“What change I underwent I cannot explain. A new spirit passed into me.
I was not crushed by her riches; I thought not of them. I saw only herself – her
young beautiful form, the grace, the majesty, the modesty of her girlhood.
“‘My pupil,’ I said.
“‘My master,’ was the low answer.
“‘I have a thing to tell you.’
“She waited with bent head.
“‘I have to tell you that for four years you have been growing into your
tutor’s heart, and that you are rooted there now. I have to declare that you have
bewitched me, in spite of sense, and experience, and difference of estate. You
have so shown me your faults and your virtues – beauties rather, they are hardly
so stern as virtues – that I love you – love you with my life and strength.’
“She sought what to say, but could not find a word. I passionately
repeated that I loved her.
“‘Well, Mr. Moore, what then?’ was the answer in a tone that would have
been petulant if it had not faltered.
“‘Have you nothing to say to me? Have you no love for me?’
“‘A little bit. I want to go.’
“‘Go! What! with my heart in your hand, to lay it on your dressing-table
and pierce it with your pins? From my presence you do not stir, out of my reach
you do not stray, till I receive a hostage – your heart for mine.’
“‘The thing you want is mislaid – lost some time since. Let me go and
seek it.’
“‘Declare that it is where your keys often are – in my possession.’
“‘Where are my keys, Mr. Moore? Indeed I have lost them again; and
Mrs. Gill wants some money, and I have none, except this sixpence.’
“She took the coin out of her pocket, and showed it. I could have trifled
with her, but it would not do; life and death were at stake. Mastering at once the
sixpence and the hand that held it, I demanded, ‘Am I to die without you, or am
I to live for you?’
“‘Do as you please.’
“‘You shall tell me with your own lips whether you doom me to exile or
call me to hope.’
“‘Go; I can bear to be left.’
“‘Perhaps I too can bear to leave you. But reply, Shirley, my pupil, my
sovereign.’
“‘Die without me if you will; live for me if you dare.’
“‘I am not afraid of you, my leopardess. I dare live for and with you, from
this hour till my death. Now, then, I have you. You are mine. I will never let
you go. Wherever my home be, I have chosen my wife. If I stay in England, in
England you will stay; if I cross the Atlantic, you will cross it also. Our lives
are riveted.’
“‘And are we equal, then, sir, at last?’
“‘You are younger, frailer, feebler, more ignorant than I.’
“‘Will you be good to me, and never tyrannize?’
“‘Will you let me breathe, and not bewilder me? You must not smile. The
world swims and changes round me. The sun is a dizzying scarlet blaze, the sky
a vortex whirling over me.’
“I am a strong man, but I staggered as I spoke. All creation was
exaggerated. Colour grew more vivid, motion more rapid, life itself more vital.
I hardly saw her for a moment, but I heard her voice – pitilessly sweet.
“‘You name me leopardess. Remember, the leopardess is tameless,’ said
she.
“‘Tame or fierce, wild or subdued, you are mine.’
“‘I am glad I know my keeper and am used to him. His voice only will I
follow; his hand only shall manage me; only at his feet will I repose.’
“I wanted to hear her speak again. I could never have enough of her voice
and her words. “‘How much do you love me?’ I asked.
“‘Ah! you know. I will not gratify you. Poor Tartar!’ said she, patting my
hand; ‘poor fellow, stalwart friend, Shirley’s favourite, lie down!’
“‘I will not lie down till I am fed with one sweet word.’
“And at last she gave it.
“‘Dear Louis, be faithful to me; never leave me. I don’t care for life
unless I may pass it at your side.’
“‘Something more.’
“She gave me a change. ‘Sir,’ she said, ‘never again name such sordid
things as money, or poverty, or inequality. It will be absolutely dangerous to
torment me with these maddening scruples.’
“My face grew hot. I did once more wish I were not so poor or she were
not so rich. She saw the misery; and then, indeed, she caressed me. Along with
torment, I experienced rapture.
“‘Mr. Moore,’ said she, looking up with a sweet, open face, ‘teach me and
help me to be good. I do not ask you to take off my shoulders all the cares and
duties of property, but I ask you to share the burden, and to show me how to do
it well. Your judgment is good, your heart is kind, your principles are sound. Be
my companion through life; be my guide where I am ignorant; be my master
where I am faulty; be my friend always!’
“‘So help me God, I will!’”
Yet again a passage from the notebook, reader; if you don’t like it, pass it
over.
“The Sympsons are gone, but not before discovery. My manner must have
betrayed something, or my looks. I was quiet, but I forgot to be guarded
sometimes. I stayed longer with her than usual; I could not bear to be out of her
presence. If she left the parlour, instinctively I rose and left it too, with a vague
idea of getting a word with her in the hall. Yesterday towards dusk I had her to
myself for five minutes by the hall fire. We stood side by side, talking. The
young ladies passed, and looked at us; we did not separate. Before long they
repassed, and again looked. Mrs. Sympson came; we did not move. Mr.
Sympson opened the dining-room door. Shirley curled her lip and tossed her
tresses at him: the glance she gave was at once explanatory and defiant. It said:
‘I like Mr. Moore’s society, and I dare you to find fault with my taste.’
“I asked, ‘Do you mean him to understand how matters are?’
“‘I do,’ said she. ‘There will be a scene. I neither invite it nor fear it; only,
you must be present, for I am inexpressibly tired of facing him alone. I don’t
like to see him in a rage. He then puts off all his fine proprieties and shows the
crudity below. His ideas are not clean, Mr. Moore; I think, if he could put his
imagination in Mrs. Gill’s laundry-basket, for boiling and bleaching, it would
do him incalculable good.’
“This morning I was down early, and found her sewing in the breakfastparlour, busy finishing some little keepsake for Henry. I got only a cool
reception, which I accepted till the maid was gone, taking my book to the
window-seat. To sit with her in sight was happiness. Had I been obtrusive, I
knew she would have rebuffed me. Therefore I read on, stole now and then a
look at her, watched her countenance soften as she felt I respected her mood,
and enjoyed the gentle content of the moment.
“The distance between us shrank. Soon I was at her side, watching her
sew, listening to her merry words. We sat side by side; my arm rested on her
chair. The door suddenly opened.
“I believe, if I had started from her, she would have despised me. Thanks
to the steadiness of my nature, I did not move a muscle. I hardly looked towards
the door.
“‘Good-morning, uncle,’ said she, addressing the person who paused on
the threshold in a state of petrifaction.
“‘Have you been long downstairs, Miss Keeldar, and alone with Mr.
Moore?’
“‘Yes, a very long time. We both came down early.’
“‘The proceeding is improper–’
“‘I was rather cross at first, and not civil; but you will perceive that we
are now friends.’
“‘I perceive more than you would wish me to perceive.’
“‘Hardly, sir,’ said I; ‘we have no disguises. If you have any further
observations to make, they may as well be addressed to me. Henceforward I
stand between Miss Keeldar and all annoyance.’
“‘You! What have you to do with Miss Keeldar?’
“‘To protect, watch over, serve her.’
“‘You, sir – you, the tutor?’
“‘Not one word of insult, sir,’ interposed she; ‘not one syllable of
disrespect to Mr. Moore in this house.’
“‘Do you take his part?’
“‘His part? oh yes!’
“She turned to me with a sudden fond movement, which I met by circling
her with my arm. She and I both rose.
“‘Good God!’ was the quivering cry from the door.
“‘Come, uncle; you shall hear all. – Tell him, Louis.’
“‘I dare him to speak – the beggar! the knave! the vile, insinuating
servant! Stand apart from my niece, sir. Let her go!’
“She clung to me. ‘I am near my future husband,’ she said.
“‘Her husband! But’ (savagely) ‘you shall not have him; he shall not have
you.’
“‘I would die before I would have another.’
“Mr. Sympson uttered words with which this page shall never be polluted.
“She turned white as death; she shook all over; she lost her strength. I laid
her down on the sofa; just looked to make sure that she had not fainted – kissed
her – and then – I cannot give a clear account of what happened in the course of
the next five minutes. She has since, through tears and laughter, told me that I
turned terrible, and gave myself to the demon. She says I made one bound
across the room; that Mr. Sympson vanished through the door as if shot from a
cannon. I also vanished, and she heard Mrs. Gill scream.
“Mrs. Gill was still screaming when I came to my senses. I was then in
the oak parlour, I think. I held Sympson before me crushed into a chair, and my
hand was on his cravat. His eyes rolled in his head; the housekeeper stood
wringing her hands, begging me to stop. I did stop, feeling at once as cool as
stone. I told Mrs. Gill to fetch the chaise instantly, and informed Mr. Sympson
he must depart from Fieldhead forthwith.
“He threatened prosecution; but I cared for nothing. I remained with him
till the chaise came. I marshalled him to it, he scolding all the way. He was
terribly bewildered, as well as enraged. He would have resisted me, but knew
not how. I said his wife and daughters should follow him as soon as they could
prepare. He fumed and fretted, but he could do nothing. That man is forever
impotent. His wife, over whom he tyrannizes in trifles, guides him in matters of
importance; and I have long since earned her undying gratitude by my devotion
to her boy. In Henry’s ailments I have nursed him better, she said, than any
woman could nurse. She will never forget that.
“She and her daughters quitted me today, in mute consternation; but she
respects me. When Henry clung to my neck as I lifted him into the carriage,
when I arranged Mrs. Sympson’s wrappings to make her warm, though she
turned her head from me, I saw the tears start to her eyes. She will advocate my
cause. I am glad of this – not for my own sake, but for that of my life and idol –
my Shirley.”
Once again he writes, a week after:
“I am now at Stilbro’. I have taken up my temporary abode with a friend
– a professional man, in whose business I can be useful. Every day I ride over
to Fieldhead. How long will it be before I can call that place my home, and its
mistress mine? I am not tranquil; I am tantalized, sometimes tortured. To see
her now, one would think she had never pressed her cheek to my shoulder, or
clung to me with tenderness or trust. I feel unsafe; she renders me miserable. I
am shunned when I visit her; she withdraws from my reach.
“Today I lifted her face, resolved to get a full look into her deep, dark
eyes. Difficult to describe what I read there! Pantheress! beautiful forest-born!
tameless, peerless nature! She gnaws her chain; she dreams of her wild woods
and pines after virgin freedom. I wish Sympson would come again, and oblige
her again to entwine her arms about me. I fear any long delay…
“It is now midnight. I have spent the afternoon and evening at Fieldhead.
As she came down the oak staircase to the hall, how shyly shone her large eyes
upon me! How fugitive she looked – slim and swift as a northern aurora!
“I followed her into the drawing-room. Mrs. Pryor and Caroline Helstone
were there. In her white evening dress, with her long hair flowing full, with her
noiseless step, her eye full of night and lightning, Shirley looked, I thought,
spirit-like – the child of a breeze and a flame, the daughter of ray and raindrop –
a thing never to be arrested, fixed. I could not stop looking at her. I talked with
the other ladies as well as I could, but still I looked at her. She was very silent;
she never spoke to me.
“When she was called out for a minute by Mrs. Gill, I went into the
moonlit hall, with the aim of getting a word as she returned.
“‘Miss Keeldar, stay one instant,’ said I.
“‘Why? the hall is too cold.’
“‘It is not cold for me; at my side it should not be cold for you.’
“‘But I shiver.’
“‘With fear, I believe. What makes you fear me? You are quiet and
distant. Why?’
“‘I may well fear what looks like a great dark goblin meeting me in the
moonlight.’
“‘Do not pass! Stay with me awhile. It is three days since I spoke to you
alone. Such changes are cruel.’
“‘I have no wish to be cruel,’ she responded, softly enough; but there was
also reserve in her manner.
“‘You certainly give me pain,’ said I. ‘It is hardly a week since you called
me your future husband. Now I am once more the tutor, addressed as Mr.
Moore and sir. Your lips have forgotten Louis.’
“‘No, Louis, no.’
“‘Be cordial to Louis, then; let him approach.’
“‘I am cordial,’ said she, hovering aloof like a white shadow.
“‘You seem subdued, but still startled.’
“‘No – quite calm, and afraid of nothing,’ she assured me.
“‘Of nothing but your votary.’ I knelt on the flagstones at her feet.
“‘You see I am in a new world, Mr. Moore. I don’t know myself; I don’t
know you. But rise. When you do that, I feel troubled.’
“I obeyed, and put on serenity and confidence for her. She clung to me
again.
“‘Now, Shirley,’ I said, ‘you can conceive I am far from happy in my
present uncertain state.’
“‘You are happy!’ she cried hastily. ‘You don’t know how happy you are.
Any change will be for the worse. Louis; be patient! I like you because you are
patient.’
“‘Like me no longer, then; love me instead. Fix our marriage day; think of
it tonight, and decide.’
“She breathed an inarticulate murmur; darted, or melted, from my arms –
and I lost her.”
↑

Chapter 37

THE WINDING-UP


Yes, reader, we must settle accounts now. I have only briefly to narrate
the final fates of some of the people we have met, and then you and I must
shake hands, and for the present separate.
Let us turn to the curates – much-loved, though long-neglected. Come
forward, modest merit! Malone, I see, promptly answers.
No, Peter Augustus; we can have nothing to say to you. It won’t do. Are
you not aware, Peter, that a discriminating public does not care for the
unvarnished truth? Do you not know that the squeak of the real pig is no more
relished now than it was in days of yore? Were I to give the catastrophe of your
life and conversation, the public would sweep off in shrieking hysterics, and
there would be wild cries of “Impossible!” “Untrue!” Note well. Whenever you
present the actual truth, it is, somehow, always denounced as a lie; whereas the
product of your own imagination, the fiction, is adopted, petted, called sweetly
natural. Such is the way of the world, Peter; and as you are the legitimate
urchin, you must stand down.
Make way for Mr. Sweeting.
Here he comes, with his lady on his arm – the splendid Mrs. Sweeting,
formerly Miss Dora Sykes. They were married under the happiest auspices, Mr.
Sweeting having been just offered a comfortable living. They lived long and
happily together, beloved by their parishioners and by a numerous circle of
friends.
There! I think the varnish has been put on very nicely.
Advance, Mr. Donne.
This gentleman turned out admirably – far better than either you or I
could possibly have expected, reader. He, too, married a most sensible, quiet,
lady-like woman. The match was the making of him. He became an exemplary
domestic character, and a truly active parish priest. His little school, his little
church, his little parsonage, all owed their erection to him; and they did him
credit. Each was a model of uniformity and taste. By his own unassisted efforts
he begged all the money for these. He begged from high and low – the shoeless
cottage brat and the coroneted duke. He sent out begging-letters far and wide –
to old Queen Charlotte, her sons and daughters, the Prince Regent, Lord
Castlereagh, and every minister then in office; and, what is more remarkable, he
got something out of every one of them. Even the Prince Regent donated him
two guineas. People gave to get rid of him. After all, he did some good. He was
useful in his day.
Perhaps I ought to remark that on the premature and sudden vanishing of
Mr. Malone from the stage of Briarfield parish (you cannot know how it
happened, reader, because of your love of the pretty and pleasing), there came
as his successor another Irish curate, Mr. Macarthey. I am happy to inform you
that this gentleman did as much credit to his country as Malone had done it
discredit. He proved himself as decent, decorous, and conscientious as Peter
was rampant, boisterous, and– This last epithet I suppress, because it would let
the cat out of the bag. Mr. Macarthey laboured faithfully in the parish. The
schools flourished under his sway. His faults were proper, steady-going, clerical
faults: an invitation to tea with a Dissenter would unhinge him for a week; the
sight of a Quaker wearing his hat in church played havoc with his mental
wellbeing. Otherwise he was rational and diligent.
The justice-loving public will have remarked that I have been remiss in
pursuing, catching, and bringing to punishment the would-be assassin of Mr.
Robert Moore. Here was a fine opening to lead my willing readers a dance of
law and gospel, of the dungeon and the dock. You might have liked it, reader,
but I should not. I was happy to find that facts exonerated me from the attempt.
The murderer was never punished, because he was never caught. The
magistrates made a shuffling, as if they were going do valiant things; but since
Moore did not urge them on, they prudently resolved to let the matter quietly
drop.
Mr. Moore knew who had shot him, and all Briarfield knew. It was no
other than Michael Hartley, the half-crazed weaver. The poor soul died of
delirium tremens a year after the attempt on Moore, and Robert gave his
wretched widow a guinea to bury him.
*
The winter is over and gone; spring has followed, with flowery and
showery flight. We are now in the heart of summer – the June of 1812.
It is burning weather. The air is deep azure and red gold. It fits the time; it
fits the age; it fits the present spirit of the nations. This summer Bonaparte is in
the saddle, with his army behind him, six hundred thousand strong. He marches
on old Moscow, where the Cossack awaits him. Barbarian stoic! he waits
without fear of the boundless ruin rolling on. It is the day of vengeance. The
earth is scorched with fire; the sea becomes “as the blood of a dead man.”
In this year, Lord Wellington assumed the reins in Spain. He took
Badajos, he fought the field of Vittoria, he captured Pampeluna, he stormed San
Sebastian; he won Salamanca.
Men of Manchester, I beg your pardon for this slight résumé of warlike
facts. Lord Wellington is, for you, only a decayed old gentleman now. I think
some of you have called him a “dotard;” you have taunted him with his age and
loss of vigour. What fine heroes you are yourselves! Scoff at your ease; your
scorn can never break his grand old heart.
But come, friends, whether Quakers or cotton-printers, let us hold a
peace-congress. We arrive now at a triumph. On the 18th of June 1812 the
Orders in Council were repealed, and the blockaded ports thrown open.
Yorkshire and Lancashire shook with your shouts on that occasion. The ringers
cracked a bell in Briarfield belfry; the Association of Merchants and
Manufacturers dined together at Stilbro’, and all went home in such a plight as
their wives would never wish to witness more.
Stocks which had been accumulating for years now went off in the
twinkling of an eye. Warehouses were lightened, ships were laden; work
abounded, wages rose; the good time seemed come. These prospects might be
delusive, but they were brilliant. In that single month of June, many a solid
fortune was realized.
When a whole province rejoices, the humblest and most secluded of its
inhabitants feels festive. So Caroline Helstone thought, when she dressed
herself more carefully than usual on the day of this trading triumph, and went,
attired in her neatest muslin, to spend the afternoon at Fieldhead, to superintend
certain preparations for a great event. She decided on the wreath, the veil, and
the dress to be worn at the altar. She chose various robes and fashions for more
ordinary occasions, without much reference to the bride’s opinion – Shirley,
indeed, being in a somewhat impracticable mood.
Louis had foreseen difficulties, and he had found them. In fact, his
mistress had shown herself exquisitely provoking, putting off her marriage day
by day, week by week, month by month, rousing his whole deliberate but
determined nature to revolt against her tyranny, at once so sweet and so
intolerable.
It had needed a sort of tempest-shock to bring her to the point; but at last
she was fettered to a fixed day. There she lay, conquered by love, and bound
with a vow.
Thus vanquished and chained, she pined. Her captor alone could cheer
her; in his absence she sat or wandered alone, spoke little, and ate less.
She furthered no preparations for her nuptials; Louis was himself obliged
to direct all arrangements. He was virtually master of Fieldhead weeks before
he actually became so – the least presumptuous master that ever was, but with
his lady absolute. She abdicated without a struggle. “Go to Mr. Moore, ask Mr.
Moore,” was her answer when applied to for orders.
In all this Miss Keeldar partly yielded to her disposition; but a remark she
made a year afterwards showed another motive. “Louis,” she said, “would
never have learned to rule if she had not ceased to govern.”
It had been intended that Miss Helstone should be bridesmaid, but
Fortune had destined her another part.
She came home in time to water her plants. The last flower attended to
was a rose-tree, which bloomed in a quiet green nook at the back of the house.
She gazed over the wall, the watering pot still in one hand, surveying the dusky
moors, where bonfires were kindling. The summer evening was warm; the bellmusic was joyous; the blue smoke of the fires looked soft, their red flame
bright. Above them, in the sky, twinkled a silver point – Venus.
Caroline was not unhappy that evening; but as she gazed she sighed, and
as she sighed a hand circled her, and rested quietly on her waist. Caroline
thought she knew who had drawn near, and was not startled.
“I am looking at Venus, mamma. See, she is beautiful. How white her
lustre is!”
The answer was a closer caress; and Caroline turned, and looked, not into
Mrs. Pryor’s matron face, but up at a dark manly visage. She dropped her
watering-pot.
“I have been sitting talking with ‘mamma’ an hour,” said the intruder.
“Where, meantime, have you been?”
“To Fieldhead. Shirley is as naughty as ever, Robert. She will neither say
Yes nor No to any question. She sits alone. I cannot tell whether she is
melancholy or nonchalant. If you rouse her or scold her, she gives you a look,
half wistful, half reckless, which sends you away as queer and crazed as herself.
What Louis will make of her, I cannot tell. For my part, if I were a gentleman, I
think I would not dare undertake her.”
“Never mind them. They were cut out for each other. Louis, strange to
say, likes her all the better for these freaks. He will manage her, if anyone can.
He has had a stormy courtship for such a calm character; but it ends in victory
for him. Caroline, I have sought you to ask an audience. Why are those bells
ringing?”
“For the repeal of your terrible law – the Orders you hate so much. You
are pleased, are you not?”
“Yesterday evening at this time I was packing some books for a seavoyage; along with clothes, seeds and tools, to take with me to Canada. I was
going to leave you.”
“To leave me?”
Her fingers fastened on his arm; she looked frightened.
“Not now. Look at me. Do you see the despair of parting?”
She looked into a bright face, beaming down on her with hope, fondness
and delight.
“Will the repeal do you much good?” she inquired.
“The repeal of the Orders in Council saves me. Now I shall not turn
bankrupt; I shall not give up business; I shall not leave England. Now I shall be
no longer poor; I can pay my debts; all the cloth I have in my warehouses will
be taken off my hands. This day lays for my fortunes a broad, firm foundation,
on which, for the first time in my life, I can securely build.”
Caroline held his hand, and drew a long breath. “You are saved? Your
difficulties are lifted?”
“They are lifted. I can act.”
“At last! Oh, Providence is kind! Thank Him, Robert.”
“I do thank Providence. Now I can take more workmen, give better
wages, lay wiser plans, do some good, be less selfish. Now, Caroline, I can
have a house – a home – and now–”
He paused.
“And now I can think of marriage; now I can seek a wife.”
She did not speak.
“Will Caroline pardon all I have made her suffer, all that long pain I have
wickedly caused her, all that sickness she owed to me? Will she forget what she
knows of my poor ambition, my sordid schemes? Will she let me prove that, as
I once deserted cruelly, trifled wantonly, I can now love faithfully, cherish
tenderly?”
His hand was in Caroline’s still; a gentle pressure answered him.
 “Is Caroline mine?”
“Caroline is yours. I love you too, Robert, and will take faithful care of
you.”
“Faithful care! As if that rose should promise to shelter from tempest this
hard grey stone! But she will care for me, in her way. These hands will gently
offer every comfort I can taste. I know she will bring me a solace, a charity, a
purity, to which, of myself, I am a stranger.”
Suddenly Caroline was troubled; her lip quivered. “Poor mamma! I am all
she has. Must I leave her?”
“Do you know, I thought of that difficulty, and have discussed it with
‘mamma’.”
“I cannot desert her, even for you. I cannot break her heart, even for your
sake.”
“She was faithful when I was false – was she not? I never came near your
sick-bed, and she watched it ceaselessly. You shall never leave her.”
“She may live very near us?”
“With us – only she will have her own rooms and servant. This she
stipulates herself.”
“You know she has an income, that makes her quite independent?”
“She told me that, with a gentle pride that reminded me of somebody
else.”
“She is not at all interfering, and incapable of gossip.”
“I know, Cary. But in any case, Louis and I are not the type of men who
fear their mothers-in-law. I suppose she will make much of me.”
“That she will – in her quiet way, you know. She is not demonstrative;
and when you see her silent, or even cool, you must not fancy her displeased; it
is only her manner.”
“I feel that she and I will suit. Hortense, you know, is exquisitely
sensitive, and not, perhaps, always reasonable; yet, dear, honest girl, I never had
a serious quarrel with her in my life.”
“No; you are most tenderly indulgent to her; and you will be considerate
with mamma. You are a gentleman all through, Robert, and nowhere so perfect
a gentleman as at your own fireside. And Mamma thinks of you as I do.”
“Not quite, I hope?”
“She does not want to marry you – don’t be vain; but she said to me the
other day, ‘My dear, Mr. Moore has pleasing manners; he is one of the few
gentlemen I have seen who combine politeness with sincerity.’“
“‘Mamma’ is rather a misanthropist, is she not? Not the best opinion of
the sterner sex?”
“There are exceptions whom she admires – Louis and Mr. Hall, and,
lately, yourself. But, Robert – have you seen my uncle yet?”
“I have. ‘Mamma’ called him into the room. He consents if I can prove
that I can keep a wife; and I can keep her better than he thinks.”
“If you get rich will you do good with your money, Robert?”
“I will; and you shall tell me how. Indeed, I have some schemes of my
own. I have learned the folly of being selfish. Caroline, this war must soon
draw to a close. Trade is likely to prosper for some years to come. What would
you think if, one day – perhaps ten years hence – Louis and I divide Briarfield
parish between us? Louis is certain of power and property. His mind is slow but
strong. He will be made magistrate of the district. Shirley would obtain this
dignity for him prematurely, if he would let her, but he will not. However, once
he has been master of Fieldhead a year, the district will feel his quiet influence,
acknowledge his superiority, and make him magistrate voluntarily. Everybody
admires his future wife, and everybody will, in time, like him. He will be
esteemed, consulted and depended on. His advice will be always judicious, his
help always good-natured. As for me, if I succeed as I intend to do, my success
will add to his and Shirley’s income. I can double the value of their mill
property. I can line yonder barren Hollow with lines of cottages and rows of
cottage-gardens–”
“Robert! And root up the copse?”
“The copse shall be firewood within five years. The beautiful wild ravine
shall be a smooth descent; the green natural terrace shall be a paved street.
There shall be cottages in the dark ravine, and on the lonely slopes. The rough
pebbled track shall be a firm, broad road, bedded with the cinders from my mill;
and my mill, Caroline, shall fill its present yard.”
“Horrible! You will change our blue hill-country air into Stilbro’ smoke.”
“I will get an Act for enclosing Nunnely Common, and parcelling it out
into farms.”
“Stilbro’ Moor, however, defies you, thank Heaven! What can you grow
in Bilberry Moss? What will flourish on Rushedge?”
“Caroline, the houseless, the starving, the unemployed shall come to
Hollow’s Mill from far and near; and Joe Scott shall give them work, and Louis
Moore, Esq., shall let them a house, and Mrs. Gill shall feed them till the first
pay-day.”
She smiled.
“Such a Sunday school as you will have, Cary! such a day school as you
and Shirley and Miss Ainley will have to manage between you! The mill shall
find salaries for a master and mistress, and the squire shall give a treat once a
quarter.”
She mutely offered a kiss – an offer taken unfair advantage of.
“Extravagant day-dreams,” said Moore, with a sigh and smile, “yet
perhaps we may realize some of them. Meantime, the dew is falling. Mrs.
Moore, I shall take you in.”
*
It is August. The bells clash out again, not only through Yorkshire, but
through England. From Spain the voice of a trumpet has sounded long; it
proclaims Salamanca is won. This night is Briarfield to be illuminated. On this
day the Fieldhead tenantry dine together; the Hollow’s Mill workpeople will be
assembled; the schools have a grand treat. This morning there were two
marriages solemnized in Briarfield church – Louis Gérard Moore, Esq., to
Shirley, daughter of the late Charles Keeldar, Esq., of Fieldhead; and Robert
Gérard Moore, Esq., to Caroline, niece of the Rev. Helstone, rector of
Briarfield.
The first ceremony was performed by Mr. Helstone, with Mr. Yorke
giving the bride away. In the second ceremony, Mr. Hall officiated. Amongst
the bridal train were two youthful bridesmen, Henry Sympson and Martin
Yorke.
I suppose Robert Moore’s prophecies were, partially at least, fulfilled.
The other day I passed up the Hollow, which tradition says was once green, and
lone, and wild; and there I saw the manufacturer’s day-dreams embodied in
substantial stone and brick – the cinder highway, the cottages, and the cottage
gardens; there I saw a mighty mill, and a chimney ambitious as the tower of
Babel. When I came home I told my old housekeeper where I had been.
“Ay,” said she, “I can remember the old mill being built – the very first in
all the district; and I can remember it being pulled down, and going to see the
foundation-stone of the new one laid. The two Mr. Moores made a great stir
about it. They were there, and both their ladies; very bonny and grand they
looked. But Mrs. Louis was the grandest; she always wore such handsome
dresses. Mrs. Robert was quieter like. Mrs. Louis smiled when she talked. She
had a real, happy, glad, good-natured look; but she had eyes that pierced a body
through.”
“What was the Hollow like then, Martha?”
“Different to now; but I could tell of when there was neither mill, nor
cottage, nor hall, except Fieldhead, within two miles of it. I can tell, one
summer evening, fifty years since, of my mother coming running in just at the
edge of dark, almost fleyed out of her wits, saying she had seen a fairy in
Fieldhead Hollow; and that was the last fairy that ever was seen in this area. A
lonesome spot it was, and a bonny spot, full of oaks and nut trees. It is altered
now.”
The story is told. I think I now see the judicious reader putting on his
spectacles to look for the moral. It would be an insult to his wisdom to offer
directions. I only say, God speed him in the quest!

THE END
 ↑

Extracts from Elizabeth Gaskell, The Life of Charlotte Bronte (1857)
Vol. II, Ch. IV.


The tale of “Shirley” had been begun soon after the publication of “Jane
Eyre.” If the reader will refer to the account I have given of Miss Brontë's
schooldays at Roe Head, he will there see how every place surrounding that
house was connected with the Luddite riots, and will learn how stories and
anecdotes of that time were rife among the inhabitants of the neighbouring
villages; how Miss Wooler herself, and the elder relations of most of her
schoolfellows, must have known the actors in those grim disturbances. What
Charlotte had heard there as a girl came up in her mind when, as a woman, she
sought a subject for her next work; and she sent to Leeds for a file of the
Mercuries of 1812, '13, and '14; in order to understand the spirit of those
eventful times. She was anxious to write of things she had known and seen; and
among the number was the West Yorkshire character, for which any tale laid
among the Luddites would afford full scope. In “Shirley” she took the idea of
most of her characters from life, although the incidents and situations were, of
course, fictitious. She thought that if these last were purely imaginary, she
might draw from the real without detection, but in this she was mistaken; her
studies were too closely accurate. This occasionally led her into difficulties.
People recognised themselves, or were recognised by others, in her graphic
descriptions of their personal appearance, and modes of action and turns of
thought; though they were placed in new positions, and figured away in scenes
far different to those in which their actual life had been passed. Miss Brontë
was struck by the force or peculiarity of the character of some one whom she
knew; she studied it, and analysed it with subtle power; and having traced it to
its germ, she took that germ as the nucleus of an imaginary character, and
worked outwards;—thus reversing the process of analysation, and
unconsciously reproducing the same external development. The “three curates”
were real living men, haunting Haworth and the neighbouring district; and so
obtuse in perception that, after the first burst of anger at having their ways and
habits chronicled was over, they rather enjoyed the joke of calling each other by
the names she had given them. “Mrs. Pryor” was well known to many who
loved the original dearly. The whole family of the Yorkes were, I have been
assured, almost daguerreotypes. Indeed Miss Brontë told me that, before
publication, she had sent those parts of the novel in which these remarkable
persons are introduced, to one of the sons; and his reply, after reading it, was
simply that “she had not drawn them strong enough.” From those many-sided
sons, I suspect, she drew all that there was of truth in the characters of the
heroes in her first two works. They, indeed, were almost the only young men
she knew intimately, besides her brother. There was much friendship, and still
more confidence between the Brontë family and them,—although their
intercourse was often broken and irregular. There was never any warmer feeling
on either side.
The character of Shirley herself, is Charlotte’s representation of Emily. I
mention this, because all that I, a stranger, have been able to learn about her has
not tended to give either me, or my readers, a pleasant impression of her. But
we must remember how little we are acquainted with her, compared to that
sister, who, out of her more intimate knowledge, says that she “was genuinely
good, and truly great,” and who tried to depict her character in Shirley Keeldar,
as what Emily Brontë would have been, had she been placed in health and
prosperity.
Miss Brontë took extreme pains with “Shirley.” She felt that the fame she
had acquired imposed upon her a double responsibility. She tried to make her
novel like a piece of actual life,—feeling sure that, if she but represented the
product of personal experience and observation truly, good would come out of
it in the long run. She carefully studied the different reviews and criticisms that
had appeared on “Jane Eyre,” in hopes of extracting precepts and advice from
which to profit.
Down into the very midst of her writing came the bolts of death. She had
nearly finished the second volume of her tale when Branwell died,—after him
Emily,—after her Anne;—the pen, laid down when there were three sisters
living and loving, was taken up when one alone remained. Well might she call
the first chapter that she wrote after this, “The Valley of the Shadow of
Death.”…

*
She went on with her work steadily. But it was dreary to write without
any one to listen to the progress of her tale,—to find fault or to sympathise,—
while pacing the length of the parlour in the evenings, as in the days that were
no more. Three sisters had done this,—then two, the other sister dropping off
from the walk,—and now one was left desolate, to listen for echoing steps that
never came,—and to hear the wind sobbing at the windows, with an almost
articulate sound.
But she wrote on, struggling against her own feelings of illness;
“continually recurring feelings of slight cold; slight soreness in the throat and
chest, of which, do what I will,” she writes, “I cannot get rid.”…

*

To W. S. WILLIAMS, ESQ.
“Sept. 21st, 1849.
“My dear Sir,—I am obliged to you for preserving my secret, being at
least as anxious as ever (MORE anxious I cannot well be) to keep quiet. You
asked me in one of your letters lately, whether I thought I should escape
identification in Yorkshire. I am so little known, that I think I shall. Besides, the
book is far less founded on the Real, than perhaps appears. It would be difficult
to explain to you how little actual experience I have had of life, how few
persons I have known, and how very few have known me.

“As an instance how the characters have been managed, take that of Mr.
Helstone. If this character had an original, it was in the person of a clergyman
who died some years since at the advanced age of eighty. I never saw him
except once—at the consecration of a church—when I was a child of ten years
old. I was then struck with his appearance, and stern, martial air. At a
subsequent period, I heard him talked about in the neighbourhood where he had
resided: some mention him with enthusiasm—others with detestation. I listened
to various anecdotes, balanced evidence against evidence, and drew an
inference. The original of Mr. Hall I have seen; he knows me slightly; but he
would as soon think I had closely observed him or taken him for a character—
he would as soon, indeed, suspect me of writing a hook—a novel—as he would
his dog, Prince. Margaret Hall called “Jane Eyre” a ‘wicked book,’ on the
authority of the Quarterly; an expression which, coming from her, I will here
confess, struck somewhat deep. It opened my eyes to the harm the Quarterly
had done. Margaret would not have called it ‘wicked,’ if she had not been told
so.
“No matter,—whether known or unknown—misjudged, or the
contrary,—I am resolved not to write otherwise. I shall bend as my powers
tend. The two human beings who understood me, and whom I understood, are
gone: I have some that love me yet, and whom I love, without expecting, or
having a right to expect, that they shall perfectly understand me. I am satisfied;
but I must have my own way in the matter of writing. The loss of what we
possess nearest and dearest to us in this world, produces an effect upon the
character we search out what we have yet left that can support, and, when
found, we cling to it with a hold of new-strung tenacity. The faculty of
imagination lifted me when I was sinking, three months ago; its active exercise
has kept my head above water since; its results cheer me now, for I feel they
have enabled me to give pleasure to others. I am thankful to God, who gave me
the faculty; and it is for me a part of my religion to defend this gift, and to profit
by its possession.—Yours sincerely,

